1*
THE
OLD CONTINENTAL;
OR,
THE PRICE OF LIBERTY.
BY
THE AUTHOR OF THE DUTCHMAN'S FIRESIDE, &c., &c.
IN TWO VOLUMES.
VOL. I.
CHAPTER I.
IN WHICH MUCH IS SAID, AND LITTLE DONE.
During
the most gloomy and disastrous period of
our revolutionary war, there resided in the county of
Westchester a family of plain country people, who
had, in time long past, seen better days; but who
now had nothing to boast of, but a small farm, a good
name, and a good conscience. Though bred in the
city, they had lived so long in a retired part of the
country, that their habits, tastes, and manners, had
become
altogether rural, and they had almost outlived
every vestige of former refinements, except in
certain
modes of thinking, and acting, which had survived
in all changes of time and circumstances. Their
residence
was an old stone-house, bearing the date of
1688, the figures of which were formed by
Holland
bricks, incorporated with the walls. The roof
was green with mossy honours, and the entire edifice
bore testimony, not only to the lapse of time, but to
the downhill progress of its inmates. Though not in
ruins, it was much decayed; and, though with a good
rousing fire in the broad capacious chimney, it was
comfortable enough in winter, it afforded nothing
without to indicate anything but the possession of
those simple necessaries of life, which fall to the lot
of those who derive their means of happiness from
the labours of their hands, the bounties of the earth,
and the blessing of a quiet soul.
The old stone-house stood on the brow of a little
knoll, fronting a stream something between a brook
and a river, that meandered and murmured among
willows and alders, at the foot of a range of high hills,
which approached not so near but that they left long
strips of rich meadows between their base and the
banks of the stream. In the rear of the house, at no
great distance, was a pond of some half a mile in
circumference, and so shallow, in many places, that a
variety of aquatic shrubs grew out above the surface,
where congregated clouds of black-birds, whose
music
made but poor amends for their depredations on
the newly planted corn-fields. This was not the only
music; for, of a still summer evening, the sonorous
bull-frog ever and anon twanged his horn,
accompanied
by a mingled variety of strange harmonies,
that we can only compare with the inexplicable
jargon
of a fashionable overture.
In those days, too, the young plough-boys, and
milkmaids
sometimes sung their rustic ditties, with
blithesome hearts, mornings and evenings, until the
harsh dissorence of the trumpet, calling to deeds of
bloody strife, scared away all other music, and the
rural
retreats of our country no longer resounded to the
laugh or the song. Indeed, the latter seems to have
been scared away forever. Those rural ballads are
now scarcely ever heard in the quiet retreats of our
country; whether it be that the long and arduous
struggles, severe sufferings, and perpetual anxieties of
our people, during seven years of bloody war, have
given a sober, thoughtful, anxious cast to their
characters
,
or that the possession of freedom, like every
worldly blessing, has its drawbacks in new cares for
ourselves and our offspring, new solicitudes and new
responsibilities.
The spot I have thus slightly sketched, seemed
consecrated
to rural happiness and rural virtue. And so
it was, and so it long had been; but the time had now
come when that destiny which had carried our
forefathers
from the old, followed and overtook them
in the new world. They left their native land to
escape
a despotism equally exercised over mind and
body. They sought the wilderness of the west, to
enjoy
in the new world, that seemed to have been
discovered
on purpose, that freedom of the soul, more
precious than all other freedom. But bigotry and
persecution, those bloody and remorseless fiends that
so often assume the livery of the Prince of Peace, still
followed them in the disguise of political devices,
calling
for new sacrifices, new struggles, and new
sufferings
.
The rights and privileges, for which they had
sacrificed everything in the home of their fathers, were
now to be once more asserted and maintained for the
home of their children. A contest had commenced,
in which a proud and arrogant parent offered every
wrong and violence which power could inflict, or
weakness endure. There was no longer safety in the
cities, or repose in the cottage. It was not only a
war against men, but against women, children, and
domestic animals; against the labours of
husbandmen
,
and the bounties of the earth. The hen-roost
and the pig-stye, were no longer the prey of four-footed
prowlers, but of gallant soldiers; and no man could
reasonably hope either to reap where he had sown, or
eat the bread he had earned by the sweat of his brow.
It was not alone the foreign mercenaries of a
misguided
monarch that assailed the peaceful inhabitants
who dwelt in the district which is the scene of our
story. The army of the invader had now established
its head quarters in New York, and the Americans
were sheltered from a far superiour foe, in the
Highlands
of the Hudson. The intermediate space from
Kingsbridge, or
Spuytey Duyvel
, was consequently a
sort of debateable land, like the English and
Scottish
borders, before the union of the two kingdoms. It
was occupied by neither party, and it might almost be
said there was neither law or gospel there. The
farmers
of this region, who remained at home, some because
they did not know where else to go; some from being
too old to remove; and some, perhaps, in the vain hope
that neutrality would protect them from the ravages
of war, were placed between two fires. Such
peculiar
situations are always, in these troubled times, the
scenes of violence and devastation; the resort of
reckless, unprincipled villains, belonging to neither
party, yet a disgrace to both, from alternately passing,
as occasion required, for adherents of one or the other.
Beyond the sphere of military coercion, or the restraints
of civil authority, it is here that the plunderer and
ravisher luxuriates in unrestrained violence, and
weakness and innocence become his unresisting prey.
The enemy, in small parties, made almost daily
incursions
from New York, and the sad domestic history
of those melancholy times, if it were written down
from the lips of those who suffered and survived their
calamities, a few of whom yet live to relate them,
would tell, what has never yet been told, the price
at which liberty and independence were bought. On
the other hand, bands of lawless tories of native growth,
aided by a class of worthless outlaws belonging to
no party, but scourges to both, scoured the country at
night, robbing the houses, and often setting them on
fire; stealing the cattle, insulting and maltreating the
wretched women and children, and not unfrequently
murdering the poor victims they had dispoiled. The
devoted inhabitants had no heart to labour, except
from extreme necessity; the fields were fruitful only
of weeds and briars; the fences destroyed, the
windows
broken; the roads, as far as could be seen,
presented
no living object, and as is ever the case,
under
a perpetual succession of suffering, the minds of
the inhabitants had settled down into the dead calm
of apathy or despair.
The little narrow vale, I have been describing,
being
several miles from the high road, leading along
the bank of the Hudson, had hitherto, in a great degree,
if not entirely, escaped the ravages either of the
red-coats
,
the Yagers, or outlawed scum, all whose
varieties
were included in the expressive denomination of
Cow Boys and Skinners. But every day, and more
especially
every night, afforded indications that the tempest
was gradually approaching nearer and nearer. As the
country along the river became exhausted of the means
of satisfying these lawless plunderers, whose exploits,
we earnestly hope, will never, like those of the
Scottish
border thieves, become the theme of poetic
eulogium
they
diverged from the high road, and
penetrated
into the interior. Now it was that those who
had hitherto escaped the scourge, trembled for their
property and their lives. The farmers no longer
rejoiced
in the prospect of a golden harvest, which
they never expected to reap; the women lay awake
at nighttrembling at every whispering leaf, or breath
of air; and the children fled from their cherished
sports, at the cry of the Yagers are coming! These
Yagers were a band of foreign mercenaries, hired
by our mother country to assist in our subujation; and
being totally ignorant of the grounds of the quarrel,
as well as, beyond doubt, stimulated by the most cruel
misrepresentations of the motives and character of
the people of the United States, are noted in the
traditions
of the times for a thousand acts of ruthless
barbarity. Little did they think they were warring
against themselves, and those rights, the enjoyment of
which is now so anxiously sought by thousands of
their countrymen.
The family at the old stone-house consisted of an
aged couple, whose snow-white locks and stooping
figures bore testimony to a long pilgrimage through
this vale of tears; one son, and a grandson of some
nineteen years old. The son had gone forth to give
aid to his country in her hour of peril, and was now
with the army of Washington. The grandson, whose
name was John, remained at home, sorely against his
will, to assist in the management of the farm. But
he longed to go forth and fight by the side of his
father
,
and frequently joined parties of militia in
expeditions
towards Kingsbridge to gain information of the
movements of the enemy, or to protect the inhabitants
from the Yagers, the Skinners, and the Cow Boys. On
one of these occasions he had greatly distinguished
himself, and received the thanks of the gallant Colonel
Philip Van Courtlandt, who commanded the outposts
at Peekskill. He was handsome, active, and possessed
an intrepidity, as well as cool self-possession in time
of danger, that qualifies a man to become a leader in
all desperate or trying occasions. During the first
fourteen years of his life, he had been brought up in
the city of New York, where he received every
advantage
of education, until the misfortunes of his father
compelled him to join his parents on the farm, now
their only possession.
One evening, in the lazy month of August, the family
were in quiet chat under an old willow-tree, just at
the door. The party consisted only of the old people,
John, and a young woman named Jane, the only
daughter of Colonel Hammond, a near neighbour, who
had served in the old French war and performed divers
brilliant exploits not recorded in history. The
conversation
naturally turned on the state of their country,
and the probability of ere long receiving a visit from
the red coats, the Yagers, or the outlaws, to whom
allusion
has previously been made. Its tone was
saddened
by gloomy forebodings, for nothing is more
depressing
to the mind than perpetual fears, and were it
not that people become used to them, as to every other
evil, their perpetual recurrence would be intolerable.
The aged couple had made up their minds to endure
all that might come with patient acquiescence; but
the youth, though he said not a word, exhibited in the
bright energies of his fiery eye, a far different
determination
.
After a long pause, the old man, as if
suddenly
recovering himself, turned to him, and said
So, John, you were out last night. Did you see
anything besides the stars?
I saw brighter lights than the stars, sir, replied
John.
Aye! what were theythe lights of the north?
Only a couple of houses burning. They made the
country smile for miles around. It was a glorious
sight, sir, said the young man with bitter irony.
What, the red coats were out, hey?
Yes, sir, the red coatsat least, I suppose so
though when we came up there were none there.
They had reaped the harvest of glory and retired.
No, no, John, said the good woman, who still, like
all the colonists, especially women, cherished a great
2
respect for red coats, until roused by injuries to
resentment
and resistance; no, John, not the red coatsthe
tories and the Yagers.
All one to me, motherso he always called her
after the death of his ownBritish, or tories, or
Yagers
.
They all hoist the same flagthey are all in
the pay of the same employer. Master and man, like
man and wife, are one flesh. I hold them all alike,
and treat them so, when I meet them.
Ah! John, John! you should not bear malice.
Remember, we are commanded to forgive our
enemies
,
persecutors, and slanderers.
I know it, mother, and when our country is free,
and not an enemy's foot-print is to be seen on our soil,
I will obey the command; but while they are every
day inflicting new injuries, I cannot forgive them.
Right, Johnyou say right, exclaimed the old
man; and I almost wish you were old enough to be
a soldier. I could find in my heart to send you after
your father, to fight by the side of Washington.
Old enough or not, sir, I must go. I can't stay
here any longer. Yesterday, I was pointed at by old
Mrs. Read, who has three sons in the army, as a booby
tied to his grandmother's apron-string, instead of being
among men, defending his country.
The wicked old woman! said Jane, in a half
whisper.
I'll tell you at once, continued John, for it must
out at last. I am going this very night with a party,
to see if we can't catch some of the rascals who steal
our cattle under cover of darkness, and run away by
the light of the burning houses.
Don't goI beseech you not to go, John, cried the
old grandmother, earnestly.
I entreat you not to go! cried Jane, tenderly.
And I, exclaimed the old man, commandno!
God forbid I should prevent your doing anything to
serve our cause and our country!
I must go, for I have given my word. I must be
off bright and early in the morning, to procure a pass
from Colonel Philip Van Courtlandt, and shall hardly
be back in time to meet our neighbours at the Hole.
We are to scout during the night towards Kingsbridge,
and must be off as soon as it is dark.
Alas! said Jane, what can you raw country boys
do against the red coats?
Whatever stout hearts and strong arms can do,
Jane, rejoined the other. Don't you remember that
blessed little David, the peasant-boy after God's own
heart? how, just as if to humble the pride of the
proud invader, Providence armed him with a sling and
a stone, to overcome Goliah? The destinies of
empires
,
Jane, is always in the hands of a brave and
virtuous
people, let them be ever so poor. Our cause is
that of the lowly against the exalted, and it is for poor
men to maintain it.
But, JohnJohn! cried the grandmother.
But John heard her not. He had relapsed into an
old habit of abstraction, common to minds of a higher
order, and strengthened by being much alone. He
began talking to himself, though his voice was raised,
and his eye kindled with animation.
I never read that glorious story of little David,
without thinking how much is in the power of every
man, if it pleases God. A sling and a stone! I have
a musket and a sword, and for a good causea cause
more just and noble never breathed fire into the soul
of man. The arm of Heaven was against the
Philistine
,
and will it not be on our side, too? But come
what will, one thing I knowif a good chance
happens
,
my name shall ring.
Theretherenow the boy has got on his high
horse again! He grows madder every day. Ring,
indeed! It will never be heard as far as a cow-bell,
John, cried the old woman, impatiently.
Yes, ring, mother. I feel as if I could do
something
to be remembered if it comes in my way, and if
it don't come, I will seek it. What is it, after all, that
rules the world, but courage and daring? Yonder
strutting game-cock reigns over the poultry-yard, not
because his father reigned before him, but by fighting
his way to power. So with all, except the race of
mankind which claims to wield the sceptre by right
of superior intellect, and yet is continually conceding
it to fools and cowards. By my soul, I think a man
with the heart of a true game-chicken, may be just
what he pleases in a strife like this.
The Lord be with you, John! sighed the old woman,
you will be shot one of these days.
It shall not be for cowardice, or mutiny, then. All
flesh must die, and fish, too, either yesterday, to-day,
or to-morrow. A good deed is better than a long life,
and to die for our country is to live forever.
The boy talks like a parson. It wasn't for nothing
his father sent him to the academy in New York,
said the old man.
Ah! Johnyou will be shot one of these days, I
tell you. Remember, life is sweet! sighed the old
grandmother.
Only a bitter, which long tasting makes sweet,
mother. But I must go and get ready, for I must start
before daylight. Jane, shall I see you home, for it is
getting dusky. I want to talk to you about the little
ducks and chickens, said John, sportively, and they
went away together.
Ducks and chickens! quoth the dame. The sly
rogue! Did you hear that?
To be sure I didI know they love each other
dearly.
I'm glad of it with all my heart, for Jane is a nice
girl. But what will the colonel say to it? He is rich
and proud, and we are poor and lowly, and what little
we have may be laid waste before to-morrow. The
colonel loves money, I believe, better than even his
daughter.
Yesso he doesso he does, replied the old man,
thoughtfully. But who knows but John's queer
notions
about making his name ring may come true in
the end? They say, some people have a sort of insight
into what is to come, long before it happens. Who
knows?
Who, indeed! Strange things happen in war-time.
I have heard the great Washington was but a farmer's
son.
Wellwellold folks that can do nothing but talk
must trust to Providence, and those that can, take care
of themselves. I must make up for John's absence by
stirring my old stumps a little more actively.
2*
And so must I; but I wish from my heart the boy
was safe home again from his trip to Kingsbridge,
exclaimed the good soul, with her apron to her eyes.
They then retired to their humble bed, and
Providence
,
for that night, blessed them with a repose
undisturbed
by Cow Boys, Skinners, or red coats.
CHAPTER II.
A LOVE SCENE SPOILED BY AN OLD CONTINENTAL.
John
and his gentle companion pursued their way
lazily towards the home of the damsel, by a path which
wound through the green meadows along the joyous
stream that twittered blithely as it slipped over the
white pebbles, and was so narrow in some places that
their arms intertwined with each other in spite of
themselves. It is true, they might have walked Indian
file, that is, one before the other, but this never
occurred
to either. The long twilight of a summer day
was now gradually subsiding into the deeper shades
of approaching night; the bright star, consecrated to
the queen of love and beauty, hovered low over the
dark outlines of the adjacent hills, and had, for its
companion, the graceful new moon, which, in the form
of a silver Indian bow, hung suspended in the heavens.
Like John and his darling maiden, they seemed alone
in the skies, as the others were on the earth, for the
crowd of lagging stars had not yet made their
appearance
.
All nature seemed sunk on a bed of down, in
soft, luxurious repose, and the enervating warmth of
the weather, while it deprived the body of its elastic
vigour, made ample amends, by quickening the finer
feelings of the soul to sweeter and brighter
aspirations
.
It was a dangerous hour for the wicked, and
those whose passions tyrannize over all the ties of
faith and duty; but it offered to pure and virtuous
affection
only a gentle excitement, which, while adding
to love additional fervour, detracted nothing from its
purity.
They walked for a while without either uttering a
word, for silence is twin sister to love. The young
man was thinking over those dim visions of the future,
which, ever since the commencement of the struggle
for freedom, had shared with Jane the empire of his
heart. The two were, indeed, inseparably associated;
he loved his country and his mistress, and all his hopes
of possessing the one, were founded on serving the
other. The young girl was occupied with her fears
and anticipations. She, indeed, possessed, in common
with the noble race of our revolutionary matrons, that
holy spirit of patriotism which inspired the men of that
memorable era, whose consequences have
confounded
the calculations of philosophers who draw their
theories from the past history of mankind. It was
this spirit which animated their resistance, nerved
their arms, inspired their souls, and finally enabled
the peaceful cultivators of the earth to wrest from
boundless wealth, disciplined armies, and almost
irresistible
power, the most glorious prize for which
nations
ever contended.
But there is in the heart of a true woman, a gentle,
we may say, a happy inclination to yield to the softer
impulses of the heart. They love the brave, and
worship at the shrine of glory; but when the period
arrives for them to choose between the danger of one
they love, and the chance of acquiring rank or fame,
amid the perils of war, the sacrifice, if made at all,
is made with fear and anguish, and the penalty of
disappointment
paid by a broken heart. Such were the
feelings which checked the tongue of Jane, and
repressed
every expression, except what might be
augured
from a long and heavy sigh, which ever and anon
heaved in her throbbing bosom. The struggle was
more painful than obstinate, for she had made up her
mind, for sometime, never, let what might come, to
dissuade him from the performance of his duty to his
country.
They were now in sight of the mansion of her
father, which was the best in twenty miles round, and
its owner the greatest man, in his own opinion, in the
county. He had fought in the old French war under
Putnam, and had his leg broken at the scaling of
Ticonderoga
;
in proof of which honourable achievement,
he limped all the rest of his life, and told the story
every day. Colonel Hammond was a passionate old
gentleman; but this was excusable, since it was
observed
by his neighbours, that whenever the colonel
got angry, and swore by Thunder and Mars, it was
always a prelude to some act of kindness or
generosity
.
He was somewhat wilful, as well as
way-ward
,
having long since lost his wife, who by her
good temper, good sense, and steadiness of purpose
governed both his will and actions, without his
having
the slightest suspicion of being, what he scorned
beyond every other species of disgrace, namely,
an obedient husband. He was, withal, somewhat of
a humourist, and being rather addicted to expletives,
had adopted a system of swearing, by the aid of which,
he communicated great energy to his conversation,
without breaking a single commandment. We are of
opinion it was altogether original with the good
gentleman
,
seeing he died before Bob Acres came into the
world. It is only necessary to add, that he was
exceedingly
addicted to projects and inventions, none of
which ever proved of the least service to himself or
the world. He admired John, who was a frank, bold,
vivacious fellow; but like many wise men, he liked
him not as a son-in-law, and forgot that his daughter
did not see through his spectacles. John had lately
laughed at a pet invention of the colonel's, for catching
moles, and had been, in consequence, under the ban
of the old gentleman. It was, therefore, prudent for
the young couple to part at the entrance of the little
grove, that screened them from observation. This
necessity
unlocked their tongues, and Jane was the first
to speak.
Let us part, now, said she, you know you are in
disgrace, and my father will be angry at seeing us
together.
I know it, Jane. He looks down on me now. It
shall not be my fault, if he don't look up to me before
many years are past, if the war continues.
You are much given to boasting, lately, John.
Have you dreamed a dream, or seen a vision, or had
your fortune told by Hagar Raven? asked she, with
a glistening eye.
No, Jane, I rest my hopes on a fixed determination
to gain your father's consent at all risks, and I know
that to a brave old soldier, like him, there is no
recommendation
like courage. Night and day, so help
me heaven, I will never rest contented, till I have
done something to deserve your love, and his
approbation
.
I will never ask you of him, until I feel I
deserve
you, and will win my way to your arms or those
of death.
Oh! don't talk so! You could not bear to think
of death if you loved me. Sincesincewhat has
passed between us, I never think of death without
shuddering. Before that, I loved none but my father,
but that love did not make me fear death; go now
and I charge you, as you love me, to take care of
yourself
.
Do you indeed love me?
Love you? ah! dearest Jane, I love you better than
liberty, for I would be your slave. I love you better
than selfish beings love themselvesbetter than brave
men love danger, or cowards safety. But I must now
leave you. One kissbut one. I know it is wrong,
but it may be our last.
The parting was sealed by a modest kiss, a parting
embrace. Just at the moment, the colonel, who had
been setting his mole-trap in an adjacent field, having
heard their voices, approached in somewhat of a
towering passion.
Thunder and Mars! thought he, a turtle dove
in white dimity cooing to a mate in gray homespun.
I have told that puppy fifty times he shan't have Jane,
though he never asked me the question, and only the
other day forbid him my house. The young rascal!
to laugh at my mole-trapand I've told Jane fifty
times a-day, for months past, she shan't marry that
beggarly stripling, so she couldn't possibly forget it.
Not but that the puppy's a clever lad, too; the best
rider, the best shot, the best runner and wrestler,
aye, and the best scholar, too, in the county. I believe
he knows more than I do; and as for courage, he'd eat
fire for breakfast, dinner and supper before he'd turn
his back on friend or foe. Confound me, if I don't
sometimes think I like the fellowbut then he's poor
he wants the one thing needful, without which a man
is no better than an empty purse, or a pocket turned
inside out. What will become of all my improvements
if I am obliged to maintain him and all his brats; for
the poorer a man is, the more is he blessed with
mouths to eat out what little he has? What will
become
of my canal from Sawmill to Byram river, which I
mean to make navigable if I can only get water enough?
and what will become of my patent cider press, my
horizontal wheel, and my perpendicular axle-tree? It
wont doit wont doI can't spare anything from my
improvements. Heywhatthunder and fire!
As the worthy colonel thus communed with the
inward
man, the young puppy and the young damsel
were standing still as mice; for though they had gone
through all the preliminaries of a long farewell, they
seemed inclined to begin again. Just at this
moment
John wound his trembling arm around the
slender
waist of Jane, which, though innocent of
whalebone
,
was but a span, and drawing her to his bosom,
compressed one more last memento on her rosy lips.
A blush and a tear mingled together on her glowing
cheek, and she reproached him for his freedom, with a
quivering lip. The choleric colonel could endure this
no longerhe came upon them as fast as his lame leg
would permit, and was just in time to interrupt the
ceremony of another last farewell.
Thunder and Mars! roared he, what is all this?
I'll send one of you to perdition, and disinherit the
other. So madamso sirI say what does all this
mean. Do you take this puppy for a young sapling
that you cling about him like a grape vine? Hey
confound your pictures, what does all this mean, I
say?
It would be a subject worthy the deepest
investigation
of a philosopher, who had nothing else to
employ
him, why it is that the bravest spirit, when
detected
in the act of saluting a woman, though ever so
innocently, at night, or what is still more embarrassing,
by the light of the moonexcept it be his great-aunt or
his grandmotherlooks and feels just for all the world
as if he had been caught robbing a hen-roost. John
could look danger in the face, as an eagle does the
sun; he was as brave as a game chicken, but at this
moment, he could neither flap his wings or crow. He
looked very much like a rooster, who, in country
phrase, runs under, when detected by the master
spirit of the farm yard, paying his devoirs to a young
pullet. He was not dead, but he was certainly
speechless
.
Jane, however, who was accustomed to the
colonel's explosion of wrath, and a woman, besides,
retained
more self-possession, and with something like
modest artlessness, replied to his question, of what all
this meant.
It is only our last parting, dear father.
Only our last parting dear father, reiterated the
colonelIt looks more like your last meeting, for
3
you seemed as if you never meant to part again. But
where is the puppy going? To join the red coats, I
suppose, or plunder some of the farmers down
below
hey,
blood and fire!
No, father, he is going to fight for his country.
What, between the lines, I supposeto rob both
sides, hey!I've a great mind to carry him before that
obstinate old blockhead, Squire Day, and have him
hanged for a Cow Boy.
Take care what you say, colonel, said John,
brushing up at this opprobrious charge.
Take care what I say? I'll say what I please, and
do what I please on my own ground. I'll seize you
for a trespasser, and lock you up in the cellar, sir, and
then what would you do, hey?
Why, colonel, my present impression is, that I
would run away myself, and if possible, persuade Jane
to go with me.
You would, would you? Thunder and Mars! I
only wish I was the man I was before the old French
war, when I summoned old Ti, and surrounded a
corporal's
guard, that surrendered at discretion. By the
Lord, I'd make you measure land by the yard faster
than you ever did before. Hey! John, did you ever
hear that story of old Ti?
Never, that I recollectat least since you last told
it, added he, in a low tonefor he knew that nothing
in this world tickled the old continental so much as
telling the story to one who never heard it before.
Nor read it in history? asked the colonel.
Never, sir.
What an ignoramusand what a sieve is history;
only it lets out the grain, and retains the chaff. But,
what am I talking about here, when the dew is falling
in showers, and the fog rising like smoke in a battle.
Look you, Jane, do you love this young puppy? Why
don't you answer instead of standing as dumb and as
deaf as a copper-head? Do you love this great
scholar
,
who never heard of my taking Ticonderoga? Tell
me the honest truth, if a woman can possibly be
honest
on such an occasion. Out with it, and don't
pretend
to be too modest after what I have just seen.
It was now Jane's turn to be silent; and in this
unnatural
,
unfeminine state, she continued, her head
hanging down, and her forehead red with blushes,
though she had answered that question scores of
times to a certain person. The colonel then turned to
John, and proposed the same interrogatory.
With all my soul, sirI would die for her if
necessary
.
You would? A bargainget a halter out of the
stable yonder, and hang yourself only for fifteen minutes,
and on the honour of an old continental, you shall
marry Jane the next hour if you can only make the
responses, and we can find a parson or justice of
peace, who is not a rank tory. Mind, I except Squire
Day, who is such an obstinate old fool, that ten to one,
he will contradict the whole ceremony. What say
you, John?hey, boy!
I say, colonel, that if it were not for Jane, your
lame leg, and your gray hairs, I would answer you not
with a word, but a blow.
A blow! Do I live to hear, and does the man live
that threatens me a blow? Thunder and fire! But
if you survive the other business, you shall give me
satisfaction. Jane, I'm sorry for youyou'll be a
widow
before sunset to-morrow. I say, Jane, how would
you like to lose your sweethearthey?
How would you like to lose your daughter, sir,
replied Jane.
Whatheyis it come to that? Drowning or
poisoning, or pining away to a shadow! Very well
very exceeding well, my dutiful daughter. You'd
rather he'd shoot your poor old father, I suppose. You'd
prefer being an orphan to a widowhey? Faith, he's
no beauty, I must confesshe is not as tall and as
straight `as a poplar tree,' nor are `his cheeks as red
as a rose.' He can't jump over a seven rail fence
without touching it with his hand, nor talk sentiment
like a ballad monger, nor lie like an almanac maker.
He's
past say
, as the French used to call it at Old Ti.
But to the point. Do you love this most respectful
puppy, who threatens to knock your father on the
head, except for two or three substantial reasons? Out
with ittell the truth, which I know before hand.
Remember, there never has been a lie told in my
family
since the declaration of independence. Do you
love him, I say?
I can't deny it, father, with the same lips that have
often uttered the confession.
Upon my word! Signed, sealed, and delivered, as
that obstinate old blockhead, Squire Day, says. But
it won't do, I tell you, it won't do. The conveyance
is not legal; and you, sir, turning short on John, you
will accept the conveyance of this dutiful daughter,
hey?
When I have made myself worthy of her, and not
before, replied John. I mean to gain a reputation
equal to that of the brave officer, her father, before I
ask him to give me his daughter.
Humbrave officerthat's sensibly said, but it
won't do, Johnyou must make yourself rich, and
then you will be worthy in my sight.
Rich, sir! I never thought of that. I mean to
serve my countrythat will make me worthy of any
man's daughter.
Ha! ha! humwell, John, I can't but say I like
your idea. I am a cool, calculating man, as all the
world allows, except that obstinate old blockhead,
Squire Day, who, by-the-bye, I suspect is a rank tory
in his heart. I shouldn't be surprised if he had a
British protection in his pocket at this moment. And,
JohnThunder and Mars! what are you gaping at
that girl for, instead of listening to what I am
saying
?
I was only reading her thoughts, sir.
Well, and what may she be thinking about?
She was thinking how you could be so cruel as to
bring tears in the eyes, and sorrow to the heart, of one
who has been your solace in health, your nurse in
sickness
,
and, to the utmost extent of her duty and
affection
,
has supplied to you the loss of her dear mother.
This touched the old continental to the quick. He
cherished the memory of his wife, who had been a
kind and gentle mate, and was accustomed to tell Jane
how much she resembled her mother.
Well, Johnny, said the colonel, after a pause, I
am a reasonable man, only a little too easy tempered.
3*
Now, you puppy, listen to me, and don't dare to turn
even the corner of your eye on that girl until I have
done. You know, John, I am rich and you are poor,
and that I shall be ten times richer when I have
finished
my canal and other great improvementsyou
young rascal, I see you peeping! I say, when I have
finished my canal and other improvements, I shall be
as rich as old Fred Phillips before his property was all
confiscated.
That will be some time after the last trumpet
sounds, quoth Master John.
What's that you are mumbling, you puppy?
Something about a trumpet, sir.
Well, as I was saying, John, I am rich. I don't
wish to hurt your feelings, but you are what I should
call, as it were, comparatively a beggar.
Beggar! cried John, indignantly. Do you think
that with arms like mine, and a heart to use them, a
man can be called a beggar? Sir, I shall never beg
anything of you but your daughter.
Be quietconfound that red-pepper temper of
yours; I wonder Jane ever ventures to come near
you. As I was saying, Jane will have a fine time
with youyou're always taking people up before they
are down. I tell you I don't mean the least offence,
and yet you will fly out upon me. But as I was
saying
,
your grandfather is a beggar, without a shilling
to help himself with; your father is a beggar, and
will be as long as continental money lasts; you are a
beggar, and your children's children, to the fourteenth
generation, for aught appears to the contrary, will be
beggars, if you marry without my consent. I'll
disinherit
Jane, by the Lord Harry! Do you hear me,
John?
I do, sir. I have listened with the deepest
attention
,
and, if you wish it, will answer you.
Go onlet me hear some of your school logic, you
blockhead.
This is my answer, colonel. You say you are rich,
and so you are. But by what tenure do you hold
your wealth? Every day and every night, you are
exposed to the inroads of a set of unprincipled
plunderers
,
sparing neither friend or foe. Before to-morrow
morning, your fields may be laid waste, your cattle
driven away, your barns and house set on fire, and
your life, as well as that of your daughter and your
dependants, sacrificed without mercy. If you escape
these midnight ruffians, it rests alone with such men
as my father is, and I intend to be, to save you from
being hanged as a traitor, and your property becoming
the spoil of some recreant tory. Will you boast of
possessions you hold by such a flimsy tenure as this?
Let me tell you, Colonel Hammond, that in times like
these, the man who possesses the hand and the heart
to defend his native land, is of more worth than
hoarded
wealth, rich harvest-fields, herds of defenceless
sheep and cows, or a splendid palace, which he
cannot
defend himself, and must rely on poor beggars,
like me, to protect from violation. Sir, I am a man
and men are worth their weight in gold when an
enemy is lording it over the land, and only brave
hearts and determined hands can expel him. I own
my family is become poor, but we are not beggars,
for we have land, and the power to make it
productive
.
There was so much truth, urged with such a manly
spirit, in this harangue, that the colonel was deeply
affected by the picture thus presented to his
contemplation
.
He fell into a train of brief reflection, at the
end of which, he said with frank good-humour
Well, John, on one condition, I give my consent.
Name it sirshall I eat fire?
Eat a bull-frog, you blockhead, as the Frenchmen
used to do at old Tiat least, so the English saidas
I observed before, John, you have neither money, rank
or reputation, except just among the girls and boys of
the neighbourhood. The husband of the only
daughter
of Colonel Hammond, an old continental officer,
with money in his pocket, and lands at his back, ought
to be somebody. Now, John, you say you are going
to fight for your country, that makes every man a
gentleman. Go and offer yourself to Washington, and
do something to merit an honourable place in history,
and Thunder and Mars! my daughter, my money, my
lands and improvements, shall be yours. What say
you, you puppy?
I say, colonel, your hand to the bargain. If I don't
stake life, limb and libertyheart and soul on this
game, call me not only beggar, but coward, if you will.
Your word and your hand, Colonel Hammond.
Theretake it if you dare. Come to me with the
voice of your country in your favour, and the
approbation
of the great Washington, and by the Lord
Harry
,
if I had a dozen girls, you should marry them all
shouldn't he, Jane?
Not with my consent, father. I would forbid the
bans.
What, hey!you'd have him all to yourself, would
you?
Even so, sir. I shall give all, and expect all in
return.
Quite a reasonable young woman, said the colonel.
But come, John, there is no time to be lost; the
fate of our country hangs by a hair, and she wants
every true heart, every strong arm, to sustain her.
Lose not a day. Life is short, my boy, and the hours
of a soldier are numbered.
Too true, answered Jane; and his will be
briefer
than the common lot, I fear. Father, you have
put him on the track of death, and the tears gushed
from her eyes.
Track of a fiddlestick! Why, girl, I once had six
and thirty muskets pointed at me at once, and they all
missed fire, owing to the dampness of the priming.
They hissed, and fizzled, and funked like fury, but I
escaped as it were by a miracle. If they had all gone
off, you might have converted my skin into a cullender.
Never fear, Janenever fear; a man can't die but
once, and then not before his time comes. Think of
the muffled drumthe funeral march to the tune of
Roslin Castle; the long lines of soldiers, with their
arms reversedtheir eyes bent on the groundthe
minute guns at a distancethe cocked hat and sword
on the coffin, and the six rounds fired over the grave
of the gallant soldier. Thunder and Mars! but it's a
glorious thing to die for our country.
Glorious to him, but death to those that love him,
sighed poor Jane.
Now, John, go and prepare yourself, and don't let
me see that face of yours again till you have fulfilled
your part of the contract, and won the good word of
Washington. I served with him in Braddock's war,
and dare say, he will recollect me. But once more
away, boy, and remember while you are doing your
duty to your country, you are at the same time
winning
your way to the arms of love and beauty. Is'nt
she a jewela rose-budJohn.
To my eye the fairest, to my heart the dearest of
all created beings, sir. But, I must leave you now. I
have an engagement to go out on a sky-larking party
to-night, with some of our lads. We mean to scour
the country as far as Kingsbridge. Perhaps we may
pick up some straggler, or gather some information
that may be useful at head quarters.
Right, John, I wish this timber leg of mine would
let me go with you, as my experience might be useful.
But, John, don't forget that this reasonable young
lady must have all or nothing. None of your
sparking
,
by the wayhey!
Let this be my answer, sir, saying which, he
approached
Jane, and folding her in his arms, gave her
a farewell kiss.
Why, Thunder and Mars! exclaimed the old
continental
;
what do you mean, you puppy? you are
reckoning your chickens before they are hatched.
What! before my facehow dare you presume, sir.
If the young rascal had not done it, I'd have kicked
him. added the colonel, aside.
Despair and hope, are no cowards, sir. One fears
nothing, the other expects every thing. If I return, as
I trust I shall with credit, you will forgive this
freedom
;
if I return no more, let the offences of the dead
rest in the grave. Once more, farewell, my dearest
Jane.
I cannot say what I wish, sobbed Jane. But,
oh! do not forget that in your resolution to gain me,
you may lose yourself.
Not another wordah! that confounded twinge!
I knew I should be the worse for standing in the damp
here. Enough said, you young fools. John, an old
continental gives you his blessing, and here's my hand,
boy, that I will keep my word; see that you keep
yours. Good bye, my lad,and the colonel led his
sorrowing daughter home.
John watched till they were lost in the shadows of
evening, and then burst into an extempore of love and
enthusiasm, as was his custom, from having no one to
talk with the greater portion of his time.
Now, cried he, now my good heart, and good
right hand, be true as steel this once. And you, my
twin darlings, equally dear, liberty and my Jane,
inspire
me. If I halt or falter, or turn my back, may
my country disown, and my mistress desert me!
These, and such like animating thoughts occupied
his mind, as he hastened towards home to fit himself
for the night adventure. His step assumed new
firmness
;
his heart swelled with a bright train of
anticipation
,
and his character at once became strengthened
and exalted by the inspiring influence of a fixed and
noble purpose. He was now a man and a hero.
Returning
to the old stone-house, he quietly procured his
equipments, without disturbing the old couple, who,
with their little handmaid, went to roost with the
fowls, and rose with the sun.
CHAPTER III.
A SKY-LARKING.
The
rendezvous of the sky-larking party, was at a
house standing apart from the post road, in a retired
valley, commonly called Hungry Hollow, and
sometimes
Hard Scramble Hole, a name aptly indicative
of the place and its inhabitants. In almost every
district
of country, and every town, of any considerable
magnitude, there will be found some peculiar spot,
where the idle, the dissipated and the worthless, as it
were instinctively, or by some irresistible sympathy,
congregate together, to prey upon the neighbourhood
and each other. This was the case with Hungry
Hollow
,
into whose sheltering bosom had crept some
dozen families of children of the night, who, as was
said of them, slept while others worked, and worked
while others slept. All day, they might be found
lounging in bed, or sunning themselves in summer,
and in winter crouching in the chimney corner, by a
fire of such decayed wood as they could procure
without
the labour of cutting down trees. But to make up
for thus killing time in the day, report said that they
laboured hard at night, when, like animals of prey, they
sallied forth to the infinite annoyance of the
surrounding
country, committing various petty depredations,
4
hardly aspiring to the dignity of crimes. Whether
they deserved all that was said of them, is doubtful.
But, certain it is, they had a bad name, which is enough
to bring both dog and man into perpetual trouble.
Hungry Hollow, was, moreover, infamous for its
ghosts, goblins, and all the dire array of rural
superstition
,
partly, in all probability, from its situation, and
partly from a disposition in the occupants to discourage
interlopers from coming among them, to spy out the
nakedness of the land. It was a lonely place, and
solitude is the nurse of terror. A ruined church, with
broken windows, decayed doors, without hinges,
weather-beaten sides, and moss-grown roof, stood
nodding
to its fall, in the midst of a few old gray-beard
hemlocks, under whose melancholy shade was the
burial place, designated here and there by a rough
unsculptured stone, most ingenously diverging from
the perpendicular. Not one of these bore letter or
epitaph; for, such was the character of most of those
buried in this unconsecrated spot, that Zoroaster Fisk,
the stone-cutter, could never bring himself to prostitute
his muse to the celebration of their virtues. We
mention this, as a fact honourable to his integrity,
and deserving the imitation of all those whose
vocation
it is to immortalize the dead. A lie on a
tomb-stone
,
is the worst of lies. It endures for a century,
and furnishes perpetual encouragement to rogues,
by affording ocular demonstration that he who has
lived a life of worthlessness and crime, may yet leave
behind him a good name. The grave, and those who
speak in its name, should tell nothing but the honest
truth, or else be silent. The upper extremity of
Hungry
Hollow, that is, the part most distant from the
high road, was especially infested with the airy
creations
of fear and fancy, and avoided by all honest
people. Once in a great while, you might persuade
a couple of strapping country lads, of the strongest
nerves, to venture through it by night, but then you
may be sure they always carried a great piece of
fox-fire, to light them on their way, and, instead of
talking, sung or whistled with all their might, my
name was Captain Kyd, or in Scarlet Town, where
I was born, or some other equally inspiring ditty, to
keep up their courage.
It was indeed a gloomy vale, through which a lazy
brook, of dark brown water, meandered silent and slow.
Shaded with tangled foliage, and bordered beyond by
precipices of mouldering rocks, that seemed to have got
the start of the rest of the world, in the race of swift
decay. A score of awful legends, which we may one
day collect for the edification of this story-loving age,
were about the only product of this barren spot, where
neither squirrel, fox, weazel, or pole-cat, was ever
known to abide. No cricket, it was said, ever chirped
there; no honey-bee ever gathered its tribute from the
coarse, unfragrant flowers; nor did the capricious
butterfly, in all its vagrant excursions, ever tarry a
moment there. At that time, the interior of this
valley
was as little known, as that of New Holland or
Japan.
The house where our sky-larkers were to meet,
being
just at the entrance of Hungry Hollow, was
presumed
to be out of the sphere of diabolical influence.
It was erewhile the abode of one Caseor Cornelius
Boshin, who, some few years before, had decamped,
no one knew whither, with some half a dozen
strapping
night-walkers, leaving only his wife and
youngest
boy in possession of the premises. The widow,
as she called herself, and the son, now full grown,
lived after the manner of their forefathers; young
Case, being religiously brought up to nothing,
according
to country phrase, and his mother still
despising
labour, from the bottom of her heart.
Tradition
has preserved an anecdote, highly
illustrative
of their character. A neighbour, passing one
day, and seeing Mrs. Boshin sitting in all her glory,
sunning herself under an old tottering piazza, shaped
like a cocked hat, cried out, well widow, as usual,
nothing to do, I see. To which she repliedno, the
Lord be praised, we have nothing to eat, and no fire
to cook it with. On another occasion, a strnager had
been driven to take shelter there for the night, and rising
early in the morning, indulged in a ramble about the
house before breakfast. On his return, he took the
liberty of expressing his wonder how people could live
in such a place as Hungry Hollow. Why, replied the
widow, when we have nothing else to live on, we live
upon each otherand when we can't live upon each
other, we live on strangers, like you. To make good
her words, she charged a hundred dollars, continental
money, for his night's lodging and breakfast. Events
hereafter to be detailed, render it proper to state, that
John had once given young Case a most exemplary
drubbing, for affirming that Jane Hammond was no
beauty, and the old continental a tory. Case never
forgave him.
The path which led from Hungry Hollow, towards
the south, passed down a long sloping descent to the
high road, which here ran close to the Hudson. The
retired situation of the house, rendered it a safe place
for the party to arrange their operations, and there was
a high peaked hill close by, which commanded the
country round, a distance of several miles. By the time
it grew dark, a party of some eight or ten, all
belonging
to the neighbourhood, and all well known to
each other, was collected, waiting the arrival of John.
There was Brom Vanderlip, who had once outrun a
party of Yagers, though they were mounted, and he on
foot. There was Barnabas Pudney, of Buttermilk Hill,
who had been a prisoner in the old sugar-house,
Liberty-street
,
now so called, whence he escaped, by
becoming
so thin, through a process, well understood by
old Cunningham, the provost, that as he affirmed, he
had escaped through a rat hole. There was Billy
Sniffen
,
who could find his way, blindfold, as he often
boasted
,
from Peekskill to Kingsbridge. There was Ira
Root, commonly called Bitter Root, from being
somewhat
quick on the trigger. There was a tough gray
headed farmer, whose nickname was Nighthawk, which
originated from a famous exploit performed during a
dark night against a band of Skinners. And lastly,
there was Zoroaster Fisk, A. M., a composer and
cutter of inscriptions, and various affecting devices, with
which the pride or affection of the living loves to
decorate the memorials of the dead. He excelled all
men of his time, in Dutch cherubs, with narrow
foreheads
and chubby cheeks; his weeping willows often
brought tears to the eyes of sentimental explorers of
4*
church yards; and for an urn, or a monumental pillar,
he was reckoned inimitable. It was credibly,
moreover
,
reported by his surviving cotemporaries, that he
composed epitaphs in prose and rhyme, one of which
is still extant in the burial ground of the little church
erected by the ancient family of the Phillipses, and
reads as follows:
Here lies John Williams, here lies he;
Hallelujah, Hallelujee.
We are aware that this has been claimed as the
joint production of the mayor and corporation of some
city, whose name we have forgotten, but there is
positive
evidence that it belongs to our friend, Zoroaster.
But, alas! what now availed his skill in Dutch
cherubs
,
weeping willows, urns and pillars, or monumental
inscriptions! Othello's occupation was gone. At the
time of which we are speaking, people died or were
killed by the red coats, the Yagers, the Tories, the
Skinners and the Cow Boys, but it was lucky if they
found a grave, much less an epitaph.
Others of lesser name and note, completed the party
which had thus volunteered to serve their country
without the prospect of fame or reward. There were
many, very many such men in these times; and it is to
the sentiment by which they were inspired, that all
succeeding generations will be indebted for the
freedom
they enjoy. The armies of the United States
would have little availed in the struggle, had the
yeomanry been disaffected. These rustic adventurers
had neither commander, nor any distinctions of rank
other than personal qualities; each man fought his
own fight, and was his own master on all ordinary
occasions; but in times of great peril, instinct pointed
out a leader, and the master spirit was always found to
be the man. The party was anxiously waiting for John,
whose long interview with the old continental, had
delayed him somewhat beyond the hour appointed.
What can have become of John? at length
exclaimed
Billy Sniffen; he is not commonly always
Jack-come-last.
Why, replied, Barnabas Pudney, who spoke most
particularly through his nose, and with great
deliberation
:
Why, I rather calculate I saw him just about
sundownor it might beyes, I calculate it might be,
if I don't mistake, somewhere thereabouts, more or
lessI wont be quite positive, though, but I believeI
rather calculate it might have been him.
Barnabas, my son, quoth old Nighthawk, with
much gravity, where did you larn to talk? I reckon
it must have been of a snail, for you speak for all the
world as if you were on a snail's gallop. You should
never go for a soldier, for you'd have your head cut off
before you could cry quarter.
Nono, said Brom Vanderlip, his speech came
with a dead march, or a slow-match; I don't know
which. He was seven years old before he could say
mammy.
I'll swear he must have larned of a conch shell,
cried Joe Satchell.
Pooh! rejoined Dick Widgery, he would out-talk
a rifle bullet, if he could only git his words to come out
of his mouth stead of his nose. It's got such a
darnation
way to go round, its a great while a coming.
Barnabas cut short the joke, by offering to wager a
drink, that he could repeat the first lines of the
declaration
of independence in less time than any man in
company
.
The wager was taken, and Barnabas distanced,
the first round, amid a shower of dry jokes.
Accordingly
,
Mrs. or Miss Boshin, as they called herwas
roused from her usual inactivity, to give an account of
the contents of her cellar, which proved to be nothing
but the remains of a barrel of hard cider, a liquor
since become classical. It was first handed to old
Nighthawk, who tasted it, smacked his lips, and
pronounced
it emphatically, man's cider, real red
streak.
Comecome, exclaimed Barnabasno
preaching
over your liquor, daddypass round the mug, will
you? Barnabas took a pull, whereupon his eyes nearly
started out of his head, and the liquor spirted out of
his nostrils incontinently.
Red streak! cried heI swan, a feller might
jist as well try to swallow a sword with two edges
It must be real crab-apple, it bites so. Is this the best
youv'e got, Miss Boshin?
The very bestI bought it of old Squire Day, and
gin him two hundred continental dollars for it. But
the money is not worth much more than half what it
was then, and that's some little comfort for being
cheated.
Consarn continental money, rejoined Barnabas:
Its going down hill like a run-away wagon, and
the farther it goes the faster it runs. I don't believe
Nighthawk could have overtaken it the time he ran
away from the Yagers.
You got ahead of me, for all that, though, replied
the other; and as for Brom Vanderlip, he ran me out
of sight in less than no time.
I'll swear pine blank to that, quoth Bitter Root
I'll bet ten to one on Brom when the Yagers are
behind
,
stead of before. He's jist like your full-blooded
colt, that always wins the race if she can only once
git ahead.
Well, well, replied Brom, see who goes ahead
tonight
.
If I don't put my nose in the enemy's lines
before
the cock crows, you may tell me on't when I'm
dead, that's all.
You'll never get your nose anywhere but where it
is now, right in the middle of your face, only a little
on one side; which joke, though on the whole rather
an indifferent one, turned the tide against Brom, who
was fated to endure a tempest of horse-laughter,
reinforced
by half a dozen curs without, who began
barking
furiously. The merriment of the party ceased in
a moment, for in these times the barking of the
watch-dogs
was too often the signal of plunder, outrage, and
murder. Each man seized his gun, and stood on the
defensive with grim and silent determination, for they
were inured to dangers, and feared nothing but ghosts
and hobgoblins. After a pause of a few moments,
footsteps were heard approaching; the barking of the
dogs gradually lapsed into a growl of doubtful
recognition
,
and the latch was slowly lifted. The door had,
however, been fastened inside, and the attempt was
followed up by a loud, quick knocking with the butt
end of a gun.
Who are you? cried old Nighthawk.
I'll tell you directly, if you don't open the door,
answered a hoarse voice with a foreign accent.
It's the bloody infernal Yagers, whispered old
Nighthawk. Now, my boys, stand to your arms.
Let them break in, if they dare, and I'll be blamed if
we don't give them a grist. All followed his
directions
,
and an anxious pause ensued, during which, the
landlady, who was not unused to such scenes,
occupied
herself very deliberately in hiding a paper of pins,
a few pewter spoons, and other valuables, under a
loose plank of the floor.
The knocking now became louder, and the rough
demand for entrance was repeated more vociferously
in broken English. Whereupon, little Barnabas
Pudney
,
who came originally from down east, and was
what is called a curious cretur, crept slily to a front
window, through a crack in the shutters of which he
saw, by the light of the stars, something which caused
him to burst into a laugh exceedingly sonorous and
exhilarating.
I'm a nigger, cried he, if it an't John.
The whole party within set up a great shout, with
the exception of old Nighthawk, who, on opening the
door, welcomed him as follows:
I'll tell you what, youngster, you'd best take keer
how you play these tricks upon travellers in these
times. A little more of your fun, and you'd have bin
a dead man, laughing on the wrong side of your mouth.
This is no time for playing Yager. Blame me if I
wa'nt going to set old Maple-Sugar on trigger, so he
called his old musket, the stock of which was of
maple
;
you played the Yager pretty well, and had like
to have got a Yager's bitters. It's all wrong, Johnny,
my son.
I know it, replied John, but I wanted to try your
spunk.
Spunk! hasn't it been pretty well tried already?
said the other.
Only hear how the young chicken crows, said
Bitter Root; I'll bet a gallon of Miss Boshin's red
streak, his sneakers are up as high as the top of the
big white-wood-tree before the cock crows to-morrow
morning.
You willwill you? retorted John, and his eye
kindled. But he thought of the necessity of
preserving
good-fellowship, and contented himself with
adding
The
proof of game, is when the gaff sticks
we shall see who cackles first.
The party being now complete, sallied forth about
the hour of ten of a still, starry night, at which time
all the inhabitants of the neighbourhood, except the
watchful wights of Hungry Hollow, had gone to rest.
Their course led them past the old grave-yard of the
decayed church we have noted, and as they drew nigh,
they might be seen to close their ranks and huddle
together
,
each essaying to get on the outer side. I wish
you wouldn't push a fellow so, said Billy Sniffen to
Zoroaster Fisk, in an impatient whisper, as Zoe pushed
him against a rock by the roadside. At any other
time, there would have been some joking at the
expense
of the stone-cutter, but now the scene, and the
impressions to which it gave rise, impressed on all the
silence of superstitious awe. In the dim twilight of
the starry night, they could distinguish the rustic
tomb-stones
,
and rough-hewn slabs of mouldering wood,
which told their errand there without the aid of
epitaphs
,
and the sight cowed the vivacity of the gallant
sky-larkers, who, though they had often looked death
in the face, were sorely afraid of dead men, and
especially
their ghosts.
Wwwat in the name of goody gracious, is
that there? suddenly exclaimed Barnabas Pudney.
Whatwhere? answered half a dozen voices.
There! just there, by the old churchdon't you
see something as white as a sheet, standing, as I
calculate
,
right on the very spot where Sampson Mussey,
who was killed by the Skinners, is intarred? and
thereupon Barnabas blew his nose with a sonorous
twang, in the true conch-shell style, which signal was
answered by a white cow standing right on the spot
where Sampson Mussey was interred. This discovery
drew a laugh upon Barnabas, and was followed by a
dispute about who was most frightened. It served to
raise the spirits of the party, by relieving them from
some exceeding solemn impressions which such scenes
are eminently calculated to inspire, and they gaily
pursued their way towards Kingsbridge, bantering
Barnabas about his ghost.
The night was still as death. No lights burnt in
the desolate, abandoned houses, that here and there
dotted the scene, and the surface of the expanding
river, which here presented all the features of lake
scenery, was as smooth as a glassy mirror reflecting
all the glories of the skies above. No vessel lay at
anchor, or floated lazily along with the tide, on the
surface of the melancholy wave: not a sail whitened
the dead, monotonous scene, and life and all the
business
of life seemed to have reached a pause that
looked like extinction itself. The lofty outlines of
the opposite shore, waned beneath the twinkling
sentinels
of night, but their sides were clothed in deep
obscurity
.
The peaceful Dutchmen were fast asleep,
for they could sleep in peace, since the broad river
interposed
between them and their enemies, who were
carrying their devastations in other directions.
Our sky-larkers passed on briskly, without pausing
to admire the sober, solemn beauties of the scene, for
they had other thoughts in their heads, and other
purposes
in their hearts. Anon they came opposite to
those glorious walls, bordering the western margin of
the river, and presenting an everlasting barrier to its
expansion. At this moment, a bright light shot
athwart the clear expanse of the heavens, and
startled
the night-adventurers, who halted to ascertain
whence it proceeded. They saw the entire firmament
towards the north streaked with sheets of living fire,
that leaped up, and danced among the winking stars,
which seemed to grow pale at their superior brilliancy.
It could not be the lightning, for there was not a cloud
in the sky. It was an awful sight, and the whole
party stood gazing in something more than silent
wonder.
Ever and anon streams and rolling waves of living
light flashed across the starry vault of heaven,
succeeded
by the gambols of what are called the
Merry
Dancers
, flourishing and skirring about in a thousand
fantastic vagaries, and with a speed as swift as thought
or fancy. For a while, the earth shone as if at
noon-day
,
5
or rather beneath the silver radiance of the moon;
but by degrees a rich and ruddy pink, succeeded by a
deep crimson hue, stole over the sky, tinging the
heavens and the earth with a rosy tint, which,
however
rich and beautiful, smote the hearts of all but
John with awful apprehensions. They began to fancy
they could detect, in this fantastic frolic of the spheres,
various forms of terror and dismay flitting about among
the stars; and embodied in their affrighted
imagination
a scene somewhat allied to the state of the
country
,
as well as the dangers by which they were
surrounded
.
They distinguished through the mists of
fearful visions, armies fighting in the air; steeds
encountering
with resistless fury; columns of soldiers,
in red coats, charging like lightning athwart the fiery
heavens; and fancied all the dread array of bloody
war raging among the stars and planets, as though the
host of heaven were engaged in hot contention
disputing
the empire of the upper world.
The Highlands must be on fire! said old
Nighthawk
,
at length recovering his speech.
The sky is in a blaze, muttered Barnabas Pudney.
The world is coming to an end! exclaimed Billy
Sniffen.
It is a token and a warning, rejoined Zoroaster
Fisk, solemnly.
Pooh! said John, it is only the aurora borealis.
The what? cried all at once.
The light in the north.
You may call it what you will, responded
Zoroaster
,
but I say it is a token and a warning.
Pooh! quoth Bitter Root, he begins to smell
Spuyten Duyvel.
I reckon it's a worse devil than that. It's jist for
all the world what granny seen the year before the
war, when the sky all turned to blood, one night, and
armies were seen fighting, helter-skelter, some in red
coats and some in blue.
Which beat, Zoe? asked John, jeeringly.
I tell you it's no laughing matter, Johnny. I seed
no, granny didmore than a hundred thousand men,
cutting and slashing at one another in the sky in a
most awful manner, till it all run with blood. You
could see the smoke of the great guns, and some
people
conceited they could smell gunpowder. After the
battle was over, a voice cried out from the clouds
`War, bloody war!' and then
Did you see all this, yourself?
No, but granny did, for she has often told me so,
and she was as pious a woman as any man's mother,
for that matter. So I'm for going right straight hum
agin, for it stands to reason it's a token and a
warning
.
It's flying in the face of Scripture to go down to
Kingsbridge agin such a sky as that. There! there!
I swearI mean, I swanI'm a nigger if I don't think
I seed some letters there, as plain as on a head-stone.
There's a great W, as long as from here to New
York.
Zoe, did you ever hear of the old cow on Long
Island, that told the woman who was milking her,
we should have war soon?
Yes, granny told me that, too, and how an old hen
laid an egg, with WAR on the shell, in capital
letters three inches long.
It must have been a goose-egg, Zoe, said John.
But come, boys, this is wasting precious time. The
light in the north has no more to do with what we are
about, than the light of the stars. You that are
frightened
,
may run home if you please, but I am for going
on let who will follow.
So saying, he dashed forward in a quick step, and
the whole party, not excepting Zoroaster Fisk,
followed
,
ever and anon looking back over their shoulders
to see how matters were going on in the sky. By
degrees
,
the leaping columns of light grew dimmer and
dimmer; the bloody tints faded away; the sky
assumed
its ethereal hue; and the stars twinkled their
sleepy lustre alone in the heavens, leaving the party
of sky-larkers to pursue their way by their
glimmering
light.
They were now ascending the high hills which
command
a view of both the Hudson and East rivers, and
on arriving at the summit, halted to reconnoitre the
country round, as far as the obscurity of night would
permit.
Look there! another Rory Bolus! exclaimed Billy
Sniffen, pointing to a great light towards the east.
No, no, rejoined old Nighthawk, that's another
guess sort of a light than what we saw just now. It's
a house or barn a-fire, I reckon.
Then the red coats, or the Yagers, or tories, or
some of the rascally Skinners are out to-night, said
John. Now, boys, is the time to do something for
liberty. Let us make for the spot. It is not far off,
and I know the house. It is poor old Ira Tebow's, if
I'm not mistaken. Come, follow on; follow on, boys,
and be still as mice, for ten to one we meet the
rascals
on the way.
I told you something would happen; but
howsomever
,
here goes. I'm for one of you, cried Zoroaster.
They now proceeded forward briskly, and in dead
silence, or only communed in whispers. There was
no occasion for a commander, or word of command;
each was expert in this mode of partisan warfare, and
all were left to their own discretion and experience.
A walk of some half an hour brought them to the
brow of a lesser hill, overlooking the little vale of
Sawmill river, which gave them full view of the light
proceeding from a barn, now nearly consumed to ashes.
The house was beyond the reach of conflagration,
being
at some distance, and was built of red-stone, such
as is found on the western shore of Tappan bay.
They saw a light through the window, paused to
consult
as to their best course of action, and the
conversation
ended in deciding to dispatch one of the party
to reconnoitre the ground. John volunteered his
services
,
and his offer was accepted.
With the cautious silence of a cat, he approached,
and the first objects he descried were six or eight horses
tied to a fence in front of the house, which indicated
the number of visiters within. Having ascertained
that no one was on the watch without, he crept softly
to the window, and peeping in, a scene was disclosed
that set his blood on fire. A party of Yagers were
carousing at a table on the plunder of the peaceable
old man, who, with his gray-haired wife, sat looking
5*
on in the silent acquiescence of despair, while two
grown up daughters were waiting on the plunderers,
now half-drunk with cider. One of them, at length,
on a sudden rose from the table, and seizing the elder
of the girls about the waist, rudely kissed her pallid
cheek, which in an instant reddened with the
indignant
flush of maiden modesty. The old couple groaned,
and John ground his teeth and grasped his sword, as
the girl, outraged by still more unmanly indecorums,
no longer able to repress her feelings, pushed the
ruffian
from her with such good-will, that he fell against
the table, overset it, and extinguished the lights. A
torrent of imprecations, in a foreign tongue, now broke
forth from the insolent intruders; they started up, and
groping about for their swords, threatened murder in
every breath, while the weak voices of the aged
couple
were heard begging for mercy amid the furious
uproar. John could bear it no longer. All thought
of his comrades, himself, or his danger, evaporated in
a moment, in the heat of his rage, and leaping through
the window, in an instant he was cutting and slashing
among the ruffian crew. There was no danger of
hitting a friend, for the occupants of the house would
no doubt flee, and all the rest were fair game. Though
alone, the advantage was on his side, for he was
armed
;
while the Yagers, having laid aside their swords,
were groping about for them in the dark, sputtering
unintelligible imprecations.
The party of sky-larkers, who began to wonder
what had become of John, now distinguished the
uproar
of voices, accompanied by the clashing of swords,
mingled with groans and imprecations, as the invisible
enemy smote one after another the stupified
plunderers
,
now rushed forward to the scene of action. Here
they discovered two of the Yagers just on the point
of mounting their horses, but horse they never
mounted
more. They were cloven down without mercy, for
they deserved none. They warred against the
helplessness
of age, the innocence of youth, the property
of men, the chastity of women, and could claim none
of the courtesies of honourable warfare. This done,
they made their way into the house, where old
Nighthawk
ran plump against John, who was still seeking
his enemies, and made a blow at him which cut a
deep gash in the door-post.
What the dI are you hacking at? exclaimed the
old man, don't you see it's me?
See! How the plague should I? It's as dark as
pitch, and besides, my eyes are filled with blood. But
I think I have done for the rascals, for I could find no
more enemies.
And so you fell foul of a friend? replied the
other
.
But let us get a light and see how the land lies.
Here, Billy Sniffen, run to the barn and bring us a
Yager candle.
Billy returned in a minute or two with a burning
brand, the candles were found, and the whole scene
disclosed to view. On the floor, floating in their
recreant
blood, lay five lusty fellows, in whiskers, three
with their heads split open, and two only disabled with
their wounds. These, Bitter Root insinuated, had
better
be put out of their misery, as he expressed it; but
John claimed them as his prisoners, and insisted their
lives should be spared, though they richly deserved
hanging. It was now proposed to search for the poor
fugitives, who had been driven from their home by the
lawless brutality of these hireling ruffians, and
accordingly
the party dispersed around, calling upon
them in friendly tones, and inviting their return.
They heard with fearful tremblings, but at length
distinguishing
their native tongue in its native accent,
ventured cautiously to obey the summons, and being
told what had happened, expressed their gratitude
in homely phrase, but heartfelt language.
I wish, said John, some one would tie a
handkerchief
over my forehead, for this blood almost blinds
me.
You are wounded!exclaimed the pretty girl,
whose lips had been profaned by the brutal soldier,
and with trembling steps sought her Sunday silk
handkerchief, which, with hasty hands, she bound over
his wound. John was a fine, manly looking fellow,
with deep blue eyes, and dark brown hair curling
about his ears; and the daughter of old Ira Tebow
often in her solitary rambles recalled to mind the
bloody brow, and thankful look of the deliverer of
herself and parents, while her gratitude sometimes
partook of a softer feeling.
After demolishing the remainder of the feast of the
barbarous Cyclops, a consultation took place as to their
future proceedings, and it was unanimously agreed that
it was now too late to procced on their original
destination
,
since a couple of hours would bring the dawn.
They decided, therefore, to bury the dead, mount
their horses, and carry the two wounded caitiffs to the
quarters of Colonel Courtlandt, who commanded the
nearest post, and under whose authority they acted.
Accordingly, their bodies were borne forth in silence,
and buried in one grave, without coffin, shroud, funeral
prayer, or dirge; save that of a screech-owl, which,
attracted by the light of the burning barn, sat on a
neighbouring tree quavering their parting knell. No
memorial marks the spot, for they deserved none
at the hands of those they had come so far to molest;
and there they rested, in common with thousands of
more deserving victims to the hopeless attempt to
subjugate
a nation of freemen.
Their horses and military equipments were
lawful
spoil of war, and divided among the sky-larkers.
A few guineas found in their pockets, were given to
the old man to pay for their supper.
God forever bless you, my son, said old Ira Tebow
to John, at parting. Let us give one hurrah for
liberty
.
I can't fight, but my heart is for the good cause.
And the silent night was startled by a shout that echoed
far and wide, to liberty.
You have paid dear for it to-night, said John, and
I fear have yet much to pay.
Well, may be so, my son. But all will come right
at last. I may not live to see it, but my children, and
their children's children, will reap the harvest of the
seed of fire and blood, sown here this night. So long
as we have God and Washington on our side, none but
cowards will despair of our cause. That our country
is destined to be free and independent, I am as sure
as that I am alive at this moment, and in that belief I
shall die contented. God bless you, my son, may your
good old grandfather and grandmother, whom I know,
escape the wrongs of me and mine.
Each man now mounted one of the good horses of
the conquered foe, and there being one to spare, it was
bestowed on the old man, with strict injunctions to
sell it, as soon as possible, somewhere out of the
neighbourhood
,
least it might be hereafter recognised.
But what shall I do with your handkerchief, when
my wound is done bleeding? said John, to the pretty
daughter, who stood looking out at the window.
Keep it to remember me by, answered she, with
a blush, and a smile of touching sadness. And he did
keep it, in spite of the affected poutings of Jane
Hammond
,
who took, on all occasions, in and out of season,
to criticise both the texture and the pattern.
The party then pursued their way homewards, first
stopping at the quarters of Colonel Courtlandt, where
they delivered up the two prisoners, and gave an
account
of their expedition. After receiving the praises
of the colonel, they separated, each for his proper
destination
.
John lingered behind a few moments, to ask
the brave colonel for a testimonial of his good conduct,
which he gave with all his heart; complimenting him,
at the same time, on his gallantry, and assuring him
of his future friendship. He then spurred on his steed
towards the old stone house, it being yet too early in
the morning to pay his respects to Colonel Hammond.
And thus ended the pleasant sky-larking of the
venturesome
boys of Westchester, who, in old times, were
the theme of more than one rustic ballad, now forgotten.
CHAPTER IV.
A TOUCH AT A PICTURETHE AUTHOR SHOWS HIMSELF A
HUNDRED YEARS BEHIND THE SPIRIT OF THE AGEJOHN
SUSPECTED OF STEALING A HORSESILLY BEHAVIOUR OF
JANETHE OLD CONTINENTAL FLASHES A SPARK OF
MAGNANIMITY
,
BUT IT GOES OUT WITHOUT PRODUCING A FLAME
A LONG WALK, AND A LONG TALK, WHICH IT IS BELIEVED
WILL RESTORE JANE TO THE GOOD GRACES OF THE READER
TOGETHER WITH A VAST DEAL OF OTHER ENTERTAINING
AVD INSTRUCTIVE MATTERS.
If
a heroine is worth anything, she is worth a
description
;
and it just now occurs to us that we have
not as yet intimated even the colour of Jane
Hammond's
eyes, for which omission we beg pardon of that
fair young maiden, and all our readers. After the
departure
of John, she returned home with her father,
filled with sad forebodings. The colonel lighted his
pipe, and, soothed by that unequalled teacher of
philosophy
,
fell into a glorious reverie, in which he
conceived
the abstract idea of a great improvement in
ploughshares. The daughter also fell into a reverie,
but it was not about ploughshares. She sat so
perfectly
still, in such a careless, yet becoming attitude,
that we shall take the opportunity to sketch her
likeness.
Her seat was at the low window of an old fashioned
house, built by the colonel's father, of whom, were we
inclined to make the most of a small capital of
invention
,
we could say enough to tire the patience of any
reasonable reader. We might, moreover, fill up a page
or two with a description of the house, together with
the chairs, tables, chests of drawers, andirons, bedding,
and bedposts; but will spare our readers for the
present
,
promising them faithfully, that if, in the course of
this work, we are hard pushed for something to say,
they shall have such an inventory as would suffice for
an auctioneer's sale. At present, however, there is
metal more attractive before us.
The window where Jane sat, looked out on the
windings
of the little stream through its paradise of green
meadows, in the distance of which might be caught a
glimpse of the old stone house, with its moss covered roof
and rugged chimneys, where now dwelt, in lonely
solitude
,
the aged grandparents of her adventurous lover.
A dark spot in the grey obscurity of evening alone
indicated
its precise position, and fancy supplied the rest.
Her arms were crossed on the window-seat, and being
somewhat raised, discovered a waist fashioned by
nature
beyond all the art of the most expert Parisian
artiste. Above this taper miricle, one might detect,
beneath her folded arms, the swelling graceful outline
of a gently heaving bosom, which insinuated, not
disclosed
,
the hidden snows, and gave rise to dim, yet
glowing visions of things unseen, the secret shrines of
lowly adoration. Her head bent gracefully forward,
and somewhat depressed, indicated something like a
latent enthusiasm, mingled with hope and
apprehension
,
and this attitude brought the silken tresses of her
chestnut hair partly over her forehead and eyes. No
one could ever tell the colour of those eyes; for as the
tints of a summer landscape are perpetually varying in
the shade and sunshine, so did the various emotions of
her heart, and the inspirations of her mind, forever vary
the seeming colour of her eyes. Whether black, or
brown, or gray, remains a question to this day
undecided
,
and those few who remembered her in the days
of her youth, often disputed on the subject, without
ever agreeing. No one was, however, so disputatious
as to question the hue of her long eye-lashes, as
everybody
agreed they looked for all the world like
changeable
silk.
For the rest, her figure was the exact counterpart
of that of the lady the reader most admires, and her
features seemed to have come together by accident.
But it was one of the happiest accidents in the world;
for it produced, somehow or other, a face so irregular,
yet so charming, as to distance the happiest
conceptions
of painting or poetry. Its beauty, or rather its
lovelinessfor she could not be called beautiful
consisted
in that indescribable, inimitable mystery, called
expression, and never failed to attract the sympathies
of all who knew her, from its various parts to the
delightful
whole. The face of Jane was, however,
composed
of legitimate materials; a pair of cherry lips,
inlaid with two rows of polished ivory, whence issued
the balmy breath of spring; a dimpled cheek that
rivalled
the aforesaid cherries; a delicate, lady-like nose
and chin, and a general contour divested of the
slightest
traces of commonplace vulgarity. But I forbear
to say more, lest, peradventure, I should fall in love
6
with the picture I am drawing. Suffice to say, that
her voice, both in speaking and singing, was so soft,
so exquisitely musically melancholy, when serious, so
inspiring, when gay, that when she spoke or sung, no
echoes ever replied, for they all died away in
listening
.
But the less we say of her education and
accomplishments
,
the better, perhaps, for our heroine. She
possessed neither piano, harp, or lute, nor could she
have played honest men to sleep with them, had they
been in her possession. Yet still she possessed the
very soul of harmony, and an ear so nice and delicate,
that an old German musician once said of her, that
had not Apollo got the start of her, she would have
certainly become the goddess of music. Tradition
says, that she used to sing some old Scottish ballads
with such pathos and expression, as often brought iron
tears from the eyes of the old continental, who was
fond of hearing her of a calm summer evening. One
of these, which she used to sing about the time she
believed John was a deserter, has been preserved, and
ran as follows:
Hoot awa frae me, Donald, ye're nae lad for me,
Ye're fause in your tongue, lad, and fause in your ee;
Hoot awa frae me, Donald, gang far o'er the sea,
Ye're fause to your country, and nae true to me.
Gang awa, gang awa, lad, and come nae again,
To part with thee ever, sae sairly does pain,
But to see thee, thou fause one, were ten time more sair
Hoot awa frae me, Donald, and meet me nae mair.
I will think on thee, Donald, as ane dead and gane,
I will weep for thee, Donald, when I'm all alane,
I will pray God to shelter thee, lad, frae all harms,
For ye'll nae mair find shelter in these blighted arms.
Hoot awa frae me, Donald, I'll aye wish ye weel,
And when no one kens me, to pray for ye, kneel;
But though my heart break, lad, ye'll never mair see
The lass who is dying, fause Donald, for thee.
The mother of Jane was a clever, sensible woman,
and the example of a mother is of more consequence
to a daughter, than all the boarding-school discipline
in the world. Jane had also occasionally spent some
time in the city, before it became the head-quarters of
the British army, and her manners, though partaking
of rural simplicity, were not altogether rustic. There
was nothing vulgar about her, but she was not at all
fashionable, nor had she acquired any fashionable
accomplishments
.
But in all that becomes a womana
gentle and reasonable womanin all the little arts
and acquirements that contribute to the happiness of
the domestic fireside, and make women ministering
angels, she was by no means wanting.
Her mind was pure and simple, her understanding
excellent. Nature had done much for her, by
bestowing
,
in great perfection, the faculty of deriving
knowledge
from everything she saw or heard. All wisdom
is not locked up in books. There is wisdom to be
derived
from the works of the Creator; from exhibitions
of human character, the daily routine of human
actions
;
and all that we see in nature or the social state,
contributes to awaken the mind and expand the
intellect
.
Imagination, thought, reflection, and
comparison
,
are all rich sources, from whence is derived the
nurture of the mind; and thus it not unfrequently
happens, that the brightest specimens of genius seem
to leap into life full formed, like Minerva from the
brain of Jove. They are not so, however. They
have studied in the fruitful region of their minds, and,
as certain animals are said to do, grown fat on their
own nutriment. Those who derive their materials
from books, suffer others to think for them; while
those who have no other volume to consult, but that
of nature and experience, generally decide with a
sagacity
which often makes the learned stare, and sets
philosophy to inventing new theories. Our heroine
had been principally educated in this school, and the
result will be best tested by the standard of her
future
conduct.
On arriving at home, John found the old farmer
hard at work in his garden, and now and then pausing
to admire his currant-bushes, which were his choicest
favourites; the young handmaid was milking the cows
to the tune of Barbara Allen; and the old dame
preparing
breakfast, which consisted entirely of the
products
of their own labour. They were all too
patriotic
to drink tea, even if it could have been procured;
and as for coffee and sugar, they had become
traditionary
in the family. Such was the scarcity of the
most ordinary conveniences of life, that, in many
places, thorns were substituted for pins by the women
of the interior country. Had it not been for Mangham,
the pedlar and tinker, who sometimes paid a visit to
this quarter, there would have been no stitching for
lack of needles.
Well, for the landsake! exclaimed the little maid,
as John rode up on his gallant charger, where did
you get that fine horse?
Oh! I found a mare's nest with eight fine colts in
it, and took this one for my share.
You be fiddled, retorted the little maid, I don't
believe a word on't. You've turned Cow Boy, and
been robbing some of the poor people down below.
Ah! John, John! said the old dame, shaking her
head. At the same time, the grandfather coming up,
demanded rather harshly, where he got that animal?
whether he came honestly by him, or had plundered
some poor farmer like himself? and declaring, if such
were the case, he should carry him back if it cost him
his life. This imputation called out the lad, and he
at once vindicated himself by detailing the adventure
of the preceding night, drawing the attention of his
auditors to the gash in his forehead, which caused the
good woman to exclaimThank heaven, it is no
worse! You might just as well have been killed as
not; meaning, that the one was just as likely as the
other.
And so you won the nag in fair fight, John? said
the old man.
Yes, sir; I paid for him with my blood, and that's
better than continental money any day.
Well, go and turn him out in the long meadow;
there is grass up to his eyes.
Not yet, sir; I must first carry a message to the
colonel.
A messageah! I reckon you have made a
mistake
,
John. You mean the colonel's daughter. But
John heard him not; he was cantering away towards
6*
the portly mansion of the old continental. It was
rather
an early hour for a visit, but country people don't
know the extreme impropriety of disturbing young
ladies
in their morning dress.
Jane, who had passed the first part of the night in
thinking, the last, in dreaming, was up betimes in the
morning, looking as fresh and blooming as a rose-bud,
in spite of her anxieties, for she had a clear
conscience
,
and that is a great consolation in all troubles.
She happened, for some mysterious purpose, to be
looking towards a certain old stone house, which was,
indeed, rather a picturesque object in the gray
morning
hour, with its sharp, mossy roof, and the blue smoke
ascending to the skies, from the rugged chimney, and
while thus occupied, saw a horseman ride briskly up
the little knoll, dismount at the door, and, after a brief
parley, disappear within. The distance was too great
to distinguish who it was, in the obscurity of the dawn,
and the sight threw her into a trepidation which caused
her heart to flutter strangely. It could hardly be John,
for he, she knew, had gone forth on foot, and suddenly
the thought shot across her mind that it was some
messenger of ill news either from John or his father.
Gradually, however, as is usual in such cases, all her
apprehensions at length centered on the object nearest
her heart; and in this painful state she remained,
gazing
wistfully in that direction, when suddenly she saw
the stranger come forth, mount his horse, and dash
along the road that ran beside the stream leading to
the residence of the old continental. Her throbbing
heart whispered that something strange had happened,
and she retired from the window into her chamber,
afraid of hearing it too soon. Here, in a few minutes,
she could distinguish the clattering of horses hoofs,
andshe could not help ither curiosity led her to
the window again, where all doubts and fears were
at once dispelled by a discovery which we leave to
the sagacity of the world.
It happened, unluckily for our hero, that at the
precise
moment of his riding up to the house, the old
continental
was in a very bad humour, owing to the
failure
of one of his pet inventions. In going the rounds,
as was his daily custom, he discovered that a valuable
pup, with a pedigree equal to that of a blood-horse, or
a noble lord, standing at the head of the list in the
royal calendar, had been caught in one of his
infallible
mole-traps, whereby one of his legs was so much
injured that the poor animal could scarcely drag
himself
along. The colonel partly consoled himself by
calling the puppy a great blockhead, but his afforded
him only partial relief, and he continued sorely
disturbed
in mind.
Thunder and Mars! what brought you here this
time in the morning? asked he, gruffly, of John.
Didn't I tell you not to show your face here again
till But, hey! Why, blood and fire! what have
you got that rag tied about your pate for? and how
did you come by that fine horse, hey?
How is my dear Jane, sir?
What's that to you, puppy? Get out, you stupid
cur! and here the colonel turned upon the wounded
dog, who was howling most dolorously, and, lifting up
his lame leg, was just on the point of giving him a
benediction, when the poor dumb thing gave him such
a piteous look, that his heart smote him, and he turned
his wrath once more on friend John, exclaiming
I say, what's that to you, sir? and how dare you
call my only daughter your dear Jane? But why
don't you answer me? What is the matter with that
fool's pate of yours, and where did you get that
horse?
I purchased him in fair fight, and at his full value,
sir. He cost me this cut across the forehead.
Whatwhathey! Johnny! Come, dismount,
and tell us all about it; but mind, none of your
bragging
,
you young dog.
John dismounted, accordingly, and entered the house,
expecting to meet Jane; but that discreet damsel still
remained ensconced in her chamber, where, in our
opinion, she heard and saw all that was passing
below
.
Our hero was mortified and disappointed at
finding the room empty. Nay, he ventured to
insinuate
to the colonel, that, as he could not afford to tell
the story twice over, he should await the appearance
of the young lady, who might very naturally feel
some little curiosity. The old continental called him
a conceited puppy, but finally surrendered, yielded to
his desire to hear the adventures of the sky-larkers,
and forthwith commanded the attendance of his
daughter. She came, clad in all the bloom of a
spring morning, adorned in woman's choicest livery
blushes and smiles; she gave her soft hand to John,
and returned his pressure with something, which the
vanity of the youth interpreted into a contraction of
her rosy fingers; something neither passive nor yet
active, but which thrilled his heart, and caused him
to look down on all creation.
There, now, confound your impudence! cried the
colonel; give us a full and true account of your last
night's frolic. Sit down, Jane, where he can't see you,
or the puppy won't know what he is saying.
Jane obeyed, by getting partly behind the open door,
whence she ever and anon looked out, like the sun
from behind a cloud, and as often as this happened,
John forgot what he was saying. As he proceeded,
her feelings became deeply interested; and when he
came to relate the particulars of the midnight contest,
she left her retreat, placed herself close by his side,
clasped his hand, and listened, with dewy eyelids,
while her bosom swelled with deep emotion. When
he had finished, she rose, rapidly quitted the room,
and when a few minutes after, she returned, her eyes
were inflamed with weeping. She brought a cambric
handkerchief, which, we regret to say, was not fringed
with Brussels lace, and gently removing that of the
daughter of Ira Tebow, bound it about his forehead.
It was some time before John could get this
handkerchief
again; and when, at last, he requested its return,
as a keepsake from that poor girl, Jane exclaimed, as
she gave it himLord! what a fuss you make about
an old bandana handkerchief, John!
Is all this true, John? said the colonel, real
matter
of fact, like my exploit at old Ti?
Did I ever tell you a falsehood, colonel?
No, John, I'll say that for you. You are always
impudent enough, to speak out fairly, when you might
sometimes better hold your tongue. I believe every
word you've said; and now, Thunder and Mars! I'll
faith, I've a great mindhemhumhano, not so
cheaply as that, either, quoth the colonel, muttering
to himself.
What were you saying, sir? asked John.
Nothingat least, nothing that concerns you to
hearthat is to say But, John, what did Colonel
Phil say to you when he heard the story?
John handed him the testimonial of that gallant
officer
,
which the colonel read, occasionally exclaiming
at intervals, Good! good! with particular
satisfaction
.
When he had finished, he returned the paper,
and spoke as follows:
Well, Johnbut, Jane, what the deuce are you
doing with papers belonging to other people, hey?
But as I was going to say, John, this is a pretty good
beginning, but it don't come up to old Ti yet, by a
great deal, my boy. However, as I said, it is a pretty
good beginning. Six Yagers killed, two wounded
prisoners, and a fine horse, all at the expense of a cut
over the eye. Dog cheap, Johncheap as dirta
good beginning, certainly, as I said before, but it must
not be the end. Hold your tongue, sir!
I was not speaking, colonel, said John, smiling.
Yesbut you were just opening your mouth to
speak; and you, young madam, don't be looking at
me as if you'd eat me. Young man, and the old
continental
drew himself up with ineffable dignity, this
is a mere flea-bite; such things as these happen every
day in war-time, and are never recorded in history.
You must be in the chronicles, sir. Thunder and
Mars! you must place yourself on a par with me,
before
I give you my daughter, my money, my lands, and
improvements. You must get a timber leg, have one
arm sliced off, or lose an eye, or you must have a few
bullet-holes through you
Oh! father! cried Jane.
Be dumb, madam, and listen to what I am saying.
You must figure in broad daylight, and in sight of
armies; you must win the gratitude of your country;
you must descend to posterity; and, more than all
this, you must receive the approbation of the great
Washington. When you have done this, all I have
shall be yours, and not before, on the honour of an old
continental.
Ah! father! cried Jane, you will never be
satisfied
till you send him to his grave. Last night he
escaped
by miracle. A little more, and that cut would
have been fatal. Johndear John! exclaimed she,
passionately, give me upI am not worth the price
of such a purchase.
No, dearest Jane! The contract is made, and
shall be fulfilled, if heaven spares me life and
opportunity
.
I mean to strive for you and my country, and
if I fall, I shall die for love and liberty!
What a cruel situation is mine! the tears
trickling
down her cheeks. I can only look for happiness
through the perpetual risk of losing it forever. But
I will not discourage you with my fears. The women,
like the men of my country are ready to sacrifice
everything to its freedom.
There spoke the daughter of an old continental,
cried the colonel. Kiss me, my girland you too,
John, talk like a brave fellow. Thunder and Mars!
I've a great mind to put an end to all this. But no
not yetnot yet. But I tell you whatyou may go
and take a walk together, if you will promise not to
runaway. I give you an hour to say all you have to
say, while I go and visit that infernal mole-trap, and
mend this ridiculous puppy's leg, who makes more
rout, by half, than if he'd lost his head. Away with
youremember, only one hour.
The walk lasted more than an hour. They rambled
under the stately elms, and plane trees, that
overshadowed
the clear murmuring stream, and now began to
exhibit the many coloured tints of autumn. The
maples
and sumach, already displayed their scarlet foliage,
most beautiful in decay; the hardy brood of autum
nal flowers were on the wane, and the blue-birds, the
meadow-larks, and the robins, were collecting in flocks,
preparing for the sunny regions of the south. There
was a sober, calm serenity, almost bordering on
melancholy
,
in the aspect of the earth and skies; a
soothing
gentleness in the murmurs of the stream, and the
soft whisperings of the dying leaves, which ever and
anon, smitten by the frost, fell in spiral eddies to the
ground, or dropt into the brook, apt emblems of some
dear and well remembered companion, on his way to
the home of all the living, the region of eternal
suffering
or eternal rest.
Every object around them was calculated to awaken
and foster the purest and tenderest emotions of the
heart, and the impression that their parting now, might
be to meet no more, imparted a deep solemnity to the
feelings by which they were inspired. Love,
engrossing
,
overpowering love, filled all their hearts
prompting
a thousand innocent endearments, such as at a
time like this, may be claimed without assurance, and
granted without indelicacy. The silent solitudes of
nature are not the promoters of the guilty passions; it
is where the human race herd together in crowds, amid
all those luxurious seductions, appealing to the senses
and the imagination, through every avenue of the heart,
that the passions become epidemical, spreading like
contagion from one to another, until the entire mass
becomes diseased and corrupted. There is no
incitement
to sensuality in the charms of nature; no
seduction
in her music; no mischief in her smiles; no
luxurious
facination in the rich bounties she pours out
with such a lavish hand; and they who would secure
to themselves the cheapest, the purest, and the most
enduring source of innocent enjoyment, should cherish
in their inmost heart a feeling of admiration for that
stupendous and beautiful fabric, which more than any
other work of his hand, displays the wisdom, the
goodness
,
and the omnipotence of the great Architect of the
universe.
At length, after rambling a considerable way, their
tongues often silent, but their eyes and hearts
discoursing
in the silent language of mutual love, Jane asked
with a hesitation exquisitely feminine, is it not time
to return?
Not yet, dearest. Remember it may be long before
we meet again. I do not wish to work on your
apprehensions
,
or alarm your tenderness, in order to tempt
you to exceed your father's permission. But when I
go away now, it is with a determination to be absent
a long while. I will not deceive you, dearest Jane.
7
I am going to offer my services to Washington; to
fight by the side of my father, and if necessary, to die
with him in defence of my country. It is only in this
way I can make myself worthy of your heart and
hand.
I was going to entreat you to stay with us, but I
will not. No, dear John! whatever I may suffer, or
whatever may happen to youyou
shall
go. It must
never be said of an American woman, that there lived
one who loved herself so well, that she forgot her
country in times like these. At least, it shall never
be said of me. Are not the peaceful farmers and
their sons fighting for liberty, almost without clothing,
or food, or shelter of any kind, and with nothing to
sustain them but the love of freedom, their confidence
in a good cause, and in the wisdom and virtue of
Washington? and shall their mothers, wives, and
daughters, be wanting to their glorious duty? No,
John! no, deardearest John! Gofight and die, if
more martyrs are required. You may fall, and be
buried no one will know where, without any to tell
of your courage and devotionwithout any memorial
to mark the spot where a nameless man died for his
country. But you will live in my heart while I live;
and, whatever sorrows may fall to my lot, will be
soothed by the pride of having been dear to the heart
of one who loved his country better than his mistress.
Goand may heaven protect you!
The effort was too much for the gentleness of
woman
,
and at the conclusion of this heart-stirring
appeal
,
her whole spirit dissolved in tenderness. She
cast herself on his bosom, sobbed with convulsive
heavings, and looking him in the face, with a mixture
of contending emotions, she exclaimed, Goserve
your countryher claim is greater than mine!
They walked rapidly towards home, without
exchanging
another word. John took leave of the old
continental, mounted his horse, and their farewell
was conveyed in a silent look which was never
forgotten
.
CHAPTER V.
I see nothing before us but accumulating distress. We have
been half our time without provisions, and are likely to continue so.
We have no magazines, nor money to form them. We have lived
upon expedients till we can live no longer.
Washington's Letter
to a Friend
.
The
dark days of the infant republic of America
had now come. The enemy, everywhere victorious,
had overrun, though he could not subdue, a large
portion
of the land, and lorded it over some of our
capitals
.
The paper currency, that last and most fatal of
all the expedients of despair, was fast depreciating
into a mere nominal value; the resources of the
country were either exhausted, or could not be
procured
for such a worthless equivalent; the little
waning army, suffering under the privation of almost
every necessary of life, and every means of warfare,
was struggling without hope, and the cradle of the
infant Liberty seemed on the eve of becoming its
grave.
But amid all these discouragements and disasters,
the great mass of the people, the sturdy yeomanry of
the country, remained true to the cause of
independence
;
and the destitute soldiers, though raw and
undisciplined
in the main, continued to display a spirit
of hardy endurance, of unconquerable patience, of
manly submission, never on any occasion exhibited by
standing armies of hirelings. So little did their rulers
doubt the patriotism of the people, that when the
parliament
of England sent commissioners to the United
States with offers of forgiveness at the mere price of
returning to their allegiance, Congress directed the
terms to be published throughout the land, that every
man might see and judge for himself. This
confidence
was not misplaced. The people scorned to
accept
of pardon, for what they considered no crime;
and the attempt to subdue them by an amnesty for the
past, only animated their greater exertions in the
future
.
Both men and women, with few exceptions,
remained
true to the cause, and resolved to drain the
cup of suffering to the dregs, rather than turn aside
the draught by abject submission. They never
despaired
,
even in the gloomiest times; but, with a
generous
confidence in an oft defeated leader, resolved to
dare all, suffer all, rather than lose the glorious prize
for which they had already paid so dearly. It was
this noble confidence, this invincible ardour, this
unconquerable
perseverance, which, aided by the
blessing
of heaven, and heaven's best gift, a Washington,
at length baffled the efforts of one of the most
powerful
nations of the earth, and gave liberty to a new
world.
The little army of Washington, after performing
wonders in New Jersey, and winning laurels in the
depths of the snows, with bare, bleeding feet, and
half-naked bodies, was now in winter-quarters at the
Highlands of the Hudson, secure, for a brief period,
7*
from the efforts of a far superior enemy. They were,
in a great measure, destitute of tents; and if this had
not been the case, the rough, inclement winter of
these northern regions would have rendered these an
inadequate defence against the driving snows and
boisterous winds, that drifted and howled along the
narrow valley, through which the majestic river
pursues
its way to the Atlantic.
Bidding farewell to home, as he believed for a long
while, and receiving divers cautions to take care of
himself from the old folks, John had, the morning
after parting with Jane, pursued his way to the
quarters of General Alexander McDougal, one of the
earliest and worthiest patriots of New York, with
whom his family had been acquainted during their
residence
in the city, and in whose brigade his father
served as a captain of dragoons. The general was
of Scottish descent, of a cool determined character,
and undoubted courage. Like Napoleon, he was an
egregious snuff-taker, and to save the trouble of
opening
a box, or, because no box of reasonable
dimensions
would contain his daily supply, usually carried
his snuff in his waistcoat pocket, as we have often
heard from one of his old companions in arms. From
the same authority, we learn that the general's ruffles
and buff-jerkin, generally exhibited a plentiful
sprinkling
of his favourite debauch. Our adventurer first
sought his father, and the meeting was affectionately
solemn. But after the parent had welcomed his son,
he began a long lecture on the impropriety of leaving
home, where his presence was required for the
protection
of the old people, and the cultivation of the
farm.
Besides, added the captain, you would have seen
me soon without coming here. I was about asking
leave for a few days, as early as next weekhowever,
John, I should not find fault with you for taking all
this trouble to see me. So give me your hand, you
are heartily welcome.
But, sir, replied John, I did not come to see you:
that is, I did not come on purpose.
No? what then brought you here?
I came to fight for my country, sir!
You? why, you're but a boya chicken, what will
you do amongst our old cocks?
Crow, and fight like the rest, father.
Pooh, John! go home and take care of the farm,
and the old people. I'm sure you've run away
without
permission.
No, on my word, sir, they consented.
What! mother too?
Yes sir. She opposed it at first, but at last said
to me, well go, John, fight for your country, and take
care of your father.
Did she, the dear old soul? exclaimed the captain,
drawing his hand across his brow; but why should I
doubt it, when I have seen so many of our women
with the hearts of men in their bosoms? John, you
can hardly remember your mother, you were so young
when you lost her. Though brought up tenderly in a
quiet city, I verily believe she never knew what it
was to fear for herself. I have seen her twice in
situations
that made old soldiers turn pale, without a
change in her countenance. If you ever turn coward,
John, you will disgrace both your parents. But you
are too young for a soldier of freedom. Can you live
without eating; sleep without covering; fight without
shirt to your back, or shoe to your foot; without pay,
and without the hope of victory? If you cannot, you'd
better go home. Look at
me
, John.
John ran his eye over the poor soldier of freedom,
and though he had been absent little more than a year,
was struck with the change in his face and person.
He had grown very thin; his brow was seamed with
deep furrows; his hair, which was only a little
grizzly
when he left home, was now almost white, and a
deep scar on his cheek, gave token of his having been
within arm's reach of an enemy. Cap he had none,
but its place was supplied by a coarse wool hat, of a
grim, weather beaten hue, ornamented with a little
faded plume, now of a most questionable colour. His
epaulette was of the tint of rusty copper; his
garments
not only worn threadbare, but rent in more than
one place; he wore a common leather stock, and his
clumsy cowhide boots, the soles of which were
gradually
departing from each other, were innocent of oil
or blacking. His sword was cased in a scabbard of
cartridge paper, made by his own hands, and his
entire
appearance presented no bad emblem of the
fortunes
of his country.
Well, John, what do you think of me?
John made no answer. His heart was too full for
words, but he thought to himself, Such is ever the
price of liberty!
But don't be discouraged, boy. Though I seem
rather the worse for wear, I have plenty of money.
Look here and the captain drew from his pocket
a handful of paper money, with a smile that partook
of bitter irony. See how rich I am, if I could only
persuade people to take these rags for money. I
offered
Mangham, the pedlaryou know him, I believe,
a wary rascala hundred dollars for a pair of
stockings
,
a luxury I have not enjoyed for some time, but
the fellow answered, `No, captain, if I want to be
charitable, I give things away; but when I trade, I
expect something of equal value for my goods.' He
offered to give me a pair for old acquaintance sake,
but I could not bring myself to that. So you see me
barefoot, with a pocketful of money.
If I were in your place, sir, I would resign and go
home. Let
me
take your place, while you get a little
rest and clothe yourself. I can't bear to see you look
like a beggar.
No, my son, replied the captain, with a firm
determination
,
unalloyed by a single spark of
enthusiasm
,
no, John; when I first put on this old rusty
sword, I swore never to lay it down till my country
was free, or all hope of freedom was at an end. I
mean, if God spares my life, to keep my oath, let what
else may happen. If my country cannot give me
shoes, I will fight barefoot; if she cannot afford me a
hat, I will fight bareheaded; and if she can't pay me
for my services in money, I will live in the hope of
being repaid hereafter by her gratitude. I know she
gives us the best she has to givethat she shares in
our sufferingsand may God forsake me, when I
desert
her!
Such were the men who bore the country on their
shoulders, through peril, doubt, and despair: such the
unknown, nameless heroes, who live only in the
blessings
they bestowed on posterity. And here lies the
mystery which has puzzled the world, namely, the
achievement of independence in the face of
apparently
insuperable obstacles, presenting themselves at
every step and every moment, which cannot be
explained
but by the virtuous firmness, the unwavering
patriotism, not more of the high than of the low; not
more of those whose names will forever remain
objects
of national gratitude, than of those whose names
were never remembered. The soul that animated and
inspired the revolution, spoke from the lips of this
nameless soldier.
A somewhat animated discussion took place between
father and son, on the subject of the latter
volunteering
his services in the cause of his country.
You'll be half-starved, John.
I can bear what thousands suffer here.
You'll be half-naked.
So are they, sir.
You'll be ragged and dirty.
So are you, sir, said John, rather irreverently.
You'll never be able to go through with it.
Why not, as well as my father?
You never smelt powder, or drew blood in the
course of your life. You could never find in your
heart to cut a man down, even to save your own life.
Couldn't I? quoth Johnand he drew from his
pocket the testimonial of Colonel Courtlandt, giving
the particulars of the affair at old Ira Tebow's. The
father read it with a feeling of conscious pride, and
clapped his hand approvingly on his shoulder.
John, cried he, after hesitating a few moments,
you were born for a soldier of freedom. Come along,
and, like the old patriarch, I will offer up my only son
to God and my country.
Accordingly, they proceeded to the quarters of
General
McDougal, to wit, a hut of rough stone walls,
covered with moss-grown shingles, and containing a
single apartment, destitute of the most ordinary
accommodations
.
They found the rusty old soldier in a
weather-beaten suit of regimentals, solacing himself
with his favourite luxury, which he administered with
his thumb and two fingers.
Well, captain, what news?
Nothing, general, except that the tories are up in
Monmouth county.
Ah! so I hear; and the general took a pinch
extraordinary
.
General, said the captain, I have brought you a
young lad, who wishes to share the pleasures of a
soldier's
life. I have just been giving him some account
of them, and he has fallen in love with the
profession
.
Ayeand how old may he be, captain?
Between eighteen and nineteen, sir.
Too youngtoo young, captain, by a great deal.
He'll be on the sick list, the first campaign, and be
sick of the service besides. Young man, can you live
upon nothing, and sleep on the ground of a frosty
night, without any blanket but the sky?
I don't know, sir, till I try.
Eh?well, that is a more sensible answer than I
expected. But do you think you can manage to go
half the time without a shirt to your back, or shoe to
your foot, in short, without meat, drink, clothing, or
lodgingserve without any other pay than what will
not pay for anything, fight without the prospect of
victory
,
and look a red coat in the face without turning
your back?
General, I can only answer for one thinga heart,
and I hope an arm, to serve my country. I have other
motives than patriotism, which I will not trouble you
with. Allow me to say, I believe I can look any man
in the face, when I have done nothing that makes me
ashamed of myself.
The general thrust his hand into his
waistcoat-pocket
,
and regaling himself with a pinch, half of
which, as usual, he spilled on his ruffles and
buff-jerkin
,
ran his eye over the young candidate.
Faith and troth, young man, you're a likely lad,
and promise fair. God knows we want men, and
must take boys when we can get them. Do you
come of a good whig stock, for hang me, if I don't
believe whig and tory run in the blood, just like game
in fighting-cocks.
This is my father, sir.
Ho! ho!what, captain, have
you
brought him
here?
He is my only son, general, but I did not bring
him here. He came from home by himself, of his
own accord, and I confess, I did all I could to make
him go back again. But nothing would do, and here
he is at your disposal.
Well, if he is your chicken, he comes of the right
breed. Lad, would you like to serve on horseback, or
on foot? But for the matter of that, there are not
half enough horses to mount the dragoons already
enlisted
,
captain.
I have brought a horse with me, general, said
John.
Faith, you are a provident lad, and you and your
horse shall be welcome. You wish to serve as a
volunteer
,
I believe?
If you please, general, under my father.
WhatI suppose you would like to go home when
you get tired?
No, sir. I wish to enter as a volunteer, because
there is some little merit in serving my country
without
being obliged to do it.
Well, lad, I like that answer, and shall probably
have occasion for the services of one who acts from
such motives. Can you read, write, and cipher, upon
occasion? I ask, because in these times
schoolmasters
are as scarce as guineas.
He is something of a scholar, general, replied the
captain, and was educated in New York, under old
Macdonald, till the age of fourteen.
Macdonald, hey? then I am perfectly satisfied.
He has had learning instilled into him with the oil of
birch. How many times did he flog you, lad?
I don't know exactly, general. I kept count till
fifty, and then lost my reckoning.
The general now dismissed John, with instructions
to join his father's company of dragoons, and be sure
to return upon the red coats the flogging he had
received
8
from master Macdonald. The father and son
then took their way to quarters.
The young volunteer forthwith entered on his career
with an ardour and enthusiasm inspired by patriotism
and love. He had two mistresses, his country and
Jane, who, so far from dividing, concentrated his heart
on one and the same object. His father placed him
under an old subaltern of his company, to be drilled,
and being already an expert rider, he, in a very short
period, became equally distinguished for the steadiness
and precision of his movements, as well as skill in the
management of his weapons. In short, he practiced
unweariedly, in order to accomplish himself in all the
arduous duties of a soldier, and disciplined both mind
and body to meet all the exigencies of those times
which tried the souls of men, and the firmness of
women.
The American forces being on one occasion drawn
out for review on the plain between the foot of the
mountains and the river, John had, for the first time,
a full opportunity of contemplating the man, who, by
his virtues and services, has deserved the highest of
all titles, that of father of his country. As he rode
along with that graceful dignity for which he was so
eminently distinguished, John gazed at him till he
almost
forgot his soldierly duties; while all that the
great and good man had done, and was still doing for
his country rushed on his mind. He contemplated
him with affectionate reverence, unlimited confidence,
and profound gratitude; and, in the delirium of his soul,
wished to heaven, that like him, though at humble
distance, he might some day be able to do or suffer
what might entitle him to the gratitude of his country,
and the remembrance of posterity. He felt, what
thousands every day experienced, in the presence of
Washington, while they all but despaired everywhere
else, a degree of confidence in the good cause which
inspired him with hope, and animated him to exertion.
Men, clothed in rags, suffering hunger and cold, and
dispirited by a long succession of disasterous fortunes,
awakened from the depths of despondency, and gazed
on the blameless hero with reviving hope of the
future
.
Such is the unflinching reliance of mankind on
that virtue which has been long tried and never failed.
For more than four years had the country been
overrun in various directions by an unscrupulous
enemy
,
who stigmatized as rebels a whole nation that
had risen in defence of its rights; and who, instead of
looking on the Americans as fellow-countrymen,
manfully
struggling in behalf of every subject of England,
viewed them as turbulent mutineers, rising against
their lawful commander, and treated them as without
claim to the courtesies of civilized warfare. More
than four years had the country bled at every pore,
and bled almost without the hope its blood would not
be shed in vain. During this long period of suffering,
seldom were the soldiers of freedom, or the people
struggling to be free, cheered forward by success, or
animated by victory; and, while every day paying the
price of liberty, the boon seemed only every day
receding
farther and farther from their grasp. Yet,
during this trying period, both leaders and people,
soldiers
and citizens, rejected with unconquerable
decision
,
and wonderful unanimity, every offer of peace
without independence. They refused pardon for the
past, although almost without hope of the future;
they rested with a generous reliance on a leader whose
destiny it was to be ever on the defensive without the
means of defence; and, amid all their sufferings,
disappointments
,
disasters and defeats, clung, with all
the ardour of devoted faith, to their virtuous,
courageous
,
indefatigable leader. Even despondency could
not weaken their reliance, and when a victorious
general
was presented as a successor to Washington,
fleeing
before a superior enemy, they decided with one
heart, one voice, that they would have no other leader.
Never did people display a more noble confidence, and
never was such confidence more richly repaid.
CHAPTER VI.
WINTER-QUARTERS IN THE HIGHLANDSCHEAP MONEY
TRAITORS
IN THE CAMPA NIGHT-SCENE, WHICH ENDS IN OUR
HERO BEING ARRESTED, TRIED, CONDEMNED, AND SHOT
DIFFERENCE BETWEEN SWEARING AWAY A MAN'S LIFE, AND
SHOOTING HIM OUTRIGHT.
The
trials of Washington and his little army, were
not alone confined to resisting a superior foreign
enemy
.
His cares never slept, and their sufferings never
ceased. Two-thirds of the year they had to cope
with a force, from which to escape was a triumph;
and during the remainder, they had to wrestle with
foes still more difficult to resist. Hunger, cold,
nakedness
,
and all their sad consequences, assailed them
from day to day. The wicked never ceased to trouble
them, and the weary were never at rest. While in
winter-quarters, Washington was incessantly
employed
in advising, exhorting, and stimulating
Congress
and the states, to more vigorous exertions:
devising and recommending new plans of defence
or conquest, and using every effort of argument
and persuasion, to infuse into their hearts a portion of
his own unconquerable energy. It were too much to
assert, that Washington alone saved his country; but
8*
it may be said with truth, that without him, it would
not have been saved.
During the winter of which we are speaking, the
sufferings of the army were more than usually severe,
owing to the want of many comforts essential during
a hard winter among the mountains of the north.
They had borne all patiently, at Valley Forge and
elsewhere; but there is a limit to human patience, as
well as endurance, and the jests, with which they
occasionally
strove to keep up their spirits, at length
began to give place to effusions of bitter spleen, or
murmurs of deep dissatisfaction. The rapid
depreciation
of continental money, as it was called, bore
heavily on the soldiers; for such was its daily, nay,
hourly decrease in value, that ere they could exchange
it for necessaries or indulgences, it had fallen still
lower. It was like a wagon trundling down hill, the
nearer it got to the bottom, the faster it went. The
soldiers, at length, would light their pipes with it in
disdain. As they sat idle in their huts of evenings,
they would talk of home, and contrast their situation
with that of former times, when their labours were
light, their food wholesome, and their nights refreshed
by undisturbed repose. In short, some of them began
to form little cabals, one of which was incited, as well
as led, by the old corporal who had drilled John, and
who was a foreigner.
Pay-day came round, and there was nothing to pay
with but continental money, the depreciation of which,
no increased quantity could keep pace with. One
bitter night, a party of some half dozen were
gathered
together in one of the huts. They had just
received
a few thousand dollars, that scarce sufficed to
purchase a small pittance of tobacco and other
homely
luxuries, which the old corporal had invited John
to come and share with them. He had complied,
though he neither smoked nor drank, being willing to
be on good terms with his fellow-soldiers, who, in
truth, had no special kind feelings towards him as a
volunteer.
It was now the dead of winter, savage, gloomy, and
severe. The mountains were bare of foliage, save
that of the melancholy evergreen, which, when the
earth is covered with snow, only increases the
desolation
of nature by its black hues. The grim, gray
rocks, contrasted with savage grandeur the white
winding-sheet, which was thrown as a pall over the
inanimate corpse of nature. The river was bound in
thick-ribbed chains of ice, and the northeast wind swept
along through the openings of the high hills, howling
mournfully a requiem over the grave of the year.
The only comfort within reach of the poor soldiers,
was plenty of fuel growing at their very doors; and
the party, consisting, besides John, of Corporal
Crawley
,
Aaron Cronk, Pilgrim Pugsley, Hachaliah,
commonly
Hack Foster, and Case Boshin, the younger,
were now gathered about a roaring fire, which would
have been much more agreeable, had not the wind
dashed down from the mountain-tops into the
chimney
,
occasionally enveloping them in a mystification
of smoke that brought tears to their eyes.
Boys, said the corporal, I've got a treat for you
to-night. I bought a jug of spirits, some pipes, and
three papers of tobacco, to-day, at Peekskill. What
do you think they cost me?
More than you're worth, I reckon, said Case
Boshin.
Eight hundred dollars. It swept my pocket from
top to bottom, clear as a whistle. I'm a ruined man;
but come let's enjoy ourselves while they last. Who's
got a piece of something to light my pipe with, for I
see our wooden tongs is on the invalid list.
Case, hereupon pulled out a continental bill, and
twisting it between his fingers, handed it to the
corporal
,
who very coolly lighted his pipe with it. The
jug was then uncorked, and the party, with the
exception
of John, proceeded to make large libations.
It's a pretty use for money, at length observed
the corporal, to be lighting one's pipe with it.
Yes, replied Case, and it's a pretty service this,
we've got into; all summer running away from the
red coats, and all winter roosting like crows here in
the mountains, half clothed, and a little more than
half-starved. For my part, my time is out in the
course of next spring, and if I don't make tracks home
on a hand-gallop, you may call me a horse, and ride
me bare-backed, if you like.
Ah! you're a lucky fellow, Case, said Hack
Foster
,
I've got more than a year yet to serve, the dI
take me for listing so long, I say. Liberty is a fine
thing, but like gold, it may be bought too dear, I reckon.
They now began to compare notes, and the result
was by no means satisfactory, most of them having a
considerable time to serve. In the meanwhile, the jug
went round briskly, and by degrees they began to be
somewhat flustered with the mischievous inspiration.
The corporal talked big, as the phrase is, and
threatened
a mutiny; while the others swore they would go
home in spite of all the articles of war, and the
conversation
became equally dangerous to the listeners
as to the speakers. John, who had been absent on a
visit to a certain lady, in other words, thinking of the
last parting, when Jane cast herself on his bosom, and
bade him go and serve his country, was at length
roused to a cognizance of what was passing, just as
Hack was swearing he would give them leg bail
before
long.
You willwill you? cried he, coming forward.
you'll desert in spite of the articles of war? You
had better try it, if you want to be shot before the
whole army, and branded as traitors to your country.
Booh! cried the old corporal, puffing out a cloud
of smokeyou're a gentleman volunteer, John. You
can go when you please, and come when you like,
whenever you want to see your mammy. But you'd
better be quiet and mind your own business. We
listed for pay and rations, and as we get neither one
or the other, I say the bargain is broke, and we have
a right to do as we please with ourselves.
To be sure, echoed Hack Foster, to be sure we
did. It stands to reason, if one party breaks an
agreement
,
the other has a right to break it too, and for
that matter, it's broke already. Supposin, now, I
make a bargain with the corporal for a jug of
sperrits
,
and the jug turns out to be empty, do you think
I'm obliged to pay him for it? Not I; I'm exex
exI can't get out that consarned word; but I know
I'm clear as a whistle off the bargain.
That's law, quoth Pilgrim Pugsley, 'cause I was
onsuited once on a trial afore Justice Day on that
very account. It's jist as much as to say, every
man must do as he would be done by; and so, if
anybody
cheats me, I have a good right to cheat him, I
guess.
As clear as preaching, rejoined the corporal, and
so, my boys, as we get no pay but continental money,
that is, no money at all, we have an incombustible
right to curse and quit just when we like, in spite of
all you can say, mister gentleman volunteer.
A pretty conclusion, really, replied the other,
and so you only fight for pay and rations. You have
no heart for the cause or the country. As for you,
corporal, you have no country, at least, none you
choose to fight for; for my own countrymen here, I
should think they would be ashamed to desert a cause
which is that of all mankind.
Pooh! mister gentleman volunteer, what's liberty
without food, pay, or clothing? You may talk as you
please, but dn my old shoes, if a man can live upon
liberty. Here's to you boys, take one more pull, and
then the jug will be as empty as my pocket.
The last drop causes the cup to overflow, and this
last appeal to the jug, brought the party, our hero
excepted
,
who had declined to partake in the debauch,
to the very confines of rational self-possession; for,
being
the last, each one had taken his full share. They
became noisy, and riotous; blurted out disaffection,
mutiny, and treason, and were proceeding to organize,
as well as their disordered brains would permit, a
system
of proceeding of the most aggravated and
dangerous
nature. They swaggered, swore and
blustered
,
in tones so loud and boisterous, that they might
have been overheard by their neighbours in the
adjacent
huts, had not the uproar of the scene without,
confounded that within. A violent snow-storm had
commenced; the wind shrieked and moaned among
the bare branches of the trees, the snow beat through
the chinks of the door and windows, almost covering
the earthen floor, and gradually extinguishing the fire,
which was fast expiring. John had vainly attempted
to stay the irritated, intoxicated soldiers; but every
attempt only brought on him new taunts and
reproaches
,
until, at length, losing all patience, he leapt in the
midst of them, and cried out in a loud, firm voice:
Soldiers! do you know what you are saying?
Do you know it is my bounden duty to report every
word of it, and that I will do it, as sure as you live,
unless you promise to give up this rascally plot of
yours? Shame on such cowards, I say, that serve
their country as a dog follows his master, because he
gives him a bone!
What! you'll betray usyou'll turn spy and
telltale
,
will you, you chicken-hearted puppy? I never
knew a fellow that refused to drink with his
companions
,
but would betray them the first chance that came.
But we'll soon stop your wind-pipe for you, if you don't
swear pine blank never to say a word about what
you've just seen and heared. Tell tales of your
messmates
a
pretty fellow! come, give us your 'davy that
you won't 'peach to-morrow, replied the old corporal.
Not unless you will all swear to abandon your
project, and never allow your tongues such liberty
again. If not, I'll have you all up to-morrow, as sure
as I stand here.
You've made up your mind to blab, then, cried
the other, rising, and staggering towards the corner
where their arms were deposited. I'll tell you what
damme what was I saying? before you shall bring us
to the bull-ringwewill lay you as flat as a
flounder
where
youyou shall never get up again
except
exat
the sound of the last trumpet. Swear
I say mister gentleman volunteer, or you're as good
as ten dead men. Hip, boys! every man to his arms
lay hold of the spying rascal, we'll carry him to the
rock just by, push him off, and nobody will be the
wiser for it to-morrowhe'll be snowed under before
that timelay hold, and gag him!
The whole party obeyed the order, and were about
to seize their weapons in the corner, when John,
placing
himself on guard over that important position,
brandished his sword, exclaiming:
The first that approaches is a dead man! mind, I
don't wish to hurt you, for you don't know what you
are doing, and I'd as soon eat carrion, as fight with
such staggering bullies. Stand off, I say, I'll not use
my sword against you, but if you come within reach
of my fist, I'll strike fire out of your eyes, brighter
than they ever flashed before.
This threat, joined to the menacing attitude of the
young volunteer, brought the others to a momentary
pause. But it is the instinct of drunkenness to thrust
its head into the fire; and, accordingly, with threats
and bitter imprecations, the whole party staggered
forward, pell-mell, the consequence of which was,
that one by one they were laid sprawling on the
ground, leaving John unhurt, and master of the field.
A dead silence now prevailed for a moment, except
that the wind howled, the door shook, and the chimney
roared like distant thunder. Presently, however,
voices were heard without, and a push was made at
the door, which opened to a patrol, that entered
without
ceremony. They were going the rounds, and had
been attracted to the spot by the confused hum of
voices, all at once succeeded by death-like silence.
John was seen standing guard over the arms, while
the rest of the party lay some on the ground, perfectly
quiet, and others stood see-sawing fore and aft, the
blood streaming down their faces. The officer
demanded
an explanation, but received no reply. John
could not find in his heart to become the accuser of
his companions in arms, and the others had nothing
to say. At length, the demand being repeated, the
old corporal, who had been pretty well sobered by the
tremendous thumps he received, aided by the
apprehension
of probable consequences if the truth came
out, gathered himself together, and told the story with
great accuracy, only making a single mistake, by
putting
himself and his companions in the place of John,
and John in the position of the mutineers. By this
simple arrangement, it appeared that the young
volunteer
had invited the party, seduced them into a
debauch
,
incited them to desert, and finally beaten them
almost to death for rejecting his proposal. May I
never live to see my country free, concluded the
corporal
,
9
if I ever saw such a fury as that young chap
is in his liquor!
John, though gifted with strong nerves, and great
presence of mind, stood confounded by the audacity
of the corporal, whose story was straightway endorsed
by the rest of the party, with the exception of honest
Hack Foster, who was lying on the ground fast asleep,
or only pretending to be so, snoring like a brave
fellow
.
The officer perceiving some incongruity in the
story, arising from the fact that John appeared to be
the only sober man in the company, decided on taking
the whole party into custody, and accordingly
gallanted
them to the guard-house for further
examination
next morning, when an inquiry was had before a
commission of officers, over which General McDougal
presided. The old corporal persisted in his story, and
was sustained by all his companions, with the
exception
of Hack Foster, who had become so ill that
he was sent to the hospital, and his testimony
dispensed
with. John was then called on for his defence,
which he made with great clearness and precision,
and with an air of truth that failed not to make a
favourable impression. But the odds were too much
against him; and, besides, the accuser, on such
occasions
,
has always eleven points of the law in his
favour
.
He was finally placed in custody to await his
trial for offences made capital by the articles of war.
Here was likely to be a precious end to all his
aspirations
of love and glory, since the same testimony
which proved sufficient for his committal, would suffice
for his condemnation. What would his countrymen,
and what would his mistress say of him, now that he
lay under the imputation of a baseness, the very
thought of which stung him to the quick, and made
him sick at heart. Instead of honour and renown,
such as he had treasured up as the end of all his efforts,
he was now belike, to become a mark for the finger
of scorn, a bye-word to express the lowest grade of
infamy; a disgrace to his name, his cause, and his
country
;
a thorn in the bosom of the chosen of his heart;
a convicted traitor, who had fallen himself, and
attempted
to drag others down with him to the lowest pit
of infamy. Heaven and earth, would he exclaim
mentally, as he smote his forehead, what will Jane
think of me? She will believe I am guilty, and
instead
of lamenting my death, abhor my very name,
and thrill with horror at the thought of having plighted
her faith to one who was not only a traitor himself,
but a seducer of others.
In these, and such like bitter contemplations of the
past and the future, he was occupying his time, when
the entrance of the captain interrupted his reverie.
The latter had been absent some days, for a
purpose
not connected with the course of our tale. The
old soldier stood before him sad and stern, for a
moment
,
after which he abruptly demanded of him to
declare on his honour, and in the sight of his Maker,
as if with his last breath, if he were guilty of the
crime of which he stood accused. With a clear voice,
and a clear eye, John denied the charge, relating,
minutely
,
every circumstance of the affair, which had
taken such an unlucky turn for him. The detail
carried
conviction to the heart of the parent. The good
man grasped his hand with more than usual fervour,
as the thought came over him, that however
innocently
,
nay, commendably he might have acted, the
unfortunate youth was now, in all probability, to
become
a victim to the guilt of others. Farewell, my
son, said he, and keep a good heart, I am going to
do everything that can be done to save your life and
honour; though, if these scoundrels persist in their
story, and do not contradict each other, I have no
hope for you. You must make up your mind for the
worst. If you are to die even a disgraceful death, it
is still some credit to die like a man. This I know
you will do, and though I may not die with you, my
son, I will seek the first opportunity to die for my
country, that at least one of the name may be buried
with honour.
The captain, whose dress, air, and expression of
face, had something of the pathetic in them, bade the
young volunteer farewell, once more, and then departed
on his melancholyalmost hopeless errand. As he
proceeded with lingering steps, and John gazed on his
mean attire, his almost worn out frame, his gray curls,
which, from long neglect, now clustered carelessly
about his ears and forehead, he was deeply affected
with a mingled emotion of sorrow and pride. The
tears came into his eyes, and he thought to himself,
what honest worth, steady unpretending bravery, and
sterling patriotism, ennobled that ragged, rusty,
war-worn
old soldier.
The first thought of the captain, was to summon
the accusers of his son, who all belonged to his
company
,
for the purpose of questioning them closely, and
comparing their testimony, in order to detect some
contradiction or inconsistency. But against this, his
sense of honour and propriety revolted. It might seem
as if he was tampering with his soldiers, and using
his authority and influence to induce them to
prevaricate
,
in order to screen his guilty son from merited
punishment. He accordingly determined patiently to
await the decision of the court-martial, and should
the unfortunate young man be convicted, take the
course which honour and patriotism pointed out.
Believing
him innocent, he could conscientiously solicit
his pardon.
The day of trial at length came, and the accusing
witnesses having been well drilled by the old corporal,
repeated their testimony without varying from that
given on the previous occasion, or from each other.
They were aware that their own lives depended on
convicting
John, who, if acquitted, would, without doubt,
become their accuser. To their united testimony he
had nothing to oppose, but his own bare word; and,
though his account of the affair was given with a
clearness, condour, and manliness, that made a most
favourable impression, he was finally sentenced to be
shot. It ought to be here mentioned, that the
testimony
of Hack Foster was not taken, he being
confined
in the hospital with a raging fever, accompanied
by delirium.
During the period between sentence and execution,
the unhappy father was employed incessantly in
soliciting
the pardon of his son, but his efforts were
unavailing
.
It was deemed indispensable to check such
attempts on the inflammable materials of a suffering
army, in the bud. Much dissipation, and many cabals
had already been overlooked, in consideration of the
hardships and privations of the soldiers; but it was
now deemed indispensable that an example should be
made, in order to repress a spirit which threatened
the dissolution of the army, and the ruin of the cause.
The decision of the court-martial was therefore
confirmed
,
and the youth cautioned to prepare for a fate
which was now inevitable.
Having lost all hope of pardon, the old
weather-worn
soldier bent his steps towards the guard-house,
where the son lingered in hopeless resignation, if that
may be so called which consisted in utter
recklessness
,
whether his father succeeded in his solicitations
or not. If pardoned, he was forever a disgraced man,
who could never afterwards look his country or his
mistress in the face; and if any hope lingered in his
heart, it was, that possibly some one of his accusers
might, in a moment of awakened conscience, be
brought to a confession of his perjuries. Nothing
but this could retrieve his blasted reputation, or
restore
him to the station he once occupied among the
defenders of his country. He felt that if he lived, his
life would be divested of all that makes it worth
preserving
;
that wherever he went, he would carry the
burning brand of disgrace on his forehead, the burden
of dishonour, which bears as heavy on the shoulders
of the son of a farmer, as the offspring of a king; and,
above all, he remembered, that come death, come life,
Jane was lost to him forever. She who loved him
because he loved his country, would never mix her
being with a reprieved traitor; nor would the
high-spirited
old colonel, who, with all his foibles was a
man of honour, ever be brought to give his only child
to one who could confer on her nothing but a disgraced
name. If, at times, he wished to live, it was only in
the latent hope that, at some future period, he might
be permitted to die in the cause of freedom, and thus
entitle himself to the pity, if not the forgiveness of
his country.
When, therefore, the father entered the prison, the
son addressed him in a cheerful tone, for he saw by
his countenance that his fate was determined. He
felt for the old soldier, and wished to comfort him by
showing he was not afraid to die.
Father, said he, I see by your look and your
walk that all is decided, and I rejoice it is so. I do
not wish to live, but on one condition, which is now
all but hopeless. If I could preserve my honour with
my life, I would grasp at it eagerly. But of this,
there is now no prospect. Tell me, my father; do
not be afraid.
It is all over, my son. To-morrow you are to be
shot by your countrymen. I had hoped that if shot at
all, it would have been by your enemies in defending
your country. But the will of God be done.
Amenso be it. I have now but one consolation,
I shall die an innocent man; and hope that, by thus
suffering here for an offence I never committed, I may
obtain pardon hereafter for those of which I have
been guilty.
Say no moresay no more, John. You only make
it more hard to part with you, and the old soldier
shed tears.
Father, said the young man, after a pause, I
have a request to make of you, and he paused again,
overcome by his feelings. Father, you are
acquainted
with Colonel Hammond and his daughter. I ought
to have told you before, that she was to have been my
wife, on conditions which can now never be fulfilled.
Here is a letter, I wish, I entreat you, to send as
directed
,
by the first opportunity.
He then proceeded to relate what the reader is
already
acquainted with, and concluded in a tone of
bitter despondency.
All my hopes are now forever blasted. Instead of
coming home with honour to claim the colonel's
promise
,
I am going to my grave, where I can claim
nothing
but infamy. Had I died in defence of my
country
,
and its cause, Jane would have cherished my
memory
and recollected me with pride; but now, unless
she should believe my last words to her, she will, if
she remembers me at all, only cherish a serpent in her
bosom to sting her to death. Still, I could not make
up my mind to die without one last effort to preserve
an honourable place in her memory, and to implant
in one pure heart, at least, a feeling of pity
unaccompanied
by contempt and abhorrence. Will you be
sure that she gets this letter, sir?
The sorrowing old man received the letter in
silence
,
for he could not speak; but there was that in
his silence which gave a solemn pledge that it should
be as John wished. That night they passed together,
in sad communion on subjects to which the near
approach
of an eternal separation gave a painful and
affecting interest. As daylight dawned, and when the
morning gun announced the rising sun, John begged
his father to leave him for an hour, as he wished to
be alone. The good man understood him, and he was
left to prepare for his last great trial. But the
captain
did not go far. He remained pacing to and fro
in front of the guard-house, with such an air of deep
and overwhelming sorrow, that the sentinel regretted
he had not proposed to John to escape the night
before
.
At the expiration of the hour, he returned, and
sat down to breakfast with his son. But neither ate
anything, and they were sitting in mournful silence
chewing the cud of bitter fancies, when the distant
roll of the drum roused them from their deep
despondency
.
The hour is come! exclaimed John, starting upon
his feet, as if the signal was a relief.
My son, said the captain, there is one thing I
must tell you, for you ought to know it. Do not think
hardly of your father when you see the very men who
swore away your life, drafted to execute the sentence,
and learn, as perhaps you may, that it was at my
earnest
solicitation. I had my motives for this, but if they
should not be answered, I beseech you to die blessing
mewill you?
With my last breath, cried John, throwing
himself
on his bosom.
A guard now appeared to conduct the young
volunteer
to the spot, whence his soul was to take its flight
to the region of immortality. To make the example
more impressive and awful, the whole army was
drawn up in a line to witness the spectacle, and take
warning from the example. It was a grand and
impressive
scene, in which both nature and art combined
to produce sublimity. The pure, unsullied snow, soon
to be sprinkled with the blood of the victim, not of
his own guilt, but that of others, lay like a
winding-sheet
over the dead body of nature, save where the
dark projecting masses of precipitous rocks presented
a gloomy contrast to the whiteness all around; the
sun glistened on the snow-capt peaks of the western
shore; the smoke from a thousand huts curled
upwards
,
in perpendicular columns, to the skies; the air
was death-like calm, the atmosphere pure and
transparent
;
the soldiers stood under arms, silent and
immovable
;
the stern music of war roused the echoes
of the Highlands, as the young volunteer was brought
forth to receive his doom.
He walked with a firm step, escorted by a guard,
towards the place of execution, and preceded by his
coffin borne by two soldiers. His dress was a white
cotton gown, resembling a winding-sheet, and over
the spot where his heart beat, was placed the
representation
of a heart painted black to serve as a mark
for his executioners. The procession moved forward
with measured steps to the music of the dead march
of Old Rosin Castle, played by muffled drums and
mournful fifes, to a large, open field, in the centre of
which was a heap of fresh earth, which marked the
spot where the young soldier was to meet his death
and find his grave. Around this, the whole army was
drawn up in a hollow square to witness the ceremony.
The coffin was placed beside the grave. He was
told to kneel down on the former, and the officer,
under
whose direction the execution was to take place,
was about to tie a white cap over his head, when he
so earnestly entreated that he might be permitted to
look his accusers in the face, that his request was
granted. His kneeling was the signal for the
executioners
to advance, and they came forward, taking
their station some twelve or fifteen yards distant,
flinching, like guilty cowards, as John looked them
sternly in the face. The officer raised his sword, the
signal for taking aim. He then struck the drum a
single tap, and the echoes of the guns leaped from hill
to hill till they died in the distance. The smoke
cleared
away, and the young volunteer was seen still
kneeling
on his coffin, apparently unhurt.
Scoundrels! exclaimed the officer, who gave the
command to fire, load again, and see that you take
better aim, or you may fill the place of yonder soldier.
Their guns were this time loaded under the
immediate
inspection of the officer, and while this was
doing
,
the captain walked deliberately past, giving a
look of mingled reproach and entreaty, which they
well understood. Again the officer raised his sword,
and paused a moment, to give them time to take aim,
before he struck the drum.
At this instant, Aaron Cronk threw down his gun,
and exclaimed:
Don't strike! he is as innocent as the general
himself!
This assertion, of course, arrested the ceremony;
Cronk and his companions were immediately carried
to head-quarters; and, being confronted with Aaron,
finally confessed the whole conspiracy. Hack Foster,
also, who had his conscience awakened by the fear of
death, now came forward to make a disclosure, and
John was declared not only innocent, but entitled to
the highest praise, by the unanimous voice of the
whole army. Young soldier, if I don't mistake, you
are just such a man as I have occasion for at times.
We shall be better acquainted, soon, said the father
of his country, as he condescended to congratulate
him on his providential escape.
We pass over the scene between father and son,
after this strange adventure, in order to explain the
seeming miracle of his escape from the first fire of his
executioners. It is certain, that the great majority of
villains, consists of men, who, though perhaps they
would not shrink from swearing away the life of a
fellow-creature, are brought with difficulty to witness
and still greater, to become the actual instruments of
his execution. Their imaginations, are, indeed,
familiarized
with guilt, but their senses shrink from its
perpetration
.
Of this class, were the accusers of our
hero. They could endure the thought of having caused
his death by wilfully forswearing themselves; nay,
they could endure to hear of his execution, or, even
to become witnesses to the catastrophe, but they could
not bear to inflict the deed with their own hands.
This required a degree of hardened insensibility to
which they had not yet attained.
When, therefore, at the earnest instances of the
captain, they had been selected to put the sentence in
execution, they were horror-stricken; for, such is the
pliability of a seared conscience, that it is prone to
make distinctions in its own favour, where none exist
in the code of moral guilt. There was, however, no
escape; and each one, without communicating with
his comrade, settled in his own mind to evade the
consummation
of his crime, by firing wide of the mark.
Thus, though the young man would undoubtedly be
killed, all imagined they would be innocent of his
actual murder. The result has been just detailed.
When, however, they were ordered to fire a second
time, and with such an ominous intimation of the
consequences of again missing, all but Aaron Cronk,
decided that self-preservation required them to take
good aim this time. Aaron, however, could not go the
length of such atrocity, and, accordingly grounded
his arms, and surrendered at discretion. Thus was
the life of an innocent man preserved as if by miracle;
and thus was triumphant guilt arrested in the final
moment of its consummation. The mutineers were
tried and condemned to be shot, with the exception
of Cronk and Foster, who were drummed out of the
army. The others, however, managed to escape, and
were, without doubt, sooner or later overtaken by the
justice of heaven.
10
CHAPTER VII.
ONE STORY GOOD TILL ANOTHER IS TOLDOUR HEROINE
NEGLECTS
HER HOUSEKEEPING AND ITS CONSEQUENCESTHE
COLONEL'S FIRESIDECOMMEMORATION OF AN OLD FAMILY
BIBLEARRIVAL OF A STRANGER WITH ILL NEWS
DIFFERENT
BEHAVIOUR OF AN OLD MAN AND A YOUNG WOMAN ON
THE SAME OCCASIONANOTHER ARRIVAL WHICH SETS
MATTERS
ALL RIGHT AGAIN.
The
first act of our hero, on being alone with his
father, was to inquire if he had despatched the letter
left in his hands, and he learnt, with deep regret, that
it had been sent by a young man who was returning
home, his term of service being expired. His road
carried him past the door of Colonel Hammond, and
as such opportunities seldom occurred, the captain had
availed himself of this, by committing the letter to the
care of the young soldier. It was now probably in
the hands of Jane, who was weeping over his fate,
and perhaps despising his treachery.
The thought was, if possible, more bitter, than were
his feelings when he stood a disgraced soldier, in the
presence of the whole army, with half a dozen
muskets
levelled at his heart. He at once entreated his
father to procure him leave of absence for three days,
which having received, he mounted his horse on the
instant, and galloped away, in hopes of overtaking the
bearer of the letter before he reached the home of
his heart. It was now evening, towards sunset, and
the distance some five and twenty miles; but his steed
was staunch, the rider, a lover, on his way to his
mistress
,
and the people on the road, when they saw him
darting along, said to each other, that soldier is either
a deserter, or a messenger from head-quarters!
Leaving
him to travel by himself, we shall precede him to
the residence of the old continental, where he will, no
doubt, arrive in good time, if his horse holds his wind,
and the rider does not break his neck by the way.
After parting with her lover, as described in a
previous
chapter, Jane sought relief from the indulgence
of her bitter-sweet anxieties, where it is always to be
found, in the performance of our duties to ourselves,
and to others. The habit of being useful, is a glorious
habit; it is like mercy twice blest, for it contributes
equally to our own happiness, and that of all within
the sphere of its exercise. It is impossible to resist
the cheering, reviving influence arising from the
consciousness
of doing good to our fellow-creatures, from
motives of affection or duty; and they who seek a
balm to their own sufferings, will always find it in
alleviating those of others. This truth most
especially
applies to women, and above all, to those who
are placed by accident or fortune above the necessity
of daily labour. These are ever most prone to become
the unresisting victims to that tender weakness which
seems to constitute the very nature of the sex, and
under whose despotic sway they are so apt to sink
into a state of useless imbecility, which makes them a
burden to themselves, a blight to the domestic
fireside
.
A hopeless attachment, the loss, or recreancy
of one they love, often becomes a consuming canker,
eating into the heart by its own wilful indulgence, and
only the more incurable from the absence of all efforts
to effect a cure. Novels and romances, for the most
part, administer to this fatal weakness, by inculcating
that it is both refined and praiseworthy; and that no
female can aspire to the dignity of a heroine, who
possesses force of mind, or strength of principle, to
sacrifice
a selfish weakness at the shrine of her social
and domestic duties. In the moral code of romance,
the indulgence of excesses in any other passion is a
crime, while those of love partake of something
almost
divine, and appertain to beings of a superior
order, who are not to be judged by the standard of
morals or religion.
The good sense, good habits, and good principles of
Jane, preserved her from sinking under the enervating
influence of a feeling, whose highest and noblest
exercise
is in stimulating to greater efforts of virtuous
heroism. It cannot be denied, that on the day she
parted from John, there was less appearance of order
in the arrangement of the parlour, and a little more
dust on the mahogany than usual. The testy old
continental
,
moreover, complained that his pipe was in
one corner, his tobacco-box in another, and nothing in
its right place. On his retiring for the night, Jane
was roused from a painful reverie by a tremendous
explosion of wrath from the old gentleman. It seems
his night-cap was not where it should be, there was no
pillow-cases, and the entire order of the bed-clothes
totally subverted, the sheets being where the blankets
ought to have been. Thunder and Mars! what is
all this? JaneJane, I say, come here this minute,
roared the colonel, as the feathers stuck in his ear,
and the wool tickled his nose.
The love-stricken damsel hied to his room, and a
blush mingled with a smile, as she discovered the
occasion
of this outcry.
Look, exclaimed the wrathful old continental,
look here, you baggage, I might as well have a
shoe-brush
or a curry-comb at my nose, and a straw in my
earI'm worse off than at the siege of old Ti, when
I slept under a rye-stack and was half-choked with
the beards. What a plague has come over you, Jane?
Oh! ah! now I recollecthumcome, kiss me, Jane,
I know what you were thinking of, when, for the
first time in your life, you forgot your old father. A
reconciliation took place, and the grievances of the
colonel were speedily redressed; but Jane remembered
the lesson, and he was never afterwards annoyed by the
absence of his night-cap, or the shoe-brush and
curry-comb
under his nose.
From that time she rallied herself to the
performance
of her daily duties, and never indulged the
weakness
of her heart, except in the sober leisure of a
twilight
evening, or in the repose of darkness, when she
often lay awake amid the dead silence of the
midnight
hour, thinking over past times, and anticipating
the future, with mingled hope and apprehension. On
Sabbath-days, she said her prayers and read her Bible,
whose simple, yet lofty eloquence, and touching
tenderness
,
often went to her heart, and awakened those
10*
feelings which lie dormant in every human bosom.
But the favourite portions of the old continental were
those of a warlike character, on which he banqueted
with peculiar satisfaction, criticising the military
movements with infinite discretion, and excepting to
the whole system of ancient tactics, which he could
do without impeaching his orthodoxy, for he stoutly
maintained that not one of the commanders could lay
claim to inspiration. He swore by Thunder and Mars,
that if he had commanded at Jericho, he would have
defied all the rams' horns in the universe; and as for
Sampson's jaw-bone, it would not have cut much of a
figure at old Ti.
There were churches at a distance of a few miles,
but seldom, if ever, in these disastrous times, was the
simple song, or the voice of the preacher, heard to
break on the calm of the Sabbath-day. There, the
swallows built their nests; the windows and doors
were broken, and all within was silence and
desolation
.
Scarcely a solitary traveller was seen on the
high roads, for the business of life had resolved itself
into the work of death and destruction. The rustic
temple of the muses, the deserted school-house, no
longer resounded with the hum of the gabbling fry,
issuing from the mimic Babel, nor was the sonorous
voice of the big masterchecking their blunders, or
reprehending their misdemeanors, or encouraging their
successful efforts at murdering the languagenow,
the king's English no moreever heard by the
solitary
traveller who happened by chance to wander
that way. Instead of the deep traces of those boyish
gambols, which whilome marked the site consecrated
to teaching the young idea how to shoot, rank weeds
had overgrown the spot, such as deform the face of
nature, and give sure token of idleness, neglect, and
desolation. Religion, law, and learning, had fled
before
the fierce whirlwind of war, or only nestled at
the domestic fireside in fear and trembling. In
recalling
these fearful and melancholy times, an old relic
of the revolution once said to usWe lived without
law or gospel; we were paying the price of liberty
with our substance and our lives.
The sequestered spot we have heretofore described,
of all the surrounding country had alone hitherto
escaped
the ravages of war; but none could tell how
soon his turn would come to share the fate of his
neighbours, for it seemed decreed by Omnipotent
wisdom
,
that as all were to partake in the blessings of
freedom, so all must, sooner or later, pay their portion
of the purchase. It was now verging towards the
spring, but no signs of its approach appeared to
soften
the grim visage of winter. The day was Sunday,
and the evening hour had come early as is its wont in
that season of the year. The fire crackled cheerfully
in the capacious chimney of the old continental, which
was innocent of all modern improvements, or
economical
contrivances for persuading people to freeze on
philosophical principles. An old pointer lay on one
side of the fireplace, and a venerable cat luxuriated
on the other, each having occupied the spot where
they now reclined of a winter evening, from time
immemorial
,
and acquired a prescriptive right by long
undisturbed possession. Once, and once only, within
the memory of man, had old Boss, as he was called,
either in that spirit of usurpation which seems
inseparable
from all created beings, or from sheer absence
of mind, taken possession of the corner consecrated
to the venerable pussy. But he got his bitters with
a vengeance. Cats and women, are said to carry the
ten commandments at their fingers' ends, and poor
Boss suffered the consequences of this new exposition
of the law and the prophets. He never after
attempted
an invasion of neutral rights, and from that time
peace and good-will presided at the domestic fireside.
The old continental and his daughter were seated
before the blazing hickory fire, one smoking his pipe,
the other with her head, and it may be, her heart, full
of something that shrouded her face in sadness. The
cat sneezed three times in quick succession, and the
colonel thereupon confidently predicted a snow-storm,
adding, Come, Jane, bring out the old Bible, and
read me the story of little David and Goliah. Jane
obeyed, and brought forth the venerable volume. It
was a family heirloom, such as is seldom seen in these
days, when Bibles have become so plenty and so cheap,
that they have almost lost their reverence, and we
ourselves have seen their sacred leaves appropriated
to the most unseemly purposes. For this reason, we
shall describe this old relic, and because it is
associated
in our memory with all that is venerable in
piety, all that is commendable in unaffected
simplicity
.
It was a heavy folio, the binding of which seemed
emblematical of the eternal word which it enveloped.
The back was covered with hinges of massy silver, so
contrived, that the book opened and shut with perfect
ease, when the clasps of the same metal in front were
unloosed; and at each corner were spacious
ornaments
of rich silver open work, extending over a
large portion of the covering. All these ornaments
were of exquisite workmanship, in a fine old Doric
taste, and finished with infinite labour. Assuredly,
there is something like affinity between such lasting
and massive volumes, and the eternal truths they
inculcate
.
The casket seems worthy the jewels it
contains
,
and the superior reverence of our forefathers
for religion, may be estimated, in some degree, by the
stateliness of their Bibles, as well as the care they
took to preserve them. In those times, the Bible was
a precious inheritance, bequeathed from generation to
generationa memorial of pious ancestors, whose
hands had often turned its leaves, whose souls had
derived
precious nurture from its sacred fountain. But
we are falling into the fashion of the time, and
mingling
eternal truths with worldly fictions.
Jane continued to read, and the colonel to make his
comments, until the good gentleman, as was too often
his custom, fell into a doze, and began talking to
himself
in a broken series of disjointed fragments, beyond
all comprehension. These were, however, only
momentary
wanderings, and coming to himself, with a
snort, accompanied by a start, he opened his eyes,
exclaiming
at the same time:
By the way, as I was saying, he had not said a
word on the subject, except, perhaps, in his sleep, as
I was saying, have you heard from that puppy, John,
since he went away?
No, father, repeated she, with faltering lips, and
twinkling eyes.
Thunder and Mars! can't the fellow write?
But what is the use of writing, sir, when there is
no way of sending a letter? you know, father, there
is no post running now, and I have not seen a single
traveller pass since he went away.
Whatyou have mounted guard and kept a good
look-out, hey?
I don't deny it, sir, for I own I am anxious to hear
from him. I think of going over to-morrow to his
grandfather's to inquire, if you have no objection.
Not I, Jane. But I dare say he is sick enough of
his bargain, by this time. Thunder and Mars! Jane,
if you only knew what a soldier's life is. Nothing
but marches and countermarchesguns, drums, and
wounds, powder, grape-shot, fire, fury, hunger, thirst,
cold, and the deuce knows what besides. I should'nt
be surprised if the fellow had deserted by this time,
or died of the home-sickness, not I.
O, father! how can you say so? such is not the
picture I draw, in the midst of my fears. I think I see
him animated by love of his country, and the hope
the hope you have given himpreparing himself, by
never ceasing efforts, to win the prize, humble as it
is; animating and inspiring his companions in arms
to do all, dare all, in the cause of mankind. I know
him better than you do, sir, and something tells me that,
as I heard him once say to his grandfather, his name
will yet ring among his fellow-soldiers. I fear for his
life, but not for his honour. Little as is my value, he
will win me, or die.
At this moment, the sound of horses' feet was heard
rapidly approaching, and, as if by an uncontrollable
influence, Jane ran to the door, which eagerly
opening
,
she looked out amid the starless night, where
nothing could be seen but the drifting snow, which
now began to fall, and nothing heard but the wind
moving among the leafless branches of the trees.
Immediately a voice exclaimed:
Is Colonel Hammond at home? It was not the
voice she wished to hear, but one she had never heard
before. At length, however, she answered:
He iswill you come in, sir?
The stranger entered, and was welcomed by the
colonel in the homely old-fashioned style of those days.
The colonel, by way of entering wedge, after the
guest was seated by the cheerful fire, observed it was
a stormy night, and the traveller assented; for, no
one not troubled with the spirit of contradiction, would
have thought of contesting such a self-evident
proposition
.
A short silence ensued, but as every one
knows that the appetite for news is innate among
country-people, and more especially among our
countrymen
,
the old continental at length inquired of the
stranger if he was from head-quarters. He replied
in the affirmative, adding, that he was on his way
home, having served out his time, and that the storm
had obliged him to claim shelter for the night, if he
could be accommodated where he was. The old
continental
assured him of a hearty welcome, and ordered
his horse to the stable, while Jane was in a great
fit of the fidgets. Her lips parted more than once,
as if to speak, but closed again, only breathing a deep
sigh.
How are things getting on at head-quarters? at
length asked the colonel.
Bad enough, replied the stranger. The soldiers
are almost destitute of food and clothing, and some
have become discontented, not to say disaffected. A
few of them have been plotting desertion, and
mutiny
,
and one, a young fellow from this
neighbourhood
,
has been condemned to be shot; and, now I
think of it, I've got a letter from him to this young
woman.
Saying this, he fumbled in his pocket, and drawing
forth a letter, handed it to Jane, who received it with
trembling hand, and cheeks white as the snow falling
without. Her heart grew sick, almost to fainting,
and she stood supporting herself by a chair, with the
letter in her hand. At length, venturing to look at it,
she recognised the writing, and sliding from her hold,
sunk down on the floor, helpless, though not insensible.
With mingled feelings of sorrow and indignation, the
colonel, assisted by the stranger, raised up and
supported
the blighted blossom, muttering, at intervals,
to himself, my poor Jane! my God, she is dying!
and Thunder and Mars! what a cowardly young
rascal, to desert his country!
The smitten maiden recovered by degrees, and was
seated in the colonel's arm-chair, where, summoning
to her aid the pride and dignity of woman, or, perhaps,
the courage of despair, she opened the letter with a
firm hand, and began to read. As she proceeded, her
bosom heaved, her cheek became flushed, her eye
sparkled, and at the conclusion, she exclaimed he is
innocent! father, he is innocent! and a just
providence
will never suffer him to die the death of a
traitor
!
see here, dear father!
The colonel took the letter, and read it attentively,
without a word. Then he stamped about the room
for a time, with his hands crossed at his back, while
ejaculating to himself something like the following
soliloquy:
The young rascal! it is all a lie, from beginning
to end. What! six men all put their heads together
to swear away the life of an innocent man! I don't
believe a word of it, for it is impossible, but they must
have contradicted each other. It's a lie, a cowardly
lie! only to make Jane more miserable by lamenting
the young rascal after he's dead. And yet, I could
never believe this of John. He was always a bold,
frank, up and down lad, and nobody ever caught him
in a lie. I remember when the young rascal spoiled
my patent plough, by not knowing the philosophy of
it, and old Csar was blamed, he came forward like
a man, and took it all on himself. Hummay be
what he says is true. Janemy dear child, cheer up,
my little blossom. It will be good sleighing to-morrow,
and bright and early I'll drive to head-quarters. The
general will never deny an old comrade the life of an
innocent man.
You'll be too late, sir, said the stranger, bluntly,
and without reflecting on consequences. He was
shot this morning. I heard the volley fired as I passed
over the mountain.
He is dead then! shrieked Jane, as sinking back
11
in her chair, she sat pale and still as a statue, while
not a single tear trickled from her eyes. She did not
faint, but her mind and body both remained benumbed
with the sudden shock. Her heart was cold, and her
brain unconscious of all but indistinct imagery flitting
about, as it were, without form or identity.
The stranger soon retired to rest, saying he should
be off by day-light in the morning, and the father and
daughter were left alone in their misery. It was now
waning towards midnight, and the storm waxed louder
and louder; the winds moaned bitterly, ever and anon
startling the freezing silence of the night, and almost
realizing the poetic fiction of the spirit of the storm,
riding the blast with desolation in his train. As they
sat in the hopeless silence of deep-rooted sorrow, Jane
was roused from the trance of grief, by what she
imagined
,
the trampling of a horse in the snow, amid
one of those pauses so frequently occurring in the
fiercest storms, when nature seems to stop her career
for a moment, to recover breath for more vehement
exertions. She listened with intense and eager
anxiety
,
but the sound was again lost in the loudness of
the storm. Another pauseand the tramping of
footsteps
was heard on the piazza. This time the colonel
heard it too, and the first idea being that it was a
party of Skinners, tories, or Cow Boys, come to pay
him a visit, he seized his old rusty sword, which
always
in these dangerous times, hung up in the
sitting-room
,
a memento of the siege of old Ti, as well as a
text for many a long rigmarole story of the old French
war. While stamping about with this formidable
weapon in his hand, Jane had ventured to the door
opening on the piazza, whence she returned borne in
the arms of a man covered with snow from head
to foot.
Thunder and Mars! What does all this mean?
exclaimed the old continental, advancing, sword in
hand.
What, colonel, don't you know me? exclaimed a
voice, which he recollected perfectly.
Know you! by the memory of the immortal Wolfe,
it's John! But stand off, sirnone of your hand, sir,
and put down my daughter instantly, I command you,
sir. Don't touch the hem of her petticoat, you rascal,
till you've proved to me you don't deserve hanging.
The only daughter of Colonel Hammond must not rest
in the arms of a rascally mutineer, though he may
have been pardoned. ButhumhayesThunder
and Mars! I forgot. I suppose you've proved your
innocence
,
hey? Well, by the Lord Harry, John, I'm
glad to see you for all that. Jane, confound you,
make haste and come to yourself, that I may hear all
about it; and John, mind, if you've run away from
justice, I'll have you tied neck and heels, and sent
back to-morrow. Make haste, Jane, I say; you think
I'm as patient as that obstinate old blockhead, Squire
Day.
John placed Jane tenderly in the old arm chair, and
what he said to her in doing so is a mystery, but the
effect was magical. She opened her eyes, and lips,
too, exclaiming in tones of proud triumph, mingled
with glowing affection
I knew you were innocent of deserting your
country
!
Yes, yes, said the colonel, but the matter is not
quite so clear yet. He may be only pardoned, not
acquitted
,
and of the two, I'd rather for my part, he had
been shot outright; or he may have escaped, for aught
we know. Come, sir, let us hear the whole truth, and
nothing but the truth, before I decide whether to take
you by the hand or turn you out of doors. We know
from your letter all that happened up to yesterday;
let us hear the rest in as few words as possible. None
of your rigmaroles, John.
Thus cautioned, the young soldier took up his story
where it had been left in his letter, and probably to
prevent Jane from jumping out of her skin, took fast
hold of her hand while he related the particulars. It
is out of our power to depict the feelings of that
amiable, excellent girl, during the recital; but this
we know, that whenever he came to a critical point
in his story, he felt a thrilling pressure of the hand
held captive in his own; that as the catastrophe
approached
,
that little soft hand trembled, and grew
cold; and that when he came to the lifting up the
sword, the tap of the drum, and the discharge of the
muskets, she looked in his face with agonized
tenderness
,
as if to see that he was yet alive. When he had
done, she drew her hand gently from his, and clasping
both her own together, exclaimed
The hand of Heaven was in it, and to Heaven all
our gratitude is due!
John, said the old continental, I shan't turn you
out in the snow, to-night, I believe. Give me your
hand, boy. Your honour is cleared. You have
deserved
well of your country, and are worthy to be
my son-in-law. Buthumnot quite yet, though.
You've done nothing but escape by miracle from
being
shot for doing your duty. You must do something
more than this according to our bargain.
I know it, sir. I mean to do more, if I am spared,
before another year goes over my head. I shall keep
my word, sir, and never claim my bride till I feel
myself
worthy of the blessing.
Spoke like a true heart. But, Thunder and Mars!
John, now I think of it, I don't exactly comprehend
how the grandson of an old farmer came to talk and
act so much like a gentleman. I always thought such
things ran in the blood, but you seem to have got them
from nature.
And why not, sir? Let me tell you, Colonel
Hammond
,
that the same high and noble impulses lie
dormant
in the bosom of the peasant as in that of the
king, and that nothing is wanting to awaken them to
life and action, but incitement and opportunity.
Inspired
,
as I am, by love and libertywith such a prize
as
this
to gain, and such a cause as ours to defendI
must be meaner than the dirt on which I tread, if I
don't become more than a gentleman.
I believe you are right, John, that is, so far as I
understand you; for may I be shot for mutiny, as you
came so near being, if you are not sometimes as deep
as that old blockhead, Squire Day, who half the time
can't make himself understood, and the other half
don't understand himself. But there was another
auditor who understood, and gave him such a look as
he comprehended just as easily as he could distinguish
11*
every feeling of her heart in the clear mirror of her
liquid eye.
The worthy old gentleman had delivered himself of
a succession of stupendous yawns, at the conclusion
of his last speech, and with him, the next step was
plump into the region of Morpheus. He always fell
asleep extempore, which, in our opinion, is a faculty
that makes amends for at least one-half the evils
which constitute the chief inheritance of mankind.
Let no one complain of his fate, while his nights are
refreshed by the dews of balmy rest, and happy
dreams. How the young couple employed the
interval
,
during which the old soldier was sleeping on his
post, is none of the reader's business, nor ours either.
All we shall disclose, is, that John was in the act of
telling his story the third time, when he was
interrupted
by the colonel, who burst suddenly into an
eruption of expletives, which interrupted the thread
of his discourse, and startled Jane to such a degree,
that she snatched away her hand just as if something
had bit her.
Thunder and fire!Dash on, my boys! huzza for
old Ti! down with the
Parley voux
and the Indians!
cried the old continental, starting up at the same time,
and breaking his pipe over John's head. Ah! ah!
you copper-coloured caitiff, I think I've done your
business
,
hey?
Awakened by the exertion, he rubbed his eyes,
stared about, and at length said, By the Lord Harry,
I believe I've been napping. Then looking at his
watch, and finding it was far towards morning, he
commanded them to seek the land of Nodwhere
many a man, besides Cain, has found a wife in dreams,
and soon the uproar of the storm without, combined
with the peaceful, happy feelings within, lulled them
all into a luxurious repose, during which, Jane dreamed
she was married to John, and that he turned out to be
his old grandmother. She awoke with the fright, and
finding the sun shone out brightly, arose, and
commenced
the performance of her customary household
duties, with a heart as light and as pure as the flakes
of snow that were whirling about in the eddies of a
brisk northwester.
CHAPTER VIII.
A HAPPY YOUNG COUPLE THAT WANT NOTHINGDISCREET
CONDUCT
OF OUR HEROINECOLLOQUY BETWEEN TWO OLD
PEOPLE
FRIEND
UNDERWOOD AND HIS FAMILYTHE SADDLE
ON THE WRONG HORSEJOHN ARRIVES AT HEAD-QUARTERS
ACCOMPANIES THE CAPTAIN ON A PARTY OF OBSERVATION
A SURPRISE, A CAPTURE, AND A CHASE, WHICH ENDS IN
RUNNING DOWN THE HUNTERS INSTEAD OF THE GAME.
After
being six times reminded of his duty, and at
length fairly pushed out of doors by Jane, our hero at
length mounted his steed, and pursued his way to the
old stone house to pay his respects to the good old
patriarch
and his wife. He was received with a simple,
affectionate welcome, conveyed in few words; and
when, in answer to their inquiries, he related the
story of his wonderful escape, the old dame shed
tears of mingled horror and gratitude, while the
gray-haired
patriarch shook him by the hand, and was
proud of his grandson. After spending an hour or so,
conversing on these matters, and hearing and
answering
various minute inquiries about his father, John
began
to show symptoms of restiveness, which he
judiciously
placed to the account of his horse, that was
standing in the snow pawing away manfully. To the
proposal, that he should be put in the stable, our hero
replied, that he was going to spend the day with
Colonel
Hammond by special invitation; on hearing
which, the old lady exchanged a significant look with
her mate, who said nothing, but thought a great deal,
according to the custom of wise old gentlemen. But
it not being in the nature of the sex to be content
with dumb-show, the look was followed up by words
of the following import
Well, I declare! said the old dame, who would
have thought it? So you are going to stay all day at
the colonel's! and you slept there all night, too! Well,
I declare! who knows what may happen!
Neither you or I, Rachel, quoth the wiser vessel;
but I've heard say, an ounce of luck is worth a pound
of understanding.
Yes, and you know, grandfather, so she always
called him, you know it is written in the tenth
chapter
of Jeremiah, that some people are born with a
silver
spoon in their mouths, and others with a wooden
ladle.
I don't think you'll find that in Jeremiah, Rachel,
but I dare say it is true for all that.
Well, then it's in the book of Proverbs, for I am
pretty sure I saw it there, though my memory is not
quite so good as it was before the old French war.
But I will soon see. Accordingly she took down the
old Bible but whether the passage was found in
Jeremiah
,
or the book of Proverbs, does not appear from
any authentic documents.
John passed his time, previous to joining the army,
in unalloyed happiness, or, at least, only alloyed by the
thought of a speedy parting with Jane. Historians
and romancersif the phrases are not synonymous
have told us a thousand times that happiness cannot
be described; but we confess we do not believe a
word of it. Why should there be more difficulty in
depicting the smiles, than the tears of humanity?
Why are the pure enjoyments of virtuous love, the
cheerful scenes of domestic happiness, the rich
prospects
of national peace and plenty, not equally
susceptible
of being delineated, with the excesses of the
passions, the crimes and sufferings of guilt, or the
bloody and atrocious scenes of war? Alas! we fear
it is not the difficulty of painting the picture, but of
finding admirers, that gives such disproportioned space
to the records of crime and suffering, over those of
virtue and happiness. Is it not, that having, in a
great measure, lost the capacity of enjoying these
innocent
delights ourselves, like the parent of death and
sin contemplating the happiness of the first pair in the
garden of Eden, we turn in sickening envy from the
scene, as one in which we can never partake, and
seek excitement in banqueting on those splendid
exhibitions
of guilt and misery which ever follow in the
track of heroes and demigods?
We have, however, a different reason for refraining
from enlarging on the happiness of John and his
affianced
bride, namely, the apprehension that some of
our readers might pine away with envy in
contemplating
the picture of virtuous love sanctioned by
parental
authority, and beckoned forward by enchanting
hope to a long perspective of fancied bliss. With
whom does time gallop withal, if not with such
favoured
mortals? The day flitted away like a blissful
dream, and the morrow brought only a recurrence of
what was even more delightful in the repetition. But
at length the period arrived, when they were to pay
the full price of all the pleasures of meeting by the
pangs of parting. We shall not describe the scene
minutely, for it was as like as two honey-bees to that
delineated on a former occasion, making allowance
for the difference of weather. Then, nature was all
arrayed in smiles; now, she was wrapt in her gloom
and severity, lifeless, though not dead, awaiting the
touch of balmy, life-inspiring spring, to wake her into
music, smiles, and blushes. We shall only say, that
as the lovers were exchanging their mutual farewells
in the presence of the old continental, each, as if
influenced
by a common feeling, looked wistfully, if not
beseechingly, in his face, as if to ask something at his
hands.
Well, what is it? said he. What have you got
to say to me, John?
Nothing, sir, replied John.
And you, young madam?
Nothing, sir, replied Jane.
Nothing, sir, exclaimed the colonel, mimicking
each in turn, nothing, sir. Then, sir, please to face
to the right about, mount your horse, and be off; the
snow is so deep, you will hardly save your distance,
for your leave expires to-day. Good-bye, take care
you are not shot for a deserter.
Take care, said Jane, with glistening eyes, take
care you are not shot by the red coats.
Pooh! cried the colonel, what do you think a
man enlists as a soldier for, except to be shot at? But
come, sir, mount, I say, and don't let me see your face
again till you have fulfilled your part of our bargain.
You understand?
They parted. Jane watched his course, until she
could see him no more, then wandered about the home
a while, from room to room, not knowing what she
sought, and finally sat down to mend the colonel's silk
night-cap, which was a treasure in these times, when
men scarcely wore a head, much less a cap on it. As
the good little girl plied her long darning-needle, which
was also a treasure, brought from New York by
Mangham
,
the pedlar, it operated as a charm, just like
Mesmerism
,
and, by degrees, soothed her throbbing heart
into quiet resignation, cheered by the hope of soon
meeting again to part perhaps no more. When she
next encountered her father, it was with her
accustomed
sweet, cheerful smile, and all again went on
smoothly as before in the domicil of the old
continental
.
Blessed, yea, thrice blessed, are the employments
of the hand, for they are the best assuagers of a
wounded
heart.
Our hero proceeded but slowly on his journey,
owing
to the road being covered with deep snow. Not
a single track denoted that man or beast had preceded
him; for the men of the country around, with the
exception
of the old and infirm, were either soldiers or
fugitives, and the cattle had, with few exceptions, been
driven away by their owners, or carried off by parties
of plunderers. He lost his way three times, but
whether
owing to the obscurity of the road, or his head
being
full of other thoughts, must be left to the decision
of the discreet reader. His course led him across
Croton river, at a ferry then kept by a respectable
Quaker, who, as a non-combatant, enjoyed a certain
qualified exemption from the evils of the times, though
it must be confessed he was treated with very little
ceremony by both red coats and continentals. A
neutral
,
in time of war, most especially such a one as
that of our revolution, is game for both parties, and
generally squares accounts by making game of
them.
The peaceable Quaker had frequently experienced
this truth, and as frequently put it in practice; but on
the whole, like most of those mysterious broad-brims,
he resembled the sheep not alone in practising the
doctrine of non-resistance, but in another peculiar
characteristic, for, the more you sheared him, the
thicker became his wool. According to his own
account
,
he was plundered almost every night, yet,
strange to say, he waxed richer and richer every day,
and was the only farmer in all the country round, that
had not his broken windows stuffed with old hats, and
worn out garments. He was suspected, but without
cause, of having a sneaking preference for king
George, but in his heart he yearned for liberty. The
truth of the matter is, that he had an irresistible
preference
for guineas over continental money, and could
not resist the temptation of supplying his enemies in
preference to his friends. In short, he was a
hard-money
man, for he adored specie, and eschewed
shin-plasters
incontinently. His wife, however, like almost
every farmer's wife and daughter of the heroic age
of our country, was sincerely attached to the good
12
cause, and three stout, strapping boys, kept at
home by their father, was deeply imbued with her
feelings.
Our traveller halted at the house of friend
Underwood
for refreshment and rest, and was received rather
coolly; but, as he called John, friend, it served as an
apology for treating him in rather an unfriendly
manner
,
for good words are a sort of continental money,
and act as worthless substitutes for the sterling value
of good deeds. Farmer Underwood could tell a man
afar off who dealt in paper promises, or shin-plasters,
as they now began to be opprobriously called, and he
saw, at a glance, that our hero was wanting in the
one thing needful; however, he invited him in, and
offered a seat at a cheerful blazing fire. Comfort is,
indeed, the badge of all the tribe, and no one ever saw a
Quaker who dressed in rags, cultivated lean land, or
lived in a poor house.
While the steed of our hero discussed his provender,
the party at the fireside was engaged in conversation
on public affairs. The neat, simple, and indeed
handsome
Quaker dame, in the meantime busied herself
about her domestic concerns, ever and anon stopping
to listen to John's details of the position of the army
in the Highlands. Farmer Underwood, at length,
asked him if he was not tired of such hard service,
saying it was a poor business to fight without victory,
and live without food.
Dost thee hear, boys, said he, as the boys came
in to dinner. Dost thee hear how the continental
soldiers
are without shoes, or shirts, and that their bellies
are as badly off as their backs. How much better art
thee off with a good house over thy head, and
everything
to comfort the inward man.
But, friend Underwood, answered John, if all
the men staid at home, what would become of the
cause, and the country? It would be overrun by the
red coats, and we should be no better than slaves.
We should then live in peace and quiet, friend.
Peace and quiet! do you call it peace and quiet,
when you are pinned to the ground by a pitchfork, or
a bayonet, with the foot of an enemy on your neck, to
keep you from writhing? Do you call it peace and
quiet, when you are only let alone because you have
not the spirit to turn like a worm, when trod upon?
Do you call it peace and quiet, when you lie
shivering
under the bed-clothes, while robbers are rifling
your house, laying waste your fields, insulting your
wives and daughters, because they will not cry God
save the king? By my soul, friend Underwood, I
would rather be in the midst of an earthquake, than
enjoy such peace and quiet as this.
Friend, said the Quaker dame, who had stood
listening
to this animated appeal, her large black eyes
kindling as he proceeded: Friend, is there anything
in the house thee would like? Thee shall be kindly
welcome. John thanked her gratefully, but declined
the offer.
Obadiah, quoth farmer Underwood, thee hadst
best go and see after the stranger's horse; and
Nehemiah
,
thee art wanted at the wood-pile; and Uriah,
thee should be threshing in the barn, for thee must go
to mill to-morrow.
The young men departed unwillingly, with their
cheeks in a glow, and when John soon after followed, to
saddle his horse, he found them shouldering their flails
and pitchforks, and marching to and fro about the
barnfloor
,
practising military manuvres. On his
departure
,
he tendered the price of his entertainment, but
the good woman declined receiving it, saying, in a
low tone, thee art serving thy country, and defending
its women and children, and such should find welcome
everywhere. He took her by the hand, and departed,
thinking to himself, that the saddle was on the wrong
horse, and that the Quaker and his wife ought to
change garments.
Friend, said Obadiah, as he passed the barn, where
the youngster was going through the manual with a
pitchfork, friend, was that done judgematically?
Like an old continental, replied John, and gayly
setting forward, a ride of some two or three hours
brought him to his old quarters, where the captain
welcomed him with great cordiality. From this
period
,
his time passed in the regular, and somewhat
monotonous
routine of soldierly duties, until the breaking
up of the ice, the melting of the snow, and the chirping
of the little birds, announced the coming of the spring.
Another campaign was about to open, with prospects
ill calculated to inspire any hope that the future would
make amends for the past. While the republican
army had been suffering grievous privations, and a
continual diminution from the expiration of their brief
terms of service, that of the enemy had been
quartered
in the city of New York, enjoying the gayeties
of life, in the midst of plenty and repose. Superior
in numbers, discipline, and equipments of every kind,
the royal army, flushed with the recollection of past,
and the confidence of future victories, had little else to
do but scour the country at pleasure, during the
summer
,
and feast and frolic through the livelong winter.
Previous to opening the campaign, it was desirable,
if possible, to gain precise information of the state of
affairs in New York, the probable time the enemy
would be in motion, and the course he would pursue.
For this purpose, a small detachment was placed under
the command of the captain, with instructions to
approach
York Island, under cover of night, and, if
possible
,
seize some straggler from the British lines, who
might, perhaps, communicate the desired information.
John was one of the party selected, and one evening,
just about dusk, they proceeded on their critical and
important mission. The distance was too great to be
reached that night, and arriving just about daylight at
Hungry Hollow, the captain determined to halt in this
sequestered spot until evening, assured that here they
would be safe from all observation. Nothing of
consequence
occurred, except that John suggested to the
captain the propriety of his riding over to see the old
people at the stone house, and received a sharp
reprimand
for his pains.
The design was to approach Kingsbridge in the dead
of night, beat up some outpost, and carry off one or
more prisoners. The evening came in gloomy and
dark, the sky being deeply overcast with clouds, and
cautiously pursuing their way by a back road, some
miles from the river, they at length approached the
bridge, which at this time formed the only
communication
from the island to the mainland. Here the
12*
captain halted his little troop, detailed once more the
plan of operations, and commanding that no one should
utter a word, on pain of the severest punishment,
proceeded
cautiously forward, until he caught a view of
the glimmering at the guard-house on the south end
of the bridge. The darkness of the night had increased
with its progress, and the silence of death reigned all
around, save the grinding of the horses' feet in the
sandy road that led to the point of destination.
Arriving
at the spot where the road made a sudden turn
round a ledge of high rocks, within a short distance
of the bridge, the party dismounted, with the exception
of one to whom the horses were given in charge, with
directions to push forward, at a given signal, towards
the bridge, for the purpose of receiving his comrades,
and any prisoners they might have the good fortune
to secure. This done, the captain proceeded cautiously
to reconnoitre the premises.
We have said there was a guard-house at the south
end of the bridge, in which glimmered a light, by the
aid of which was seen a sentinel pacing back and
forth, with slow and sleepy pace. Sheltered by the
reeds that grew on the bank of the river, the party
stole along, sometimes knee-deep in mud, until they
gained a lodgment under the bridge, where they
listened
with breathless interest, but heard nothing save
the measured footsteps of the sentinel, who was
pacing
towards the other extremity of the bridge, where
he halted, and spoke some words which they could not
distinguish.
The sentinel is about to be changed, whispered
the captain, he will perhaps return once more, and
the instant he turns his back, we must spring out and
seize him. Have you the gag ready, John?
The sentinel approached, stopped, and listened, while
the party under the bridge heard with dismay the
neighing of one of their horses, disturbing the dead
silence around. After listening a few moments,
he walked briskly away towards the guard-house.
Now! whispered the captain, and in a second the
party was on the bridge. In another, they had seized
the sentinel, but unfortunately not before he had
uttered
an exclamation which alarmed the guard, who,
the moment they could get ready their arms, sallied
forth. This brief interval, however, enabled the
soldier
to bring up the horses on the signal being given;
but before they could mount with their prisoner, the
guard was upon them, and discharged a volley, which,
though given at random, in the deep obscurity of night,
proved fatal to two of the party. The rest retreated
while the guard was reloading, which was a work of
some difficulty in the pitchy darkness.
Quick as thought the prisoner was placed in front
of the stoutest of the troopers. Dash on, boys!
cried the captain, in a faint voice, and on they sped
fast as their steeds could go, the old soldier ever and
anon urging them forward for their lives and for their
country. Scarcely, however, had they proceeded a
couple of miles, when he fell headlong to the earth,
with the words Dash on, boys! trembling feebly on
his lips. They have finished me, John, said he, as
the young man dismounted and knelt by his side.
I've got a bullet in my shoulder. But don't stop for
me
. Ride onride on for your livesthe man you
have got may be worth his weight in gold. Carry him
to head-quarters, and leave me to my fate. Ride on
away with you!
The men obeyed unwillinglythe old soldier sunk
down with the exertion he had made. Here he lay a
few minutes without speaking, while John was vainly
trying to staunch the blood flowing from his wound
with a handkerchief.
Who is that? said he, faintly.
Your son, dear father.
What business have you here? Awayleave
meand do your utmost to carry that red coat to
head-quarters. You cannot tell what information he
may be able to give. It may save thousands of lives
it may save your country. You can do me no good,
for I am dying. Goand may God preserve you.
Not one step, sir! Live, or die, I will not desert
my father!
The wounded soldier raised himself on his elbow,
with a last effort, and passionately cried out
Then, instead of my blessing, take my curse. As
your superior officer, I command youas your father,
I adjure you to leave me. With my last breath, I
order
you to join my men, and do your best to lead them
to head-quarters. I am a dead man, and dead men
can take care of themselves.
Thus saying, he sunk down, and moved and spoke
no more. Rising, after an agonizing struggle, arising
from grief for the fate of the brave old soldier, and
the necessity of leaving him or incurring his
malediction
,
the bitter tears rolled down his cheeks, and he
said to himselfHere is another item in the price of
liberty. At this moment, he heard the sound of
horses crossing the bridge, and kneeling for an instant
over the breathless body, he breathed a silent farewell,
a silent prayer for the repose of the soul of his
gallant
parentthen mounting his horse, spurred forward
to overtake his comrades.
He had scarcely turned a corner of the road, when
a party of dragoons, which had been roused by one
of the guard at the bridge, came riding up furiously,
and seeing the body of the captain, by the light of the
morning dawn, halted to examine it; but finding no
signs of life they again pushed forward, to recover,
if possible, their kidnapped companion. The fugitives,
by this time, were some miles in advance, but being
encumbered by their prisoner, did not proceed with
the same speed as their pursuers. The moment John
overtook them, by tacit consent he assumed the
direction
of the party. The road led over a succession of
hills and valleys, in a devious course, and the daylight
disclosed to their pursuers, the party, scampering over
a high eminence at a distance of some two or three
miles. Descending into a deep vale, they were again
lost sight of, and thus alternately hidden, and again in
full view, the chase was continued with increasing
ardour, if not increasing speed. But it every moment
became evident that the pursuers were gaining ground,
and that to escape was almost as hopeless, as to halt
and fight a party numbering three to one, would be
desperate. Nearer, still nearer, appeared the enemy
every time they crossed a hill in the rear, and they
were now within half a mile, when John and his party
descended into a deep valley, which branched off
towards
the interior of the country, and through which,
a stream, sometimes almost dry, at others a roaring
torrent, found its way to the Hudson. Being now out
of view of their pursuers, a sudden thought occurred
to John, which, if put in practice, might possibly
secure
their escape. Directing his companions to
follow
,
he plunged into the stream, which had been
lately
swelled by a heavy rain, and had not yet quite
subsided
,
and tracing his course upwards, after the
example
of the hunted deer, leaving no track behind, he
was soon out of sight of the high road.
Scarcely had they disappeared, when the enemy
gained the summit of the hill overlooking the valley,
and missing the fugitives, concluded they had just
descended
the eminence before them. Shouting with
the exultation of certain and speedy success, they
spurred on with renewed eagerness, leaving John and
his party in the rear, treading the mazes of the
winding
stream towards its source in a rugged range
covered
with forests. When certain he was not followed
in that direction, and that he was out of their view
entirely, he left the channel of the stream, crossed a
field or two, and gained a back road that led to the
Highlands across Pine's Bridge.
In the meantime, the enemy continued the chase
over a road which, winding through a hilly country,
precluded seeing any considerable distance ahead,
until
,
ascending a high commanding eminence, which
afforded a long view of the country before them, they
were brought to a full stop by perceiving that the
game was nowhere in view. Not a living thing was
in sight, nor could they perceive on examination any
fresh tracks of horses passing that way. Turning
back, they could find no road branching off from that
they had travelled, nor any bars or fences thrown
down by which the fugitives might have escaped.
They must, therefore, have passed them somewhere,
and nothing was left but to turn back, and, if possible,
discover the precise spot where they had deviated
from the road. A scrutiny was accordingly
commenced
,
but without success, from the difficulty of
distinguishing
the horses' tracks from each other, until it
was discovered that one of those belonging to the
retreating
party was without a shoe to one of his hinder
feet, having lost it in the course of the chase.
This served them as a sort of landmark, and after a
tedious scouting, they at length discovered that the
track was lost at the stream, which, as before stated,
crossed the deep ravine through which the road passed.
It was thus made evident that the chase had taken to
the water, and gone eastward, as a contrary direction
would have carried them to the river close at hand,
and in full view. The pursuit was therefore renewed
in that direction with reviving hope, and renovated
vigour. They pursued their rough, embarrassed way,
following the stream, and carefully searching for the
precise point where the fugitives had emerged. This
they discovered, after a progress of about half a mile,
during which they met with many obstacles, which
greatly impeded their course. The state of the fence,
which had been pulled down, indicated the spot, and
the tracks of the horses led them through some fields,
from which they at length passed into a cross-road,
where the unshod foot served as an unerring guide.
While all this was passing, our hero and his party
kept on their way, with all possible speed. But, by
this time, their horses began greatly to flag, though
they had been selected from the fleetest and strongest
of the troop. The necessity of frequently shifting the
prisoner from one to another, in order to relieve them
alternately, occasioned considerable delays. The men,
too, as well as their steeds, required rest and
refreshment
,
and a halt was determined on, whatever might
be the consequences. Accordingly, they proceeded to
a solitary farm-house, almost hid by a stately old elm,
the growth of the primeval soil, which was now slowly
putting forth its pale purple buds to the breathing
spring.
The column of white smoke curling upwards, and
floating on the pure atmosphere of morning, gave
token that the house was inhabited, and its secluded
situation invited the party to choose it as a place of
rest, as well as safety, for, it seemed possible, if not
probable, that their pursuers might eventually follow
their track and overtake them. Every precaution
was therefore taken to elude surprise. The horses
were kept saddled and bridled, and one of the party,
by turns, stood sentinel on an eminence, which
commanded
a view over the road they had passed, while
it hid a like portion of that they were about to
pursue.
Approaching the house, it presented an aspect of
neglect, decay, and desolation, emblematic of these
dreary times, when the bayonet lords it over the land,
and defenceless weakness, instead of exciting pity,
provokes only insult and robbery. An aged female
stood peeping fearfully from the corner of a broken
window, as if watching their approach, but on
entering
,
not a living soul was to be seen. The room
presented
a spectacle of poverty; the little furniture it
contained was either worn out or broken; the
surrounding
fields, though blest by nature with the
capacity
to yield a ready reward to the labours of the
husbandman, were without fences, and overgrown
with worthless weeds, and neither cattle or domestic
animals lowed in the fields, or loitered about the
farm-yard
.
Silence reigned everywhere, but it was not
the silence of peace. The crowing of the cock, the
cackling of hens, the lowing of the cows, the
ploughman's
whistle, and the milkmaid's song, and all those
rural sounds that give life to the rural prospects,
refreshment
to the soul of man, were unheard amid the
grim repose of nature. John remembered it in past
times, when surrounded by a family of lusty boys, and
rosy cheeked girls, the old couple, to whom the place
belonged, walked on their way contented and happy,
and its present aspect smote on his heart. Another
item in the price of liberty, thought he, as he sighed
over the sufferings of his country.
As no refreshment could be procured in the absence
of the old woman who had been detected at the
window
,
search was made for her, and she was at length
found hid under a heap of straw in the cellar. The
poor old soul, though her thread of life was almost
spun, trembled for the little remnant that was left.
O, for the Lord's sake! for mercy's sake! don't
murder a harmless old woman! exclaimed she, as
they drew her forth.
13
Murder you, mother, what put that in your head?
said John, we are friends.
Friends! I have no friends. I am a poor, lone
woman, and friends or foes, everybody plunders and
insults me. The Cow Boys come here as friends and
steal my fowls; the Skinners say they are my friends,
and drive away the cattle; and the red-coats and
Yagers, after plundering everything they can lay their
hands on, break everything they cannot carry away,
and then go away cursing me for a rebel. But God's
will be done, only don't murder me, gentlemen!
John assured her that they had come as friends, and
would treat her as friends. He told her his name,
which she remembered, and being thus reassured, she
went out for a few moments, and returned leading an
old man supporting himself by a stick, and bending
under the burden of almost a century of years. A few
white hairs lay like strangers at a distance over his
wrinkled brow, and his patched garments gave
evidence of patient industry contending with extreme
poverty. Still his person and his garments were clean,
a circumstance more than any other indicating not
worthless want, but want incurred by inevitable
misfortune
.
Poverty may be the lot of any man, but dirt
is the offspring of sheer idleness, since there is always
water enough in the world to keep all the world clean.
The beggar with filthy face and hands, gives sufficient
evidence that he is himself the author of his own fate.
Being told the story of their wants, the old woman
bent her way towards a little copse of wood at a short
distance, facing a rugged cliff of rocks, within which
she disappeared a few minutes, and returned with a
supply of potatoes, eggs, and corn-bread. This cliff
was the hiding place for all the old couple had left in
the world, and to such straits were the poor people
who could not remove from the scene of robbery and
strife reduced, in order to preserve the scanty means
of life. While the humble meal was preparing, John
asked a variety of questions, and among others, what
had become of their sons and daughters. The question
brought the apron of the mother to her eyes, but the
old man had long ceased to weep, for he was blind.
Three of our sons, answered she, are gone to the
army. They may be dead, or they may be living, for
it is but seldom we see any one that can tell us what
is passing, and men die now-a-days without any body
being the wiser for it.
I saw them not four days ago, said John, they
were all well, and three better soldiers never drew
sword or trigger.
God reward you for that good news, young man.
You shall pay nothing for your breakfast, that's all
the thanks I can give you. But my youngest sonhe
is dead. I know he is dead, for I saw him die.
Yes, said the old man, and so did I. But, thank
God, I shall never see such a sight again; that is some
comfort.
You saw him die? inquired John, who felt
interested
in the story.
Yes, replied the old dame, he died here on this
very spot. You can see the stain of his blood on the
floor. I have scrubbed and scrubbed to get it out, but
whenever the boards are wet, and the sun shines on
them, there it comes again, and I can see my poor
boy lying with a gash in his head, and the blood
running
.
How did he die?
Why, like a man, said the graybeard, proudly.
Aye, that's what he did, cried the mother. He
died trying to save his father's house from plunder,
and his old parents from being whipt and spit upon.
Well, I will tell you all about it, for it is a comfort to
old people to be pitied, and it does one good to let
every body know what a fine, bold fellow he was.
You must know, sir, he was coming home from the
field, the fourth of July, over a year ago, after working
hard in a little corn-field we had, till it was quite
dark. It was over the hill yonder, out of sight of the
house. Well, a party of three Skinners or tories, I
don't know which, for one is as bad as the other, had
come to the house about an hour before, and after
eating and wasting all they could find, began to make
a great noise about some liquor to drink. They said
they were sure we had some hid away in the house,
which was a great big lie, for neither I, or my old man,
nor my son, ever drank anything stronger than cider,
and we had none of that ever since the Yagers burnt
our cider-mill. Well, we had none to give them, and
then they began to call us dd rebels, and all sorts
of names, when just then my son come in, and hearing
what was going on, spoke to them pretty strong about
their conduct. One thing brought on another, and at
last they swore that if we didn't give them liquor,
they'd tie us all up and give us a whipping.
The cowardly rascals! exclaimed John.
Well, then, as I was saying, one thing brought on
anotherI can't tell how, exactly, I was so
frightened
but
at last they swore they would `split him like
a shad' for his impudence. And so they did. They
cut him down on this blessed spot, and hacked him to
pieces afterwards. See where they cut me over the
arm for trying to save him. But that was not the
worst, for they cut my old man just over the eyes in
such a way that by degrees he lost his sight, and has
never since seen the light of heaven.
The cowards! the bloody, villainous cowards!
exclaimed John. Oh! if I ever come across them,
if they don't pay dearly for this!
Well, young man, said she, that's very good of
you. I don't commonly bear malice, but I own I should
like to seenonot just see, but hear that these cruel
men were served as they did my son.
And I promise you, said John, that if I ever
meet any of those rascally Skinners, they shall not be
the better off for your story, mother. But you must
live in hope of better times. It cannot be but such
miseries as our dear country has endured, and I fear
must still endure, will not be one day repaid by long
years of happiness. Liberty, like religion, must have
its martyrs, and your son was one of them. It must
beit will be.
But I shall never live to see it, replied she.
Nor I. Old men, like me, must look beyond the
grave. They have no hope but that of hereafter,
said the old man. I shall have nothing to live on
but the thought of that miserable fourth of July when
my poor boy was murdered. It was a bitter day for
us.
13*
But a glorious day for our countrythe birth-day
of its independence; the beginning of that, whose
end, I trust, will be a blessing to mankind. You may
not live to see it, but your children, and your children's
children will, or there is no virtue in generous blood
or fearless patriotism. Think of that, mother, and
thank God that you have borne children, who don't
fear to die in defence of their country or their
parents
.
Do you think we shall ever be free? asked the
good woman, anxiously.
I know itI feel it said John, for God and
Washington are on our side. But where are your
daughters?
They are gone with a bag of corn to mill, for we
have no one else to send. It is so far that they are
forced to start early to get back the same day.
Here the conversation was cut short by the cry of
Turn out! turn out! the red coats are in sight! and
the sentinel posted on the hill came galloping full
speed. All was now haste and confusion. The party
mounted, and without bidding farewell, or recollecting
their bill, scoured away before their pursuers came in
sight, the intervening hills, and a turn in the road,
through a thick wood, screening them effectually for
the time.
The red coats halted at the house, the others had
just quitted, for they, too, as well as their horses, were
both tired and hungry. The old dame declared truly
that she had nothing to give them, and the officer
commanding
,
being fortunately a gentleman, the desolate
pair for this time escaped insult and outrage.
Unluckily
,
however, the good woman in her zeal to prove her
incapacity to entertain them, let out the secret that all
her provisions had been consumed by a party that
called that morning. The officer eagerly inquired,
how long it was since they departed, and his hope of
overtaking them, suddenly reviving, he ordered his
men to mount with all speed, and resume the chase.
Away, then, they scampered full speed. But John
and his party had by this time got the start some
miles, and their horses having been refreshed by rest
and food, travelled with new vigour. Still the
disposal
of their prisoner perpetually delayed their progress,
and the irregular formation of the country continually
enabled them to discern their pursuers, who were
again evidently gaining ground. The flight and the
chase thus continued, until both parties approached
Pine's Bridge, one of the principal passes over Croton
river, where John expected to find a detachment from
the American army on guard. The horses again
began
to flag, and the near approach of the eager red
coats was announced by shoutings that grew every
moment more loud and triumphant. Fifteen minutes
more and all had been lost, for when they reached the
bridge the enemy was scarce half a mile in the rear.
Here they found a company of continentals, to the
commander of which our hero said a few words, and
rode on as if still fearful of being captured. The
officer
instantly ordered his men into a thick wood of
evergreens, where they had scarce time to conceal
themselves, when the pursuing party came in sight,
and perceiving the bridge unguarded, dashed across
without hesitating a moment. Turning an angle of
the road, they were suddenly brought to a halt by the
sight of their anticipated prey, drawn up as if waiting
to receive them. A parley ensued, in which John
roused the indignation of the commander of the red
coats by demanding his unconditional surrender. You
are either a madman or an idiot, cried he, don't you
see we number three to one? Surrender, this instant,
or take the consequences.
Look behind you, sir, said John, and the officer
obeying the intimation, was struck with dismay at
seeing a company of regulars drawn up in his rear.
John once more, and for the last time, demanded his
surrender, and as his situation was such as to preclude
all hope of escape, he relinquished his sword with
feelings
of the bitterest mortification. You have caught
me in a trap, said he. Yes, replied John; the
hunters have become the game, and the game the
hunters.
The commandant of the bridge gallantly resigned
the prisoners to John, who, he was pleased to say, had
fairly earned them by his masterly retreat, and our
hero leisurely conducted them to the camp. From the
prisoner captured at Kingsbridge, and those at the
bridge over Croton river, much valuable information
was extracted; and John had the satisfaction at
hearing
the father of his country regret the fate of his
devoted
old soldier, while he applauded the conduct of
the young volunteer.
CHAPTER IX.
A VILLAGE SCENEMAJOR FORCK AND THE GOVERNORA
NIGHT ADVENTUREAND A CATASTROPHE WHICH
THREATENS
A SPEEDY END TO THIS HISTORY.
The
campaign was now about to openthat
campaign
which was to try the stuff, of which men,
struggling
for freedom, are made. The design we have in
view, is not to detail or distort events which belong to
history, but to give a domestic picture of a war, the
most extraordinary in its character and results, when
we consider the means of the respective parties for
its prosecution, and its momentous consequences, of
any perhaps on record. To judge of it with
correctness
,
it is necessary that the feelings which animated,
and the principles that governed and sustained THE
People
, in their long and arduous struggle, should be
known, and these it is our purpose to exemplify in the
character and conduct of our hero. Many, very many
such ardent, fearless spirits, animated the revolution,
who now rest in their graves, unknown and nameless
martyrs, who have slipped through the meshes of the
net of time, which open the way for all the lesser fry,
to the mansions of oblivion.
Our hero, having acquired the confidence of his
general, was about this period principally employed in
discreet and critical emergencies, which required
sagacity
,
promptitude, and intrepidity; such as gaining
information of the movements of the enemy, beating
up his quarters, and other partisan feats, all which he
performed in a manner highly satisfactory. His
accurate
knowledge of the country between the lines,
his cool daring, and his celerity in deciding and
executing
in a crisis of danger, enabled him to succeed
in almost everything he undertook, and to acquire the
confidence of one who was slow to trust, and slow to
suspect, when he had once given his confidence. On
more than one of these occasions he passed within a
few miles of Colonel Hammond's residence, and was
sorely tempted to deviate from his course, but he
resisted
the tempter, and bent all the energies of his
mind to the service of his country.
About this time he was intrusted with a critical and
important mission, on which hung the most momentous
consequences. It was to meet at or near Spiking
Devil, a person from New York, who had been long
in the habit of giving information concerning the
movements and plans of the enemy, and had signified
that he had now something of great importance to
communicate to the general. Although the mission
not carrying him within the enemy's lines did not
involve
the character of a spy, yet a disguise was
prudent
,
if not absolutely necessary; and, acordingly,
John equipped himself in a suit of beggar's rags, and
covering his head with a red wig, defying detection
from his most intimate friends, he set forth one
evening
,
a little after dark, on his perilous journey.
His course led him to a little village, where was a
tavern, kept by a widow, a staunch whig, and one of
his old acquaintance. His object was to gain what
information he could, and most especially if any small
parties of the enemy had been lately seen in that
quarter. This house was a favourite resort of a portly,
and rather opulent farmer, commonly called Major
Forck, although we believe his commission was of his
own signing. The major was lofty, pompous,
purseproud
,
and withal a great braggart, especially in his
cups. He wore an old fashioned cocked beaver,
carried
an ivory headed cane, instead of a whip, and
rode a stout charger, who possessed certain instincts
peculiarly accommodating to a man of the major's
convivial propensities. He would mount the steps of
a piazza, or enter the door of a house upon occasion,
and never failed to carry the major home safe and
sound, when the stout old warrior had lost the reins
of his understanding, as well as the command of his
legs. He was a hale, broad shouldered man, nearly
six feet high, with a round, platter face, wide mouth,
little pug nose, and diminutive black eyes, that
twinkled
furiously upon occasion.
His constant associate, and determined foe, who
assisted
him in his cups, irritated and soothed the major
alternately, and in fact played him off on all occasions
for the amusement of company, was an old inhabitant
of the village, a rank tory, suspected of furnishing
intelligence to the enemy, and whose situation,
surrounded
as he was, by whigs, would have been
critical
,
had it not been well understood that he was in
fact their protector. His house was in the centre of
the town, directly opposite to that of a gentleman, who,
having taken a prominent part among the friends of
the country, was peculiarly obnoxious to the loyalists,
so much so that he had removed his family to a more
secure situation, while he himself was serving in the
patriot army. They had more than once threatened
to fire the old whig mansion, but had as often been
dissuaded from it by the opposite tory neighbour,
whose house would inevitably have shared the same
fate. Thus the village had hitherto escaped, and
whenever the old tory, who was a sly humourist, and
most pestilent dry wag, was taunted by his neighbours
with being an enemy to his country, he would
retort
upon them by affirming they were a pack of
ungrateful
rogues thus to abuse their protector and
preserver. In short, he took such airs on himself, that
he was called, in derision, the governor, and by this
title he was commonly known in the village, as well
as surrounding country. The governor was a perfect
contrast to the major, tall, straight, rawboned, and of
imperturbable gravity. His jokes were converged in
a wink, a shrug, or a sly twist of the mouth, and his
skill in first exciting, and then allaying the wrath of
Major Forck, was truly admirable. He never lost his
temper, and the major never found his. Both were
arrant cowards, but the difference was, the major kept
his secret, while the governor acknowledged it openly.
These two worthies happened to be smoking their
pipes at the widow's, when John, as before stated,
entered, for the purpose of refreshment, and in the
cant of his tribe begged something to eat. The
landlady
,
aware of his identity, received him rather
discourteously
,
but allowed him to take a seat in a
corner. He had frequently seen them both, and they
were well acquainted with his person before he joined
the army. Neither, however, recognized him in his
disguise. The major turned up his little snub nose
contemptuously, and the governor occasionally looked
over his shoulder at him in rather a significant
manner
.
Besides these two dignitaries, there were
present
two or three of those disinterested persons to be
found in every village on the face of the earth, whose
sole occupation is to watch people while at work,
and to laugh at the jokes of others, though they
never perpetrate any themselves. Not being able to
afford drinking at their own cost, they were
occasionally
permitted to partake of the major's bounty,
whenever
they laughed particularly loud at one of his
hits at the governor.
Governor, said Major Forck, resuming the
conversation
which had been interrupted by the entrance
of the beggar, any news from down below? You
are in the secrets of the red coat general, you know.
Here he winked to his auditors, who gave a significant
chuckle. Tell me, are they bound east, west, north
or south.
They are going to move right perpendicular, as I
find by a letter I received from Sir Henry, yesterday.
Perpendicular? why governor, that's right up and
down. I never heard of an army moving that way.
But I see what you're at, and if you go to cut any of
your dry jokes on me, I'll serve you just as I did the
party of Yagers last year; did you ever hear that
story?
Whatwhen you crept up chimney one night and
14
frightened all the swallows? They made such a clatter
the Yagers thought it was a troop of horse, and all ran
away? If you mean that, I recollect it perfectly.
I am sure I should, for I have heard it at least a
thousand times.
The major was nettled, especially as the audience
all laughed aloud at this sally of the governor. He
started up, flourished his cane over the governor's
head, and challenged him to mortal combat the next
morning. The governor contented himself with
standing
on the defensive, by lifting his pipe, and mitigating
his wrath by an explanation.
Oh! now I recollect. I beg your pardon, Major
Forckby the way, Forck is Dutch for hog. But as
I was sayingForck being Dutch for hogI believe
I was mistaken in the particulars. I recollect, now, it
was not the chimney-swallows that frightened the
Yagers, it was you, major; yes, I recollect perfectly,
it was you. Here the major, having recovered his
serenity, sat down, while the other continued, Yes
yesit was you, Major Forck, which, I don't know
whether you know it or not, means hog.
Who cares what it means? Go on with your story,
since you pretend to know all about it. I don't
suppose
anybody else ever heard it before. The
company
assured him they had not; whereupon the major
treated them to a tipple, and the governor proceeded
with great gravity.
Well, as I was saying, you climbed up the
chimney
as the best mode of putting the Yagers to flight,
by setting them an example, and laid hold of a
gammon
that was hung up there to smoke; but the string
not being strong enough for two such fat pieces of
baconyou know Forck is hog in Dutchgave way,
and down you both came, so covered with sootyou
know you told me sothat the Yagers took you for
the old Harry, and all scampered away. Gentlemen,
added the governor, this is the true story, and I beg
the major's pardonForck being, as, I believe, I
neglected
to observe before, Dutch for hogfor mistaking
one story for another. I recollect, it was not then
that you frightened the chimney-swallows.
Neighbours
,
I will tell you that story, and be very
particular
,
for it is one of the most brilliant achievements of
the whole war.
Here, again, the major started up, flourished his
cane, and seemed on the point of annihilating the
governor, who, knowing his man, kept his seat, and
begged him to listen to his explanation, which he
would find perfectly satisfactory. He assured him he
would as soon insult King George himself, as Major
Forck, though he was sorry to say that Forck was
certainly Dutch for hog. Sit downsit down,
added
he, and don't be in such a passionbrave men
never get angry. Come, sit down, my dear friend hog,
I mean Forckwhile I tell these gentlemen, who
have never heard the story, as soon as I light my
pipe. Having done this, the governor commenced in
the most pompous style of bombast.
One terrible night, in the yearI forget the year,
but it certainly happened some time or otheras
Major
Forck was returning home, about half or
three-quarters
over the bay
It's a lie! I was as sober as a deacon! exclaimed
the major.
Well, as the major was coming home as sober as
a deaconat least, his horse was sobertaking every
bush for a Yager, and everything white for a ghost,
but being able to see neither bush or Yager if there
had been ever so many, he thought he heard the
clattering
of horses behind him, and naturally concluded,
being an old soldier, that if there were horses there
must be men on them, and if there were men there
must be soldiers, and if there were soldiers there must
be enemies. You see, neighbours, the major, whose
name is hog in English, was neither tipsy nor
frightened
,
or he would not have reasoned so coolly and
judiciously
.
Now, what do you think the major did?
Some people, with more liquor than brains in their
noddles, would have stopped, or turned round to
ascertain
whether their conclusions were right; but the
major, being as sober as a deacon, knew which side
his bread was buttered, and kept on, right
straightforward
,
full tilt, as fast as his horse could carry him,
utterly
regardless of meeting his enemies in the rear.
Some people may, perhaps, think, the major would
have stood a better chance of encountering his
pursuers
,
had he turned his horse's head towards them,
but the fact is, all old soldiers, like him, know very
well that the shortest way to get into trouble is to
run away from it. So the major ran from the enemy
that he might meet him the sooner, for he was pretty
certain they would follow and overtake him, which was
just what he wanted.
There was a manuvre for you! cried the major,
triumphantly.
Well, neighbours, the major cut dirt at a great
rate, I tell you; and the faster he rode, the nearer the
horses' feet seemed to be, which shows that he was
taking the most expeditious way of meeting the
enemy
in the very teeth.
To be sure, quoth the major, let an old soldier
alone for that.
When, at last, the enemy came fairly up with him,
such was his warlike appearance, and such mortal
defiance flashed from the back of his head, and
especially
his cocked hat, that though they kept following
him, they never could pluck up the courage to draw
their swords or fire a pistol. What will scarcely be
credited, they quietly left him at his own door, in
possession
of the field and of all the honours of victory.
What renders this affair still more remarkable, the
next morning not a single track was to be seen on the
road except that of the major's horse, and that there
are many envious people among the neighbours, who
swear it was his own horse he ran away from, and
that he was so far gone that he not only saw but
heard double.
It was some time before the major, whose
perceptions
were naturally somewhat obtuse, perceived the
drift of the governor's story; and when, by degrees,
he became aware of the joke, the conclusion of which
was hailed by bursts of laughter from the auditors, his
cheeks were seen to distend with a condensation of
mighty indignation, while his little black eyes sparkled
with consuming fires. For some time, he could not
14*
utter a syllable, but at length a kind of inarticulate
gurgling in the throat was succeeded by words.
It's a liea bloody lie! Any man that says he
ever saw me hear double, or run away from myself,
is a liar and a rascal to boot. Come out, if you dare,
you tory rascal, meet me in fair fight, like a man,
with sword and pistol, and I'll make you eat your
words without seasoning, or season them with
gunpowder
.
Follow me, you backsliding, cowardly tory
rascal, or I'll break my cane over your head. Come
outcome out, I say!
The governor being satisfied with his joke, moved,
by degrees, towards the door, while the major followed,
flourishing his cane, and watching his opportunity,
made a precipitate retreat. Being, however, a better
runner than the major, he reached his home in time to
bolt the door behind him; whereupon, Major Forck
mounted his steed, and riding up the steps of the
governor's
long piazza, paraded back and forth,
denouncing
him a liar, a tory, and a poltroon. After this,
having satisfied his honour, he bent his course
homewards
,
where he arrived safely, though fast asleep,
under the conduct of his discreet charger. The play
being over, the audience departed, leaving John, who
had become very impatient, alone with the landlady.
During the preceding scene, he had remained perfectly
quiet, taking no part in the joke, but he could not help
observing that the governor occasionally eyed him
with a scrutinizing look, which caused some little
apprehension
that the wily old tory suspected him of not
being what he seemed.
Has he come? asked he eagerly of the landlady.
Not yet. I am afraid all is not right. The
governor
was down below yesterday, and has been in and
out of my house I believe at least a dozen times
today
,
for no reason that I know of, except that he
suspects
me.
How late is it? asked John, again, after a pause,
in which he called to mind the sinister looks of the
governor.
I don't knowpast ten, I believe.
Then he will not come to-night, and I must make
all haste I can to the place of meeting down below.
Wait a littlesomething may have delayed him.
I am afraid the governor suspected me, from his
looks.
Youwhy your own father would not know you
in this wig, and she sportively snatched it from his
head, laughing with great glee at the same time.
Unfortunately
,
however, the governor, who had emerged
from his stronghold on the retreat of the major, was
watching and listening at the window all this while.
He could not distinctly hear what was said, but the
moment the landlady pulled off the wig, he retreated
precipitately, saddled his horse, and rode off with all
speed towards New York.
After waiting some time, and finding the person
expected
did not arrive with his boat from the opposite
shore, John determined to proceed on foot to the place
appointed for meeting the messenger from the city.
The distance was some fourteen or fifteen miles, and
it was indispensable that he should be there before
daylight. Avoiding the high road, he proceeded
onward
by a path leading along the bank of the river,
and by great exertion arrived at the place of
rendezvous
,
some two hours before daylight. It was just
at the junction of the Hudson and Harlem rivers, on
the north side, and here he made at intervals the
appointed
signal, a low whistle, but for a long time no
response was made, and no person appeared. He now
more than ever feared some untoward accident had
occurred to thwart his important mission, and
deliberated
intensely on the propriety of remaining at the
imminent risk of discovery, or return without
accomplishing
his purpose. Finally, he determined to wait,
and take the consequences, whatever they might be.
Shrouding himself among the thick evergreens that
grew on the bank of the river, he remained perfectly
quiet, except ever and anon repeating the signal. No
one appeared, none answered, and not a sound
disturbed
the dread repose that precedes the hour when
all animated nature awakes to life and light, save
at intervals the challenge of the enemy's sentinels
at a distance, and the soft murmuring of the waves
on the shore. Anon faint streaks of yellow light
gradually shot up athwart the eastern sky; the stars
began to wink their eyes, as if overpowered by the
radiance of the rising sun, and one by one disappeared
like watchful sentinels that had performed their
nightly
duty, and were now retiring from their posts; the
birds of spring began to twitter in their leafy coverts,
and at last the distant echoes of the morning gun,
reverberated
from the high cliffs of the opposite shore,
announced that the sun had risen, and the labours of
the day commenced.
At this moment, and just as John was preparing to
return from his fruitless expedition, he saw through
the mists that glided like sheeted spectres along the
surface of the waters, something stealing along, close
to the shore, under the high bank, and weathering a
point of rocks projecting into the river, at a little
distance
towards the south. Again he sought his place
of concealment, and stood watching with breathless
anxiety the approach of what he soon perceived was
a skiff, rowed by a single person, and advancing
rapidly
towards him. A few minutes more, and the little
craft was opposite the spot of his concealment, where
it stopped, and the oarsman looked cautiously around
in all directions. Thus she lay for a brief period
without motion, during which John remained
undecided
what course to pursue. Being of a nature to
risk everything for a great purpose, he hesitated not
long, but gave a signal, which was promptly answered,
and suddenly the skiff glided into a little cove among
the rocks, where it could neither be seen from the
river or the land. The person who conducted it then
landed, and approached our hero. He was, to all
appearance
,
a plain, substantial citizen, of an open, ruddy
countenance, with a clear, blue eye, and an
expression
of face that invited confidence. He stepped on
shore with the caution of a cat seeking to ensnare a
bird in the grass, and his glance quick as lightning
continually ranged towards every point of the compass.
With all this, as he approached, he discovered nothing
like fear, but on the contrary, a perfect self-posession.
You are late, friend, said John, in a low tone.
I could not come sooner, repeated the other, in a
whisper. I am afraid they begin to suspect me, for
all day yesterday soldiers have been loitering about
my house, and asking idle questions, that seem to have
no meaning. They called for liquor, too, and drank
freely in sight of officers passing by, though I know it
is against a standing order.
Have you brought any important information?
Yes, very important. An officer of considerable
rank, but who sometimes gets into a frolic, was at my
house night before last, and while swaggering about,
more than half drunk, dropt a paper from his pocket,
which I secured without notice, and after copying,
went and delivered to Sir Henry next morning. It
contains the general order which will be published in
a few days, and details the course of operations at the
opening of the campaign.
After looking about cautiously in every direction,
he slipped into John's hand a silver bullet, which he
said contained the information to which he referred,
and of which he enjoined him to be careful.
It is a dangerous business you are engaged in, my
friend, said John, but I suppose you are well paid
for it.
Nothing can pay a man for such a task as I have
undertaken. I don't pretend to be better than other
people, but believe me, it is not money alone that
tempts me to risk my life every day, every hour, and
every minute. I love money, I confess, but I love my
country better, and liberty still more. The way I
choose to serve them both, I know is not considered
honourable; but if it is glorious to risk one's life for
our country, surely it is more so, to incur both the loss
of life and reputation in her cause. I expect that I
shall some day or other die with disgrace on my name,
but am willing to do so whenever I am called.
You are a true friend to your country, and I
honour
you with all my soul, said John, shaking him
warmly by the hand, but we must not be loitering
here. I shall set forth immediately on my way, while
you return to New York.
I shall not return till night; it is too late now. Let
us draw up the skiff into the thick bushes yonder,
where she will not be seen. I have some provisions
with me, and shall remain here quiet till evening.
But the sooner you are gone the better; so make haste,
and if you can, travel like a mole under ground.
At this moment, a rustling was heard among the
bushes, and the next, a party of red coats rushed upon
them in the rear. Quick as thought, John hurled the
silver bullet from him with all his might out into the
river, where, after a few skips along the surface, it
disappeared. Defence was vain, for they were
without
arms, and surrounded on all sides. The
commanding
officer ordered them both to be seized and bound,
swearing he would soon find out the reason of their
skulking so near the lines, pretending to be skipping
stones in the river.
As for you sir, addressing the stranger, we've
had our eyes on you for some time. You are from the
city. You came away last night in a boat, and unless
you can give a good account of yourself, you may
chance to swing for it, as well as this red-haired
beggar
,
who we know is in disguise. Saying which, he
pulled off our hero's wig, amid a general titter of the
whole party.
I
can
give a good account of myself, was the
quiet response of the stranger.
Very well, so much the better for you. As for
you, Mr. Rebel, we know you of old. You are the
gentleman who sliced a few Yagers not long ago, and
afterwards carried off one of our sentinels. You see,
I know all about you. Though not a beggar, I assure
you, you are an object of charity, for you'll swing by
the side of your worthy friend there, as sure as I am
one of his majesty's serjeants.
When a man is caught in disguise, whatever may
be his motives, he is apt to look rather sheepish. Such
was the case with our hero, who remained silent,
simply
because he did not know exactly what to say for
himself. His heart was heavy, for he felt that his
country might suffer new calamities from the failure
of his undertaking. This was his first thought; his
second was of Jane, whom now he never expected to
see more: for though he knew that not having been
within the lines of the enemy, he could not be
considered
a spy, still he was perfectly aware that few
American prisoners ever escaped alive from the fangs
of old Cunningham, whose name is consecrated to
eternal infamy in our domestic traditions, or from the
fatal dungeons of the prison-ships, where so many
nameless patriots died for their country and were
forgotten
.
The prisoners were roughly hurried to the nearest
post of the enemy, whence they were carried before
the commander-in-chief for examination.
CHAPTER X.
A PICTURE OF A SUBJUGATED CITYAN EXAMINATIONA
LOVE-SICK MAIDEN AND A TESTY PARENTA DIALOGUE
AND A SORTIE OF THE OLD CONTINENTAL.
After
undergoing a thorough search without
anything
being discovered which could throw light on
their mission, the two prisoners were conducted
under
guard to the city. As they passed along, the
island presented a melancholy picture of neglect and
desolation. The fields and gardens were without
fences, and without cultivation; the woods had been
all cut down to supply the enemy with fuel, and many
of the houses deserted. Every object indicated, that
the few remaining inhabitants neither sat down
under
their own vine and their own fig-tree, nor enjoyed
unmolested the fruits of their labours. A stern
enemy
lorded it over the land, and no one could call that
his own, which he had earned by the sweat of his
brow, or inherited from his fathers.
As they entered the subjugated city, which John
well remembered as the abode of competence and
peace, he was struck with the sad contrast it now
presented. Many of the inhabitants had left it, on
being taken possession of by the enemy, and of those
15
that remained, but few became reconciled to their
new masters, who neither sought to conciliate their
love, or to disguise that haughty contempt with which
the conqueror almost always looks down on a
subjugated
people. Citizens and soldiers, even of the same
country, scarcely ever associate cordially together,
though the latter appear in the character of
protectors
and defenders; but when, on the contrary, they
come as conquerors and oppressors, nothing can be
expected but injuries and insults on one hand; on the
other, hatred and revenge. The conspicuous red coats
everywhere appeared, swaggering through the streets
with an air of superiority that was in itself a
perpetual
insult; and to complete the picture, a large portion
of the city lay in ruins, having not yet recovered from
the effects of the great fire, that took place soon after
it fell into the hands of the enemy.
Passing down Broadway, the prisoners at length
arrived
at the head-quarters of Sir Henry Clinton, at
the Battery. They had been prevented from all
communication
with each other, and were separately
brought before the general, who was attended by
some of his principal officers. The examination was
long, and every art and every threat was used to
entrap
them into a discovery or extort confession. But
all these efforts failed, for both were sustained by
equal firmness and self-possession. When asked
whether he belonged to the rebel army, he replied,
that he was one among three millions of people who
were struggling for their rights, and that if a whole
nation could be called rebels, he certainly was one.
When charged with being a spy, he denied it,
respectfully
,
but firmly. He acknowledged that he came for
the purpose of seeking information as to the condition
of the British forces and their probable destination,
but having never come within their lines, until brought
there a prisoner, he could not be called a spy, and
therefore claimed the rights due to a captive in war.
As to his meeting with the person with whom he had
been found, whom he had never seen before, and from
whom he had derived no information, he conceived, as
they had no right to inquire, he was not bound to
answer
.
He was found where he had a right to be, and
had a right to wear what clothes he pleased.
His companion was more closely questioned, for his
conduct had been still more suspicious than that of
our hero, and the commander-in-chief had more than
once had occasion to suspect that his contemplated
movements had been betrayed in a manner for which
he could not account. But every attempt to entrap
the stranger was met or evaded with such
consummate
art and address, that nothing could be got out
of him which could possibly commit himself or his
associate
.
Without a single falsehood on his part, he so
managed, that John could corroborate his statements
without any breach of veracity, and the general could
find no other charge substantiated against him, but
that of having left the city at night in defiance of
general
orders; and this, he being merely a citizen, was
not an offence of such magnitude as to call for the
exercise
of the utmost severity of military law. He
was finally committed to the custody of the
provost-marshal
,
and, with his companion, separately confined
in the old sugar-house, in what is now called
Liberty-street
,
there to undergo the discipline of the immortal
Cunningham, that petty tyrant, whose name is forever
associated with all that is odious and contemptible in
man. Thus they escaped a sudden death, for a
lingering
series of privations of every kind, accompanied
by insults which gave new aggravations of mind to
their bodily sufferings. Having now accommodated
our hero with board and lodging, we shall turn our
attention
to another quarter.
After the departure of John, his mistress remained
in the usual state of young damsels in love, during the
lingering hours of absence, only that her situation
was more than usually trying. Solitude is the nurse
of the heart, and all its most tender recollections,
and Jane lived alone, in a sequestered, almost
deserted
region, which afforded not even the material
for a flirtation, for there was nothing in the shape of
a rustic Lubin, or sentimental schoolmaster, in twenty
miles round. It was, therefore, a matter of absolute
necessity, that she should be constant to one object,
and constancy is an unnatural state of mind, a sort of
monomania, inconsistent with all the analogies of
nature
and the world, which exhibit nothing but a
perpetual
succession of changes. She had neither balls,
nor concerts, nor lectures, nor soirees, nor any gay
associations
to dissipate her mind, or charm her heart
away from one single contemplation; and even the
church, that never-failing resource of rural lads and
lasses, was now without its pastor and its flock. Her
only companion at the fireside, was a whimsical and
somewhat testy old continental; her only associates
abroad, were the birds, the blossoms, and the running
brooks; and her only occupation, was the easy cares
of a quiet household. The library of the colonel
afforded
little resource, consisting, as it did,
principally
,
of a couple of folio volumes, a century old, in
which were concentrated all the discoveries and
inventions
,
good, bad, or indifferent, with which the
pack-horse world had been saddled since the days of
Archimedes, or Tubal Cain, for aught we know to the
contrary, by visionary enthusiasts, cheating rogues,
and profound philosophers. It was a perfect mine of
inexhaustible treasures, and the colonel was in the
habit of asserting, with what truth we know not, that
nearly all the new discoveries in science or art, within
his time, were nothing more than old broken-down
hobby-horses, that had been tried and abandoned long
years ago. There was, however, no invention for
shortening the long, lingering hours of absence, or
bringing together two distant lovers, and for that
reason Jane never opened these precious depositories,
from whence, the colonel affirmed, were stolen all
modern inventions except his own.
Thus she continued a long while, without having
any news of John, for the post never passed in that
direction, nor did the newspapers circulate among the
depths of the forests, whereby, as it is credibly
asserted
,
the very squirrels and coons have of late become
almost as wise as their hunters. Nay, it is affirmed,
there is no crow so silly as to be circumvented by a
fox, and that no trap, however scientifically devised,
can inveigle a rat or mouse of ordinary sagacity,
even by the aid of toasted cheese, or broiled bacon.
It is, indeed, the age of development, and if the
human
15*
intellect does not burst by its own expansion, like
the frog in the fable, there is great reason to hope we
shall in good time become as wise as our
grandmothers
.
The only thing to be apprehended, is, that
knowledge, by the aid of cheap literature, will become
universal; in which case, it will depreciate in value
as fast as continental money. When all mankind are
wise, and all pebbles become diamonds, it will, belike,
be all one, as though all wise men were fools, and all
diamonds pebbles.
There was, however, no danger of Jane ever
becoming
wise, for she lived previous to, or just at the
dawning of the age of development, before the revival
of phrenology and animal magnetism, and
consequently
friend John was a lucky stripling. There was
not a circulating library, we believe, within the
distance
of three thousand miles, and how Jane learned
to love without drinking at that fountain, is a mystery
only to be solved by Dame Nature. Thus was our
unfortunate heroine utterly destitute of all those
resources
against the monopoly of the heart, which are
now within reach of our kitchen-maids. She had
nothing
to do, but mind her business and think of John.
Thus passed her time, and thus it might have
continued
to pass, had not the jade, Rumour, taken upon
herself the office of mails and newspapers, and blown
her trumpet, to the infinite disturbance of that
monotonous
calm into which Jane had gradually subsided.
No one could tell where the news came from, or who
first bruited it abroad; but so it was, that the colonel,
having stopped at a blacksmith's shop on one of his
excursions, was told of the sudden disappearance of
our hero from the army in the Highlandsof his being
seen in the disguise of a beggar, with a red wig, at the
village before noticedand of his never having been
seen or heard of since that time. The general
impression
of the army, it was said, was, that he had
deserted
to the enemy, and that his disguise had been
assumed
for that purpose. By way of a secret, we will
apprise the reader that the news first came from
Mangham, the pedlar, who had been in the Highlands
on a speculation, and passed, a few days before, on
his way to New York, or its neighbourhood, to
replenish
his pack. It was a great mystery, but certain
it is, the pedlar was a sort of privileged person, and,
like the ancient heralds, had free admission
everywhere
,
though we never heard that his person or his
function was considered sacred.
The old continental was one of those vessels which,
whenever they are full, overflow incontinently for want
of the self-balancing principle. A secret that was
painful or disagreeable to his own feelings, very soon
escaped, like a locust from its shell, and accordingly
the moment he saw his daughter on his return home,
he began to launch his thunderbolts at John. Jane,
of course, eagerly inquired what he meant, and received
the news of her lover's supposed delinquency with
mingled
doubt, indignation, and sorrow. Every day,
however
,
brought new confirmation; and, in the meantime,
hearing nothing from our hero, she was compelled to
believe all that she heard from others was true. No
one can tell what might have been the consequence
of this conviction of his unworthiness, had not the
vision of the beggar and his red wig, ever and anon
crossed her imagination, and thus, in some degree,
superseded
the image of her recreant swain. She
thought how ugly he must have looked, the
degenerate
wretch! thus to present himself to the red coats
in such an ignominious disguise! What would they
think of her taste, thus to fall in love with such a
fright? There is no danger of young maidens dying
for love, when their minds are occupied by two
objects
at a time, such as a handsome young fellow, with
blue eyes, and chestnut hair, and a ragged
tatterdemalion
in a red wig. But when a single object or
impression
becomes indelibly impressed on the heart, to
the exclusion of all others; when it plays the tyrant
alone and absolute, then it is that the fatal poison
works without its antidote, and that its venom
becomes
fatal. It was fortunate, therefore, for our
heroine
,
that there was a certain confused intermixture
in her recollection or imagination, of a ragged beggar
and a handsome youth, which prevented her
constantly
dwelling on the latter. She was thus enabled to
bear up against the first shock; and when, by degrees,
the image of her lover, such as she alone remembered
to have seen him, took once again full possession of
her recollection, time had assuaged the first bitterness
of sorrow, and contempt and indignation enabled her
to bear what remained. True, the laughing eye, the
ruddy cheek, the smile of careless hilarity, the look of
cheerful hope, the tripping step, and all the elastic
spirit of youth, had given place to a pale and sad
sobriety
.
Still, she did not abandon herself to grief, nor
forget for a moment, that, in pouring the balm of
consolation
into the hearts of others, she was applying
the most effectual remedy to her own.
The old continental, we are compelled to say,
behaved
very ill on this occasion. Instead of
sympathizing
with the stricken deer, he often assisted in
barbing the dart already rankling in her bosom. There
are some persons, who, not being capable of lasting
impressions of sorrow, always feel impatient at the
very sight of continued grief or depression on the part
of others, and instead of sympathy, resort to reproaches.
It was thus with the colonel, who could not endure to
see his child so changed, nor could he sympathize with
the cause. His usual resource was rather to outrage
the feelings of his child by anger, than sooth them by
pity. He could not bear to see her so changed, nor
could he participate in her depression. The old
gentleman
,
accordingly, vented his spleen in divers sneers,
inuendoes, and reproaches, occasionally not a little
aggravated by the failure of some one of his favourite
inventions. As he could not revenge himself on his
contrivances, he fell into a passion with poor Jane;
for nothing is more common with poor human nature
than to retort on honest Peter the offences of Paul the
rogue.
Jane used frequently to stroll over to the old stone
house, but received little consolation there. Though
happily for the human race, our feelings and
sympathies
partake in the dulness of the senses produced by
age; yet are its sorrows without the solace of the
inspiring hope of better times in this world. The aged
must look beyond the grave for the rising sun, since
they cannot expect to survive its setting here. The
old couple were mourning with Christian resignation
the death of their only son, and the disgrace of their
only grandson, and though their grief was silent, it
was not less deep and lasting. The visits of Jane
were now almost their only worldly consolation, for
they saw she sympathised with them, and to be pitied
is one of the greatest consolations of stricken age.
One evening, she had returned from a visit of this
kind, more than usually depressed and sorrowful. She
took her seat in silence, and in silence sat leaning her
cheek upon her hand, and giving up her whole soul to
bitter recollections. The old continental, in the
meantime
,
was observing his daughter, until at length he
could contain himself no longer. In a voice that made
the poor girl start and tremble, he suddenly exclaimed:
Thunder and Mars! Jane, what are you moping
about? you look for all the world as though you
could'nt help it.
Father, I cannot help it, said Jane, bursting into
tears.
YesI know what it is. Your head is running
on that good-for-nothing, beggarly, cowardly deserter,
John. You ought to be ashamed of yourself for
thinking
about such a scoundrel, except to hate and despise
him.
Father, I don't know, I don't believe him a deserter.
He loved his country, and he loved me too well to
desert
one, or give up the other. He is either dead or a
prisoner, my heart tells me so. You know, sir, it is
nothing but a rumour, that came from no one knows
where.
Pooh! pooh, girl! I dare say, if our country finally
loses the day, you will see him come home in a
British
uniform, with a pair of evauletts on his shoulders,
and catch you as they do gudgeons, with a red rag.
You will forgive him, but by all that is sacred, I never
will.
Father, said Jane, firmly, you don't know me, if
you think so. No, fatherif ever I am convinced
beyond
room for doubt, that is, by my own eyes, or his
own acknowledgement, that he has deserted his
country
,
from that hour he shall be to me nothing but an
object of contempt and scorn. I will tear him from
my heart as I would a poisoned arrow.
The colonel's eyes twinkled a little at this, but
people
who indulge a habit of being angry, don't always
choose to be pleased against their will, and he relapsed
into his crusty humour.
Yesyesit is very easy to talk; but the moment
he appears in his red coat, you will fall in love with it,
and forgive everything. The young rascal! that ever I
should be such an old blockhead as to promise him
my only daughter, my estate and my improvements.
But the fellow might have imposed upon a wiser man
than me, if such a one is to be found. He'd signalize
himself, he'd make himself worthy of being my son-in
lawhe'd make his name ring! Thunder and Mars!
he has kept that last promise, for it is now ringing
with infamy in the camp of Washington. Zounds,
I'd go twenty miles to see him hanged or shot.
Father, dear father! do not talk so to me. You
should not bear too hard upon the bruised, broken
reed. I am struggling day and night to bear up against
the wretched uncertainty of John's fate. I believe
him innocent; but if I were sure he was a traitor to
his cause, I should soon be well again, and happy
But do not harrass, do not reproach, and above all, do
not ridicule me, because I am not what I once was. In
all my troubles, you cannot say I have ever neglected
my duty to you; and if I can now no longer cheer you
with song and smiles, nothing, not even your
unkindness
,
shall take from you my love and reverence.
Take me to your arms, and bless me!
Saying this, she crept softly towards the old man,
with a look so meek, so mournful, yet affectionate,
that his tough, weather-beaten heart melted, and his
wrath exhaled like dew-drops of a sunny morning.
He opened his arms, pressed her to his heart, and
exclaimed
with glistening eyes:
Forgive your old father, dear Jane; damme if you
may'nt be as miserable as you please, and welcome.
Thank you, dear father! answered the grateful
girl, and a long silence ensued, during which the
colonel
was stretching his lame leg by walking back and
forth, with his hands behind him, apparently
communing
with his thoughts. At length he stopped
abruptly
opposite Jane, and broke forth as follows:
Jane, I've a great mindyes I willThunder and
Mars! I will, I'll see into the truth of this affair. The
army has not yet left the Highlands, and to-morrow I
will go and call on the general, to learn if possible
whether that young puppy has deserted or not. I
know something of the stratagems of war, and now I
think of it, John may have put on the beggar's dress
and that infernal red wig, to serve, not to betray his
country. What a blockhead I was not to think of this
before. Yes, I'll goThunder and Mars! I'll go.
Oh! thank you, dear father, for that promise and
that hope! cried Jane, throwing her arms about his
neck, and kissing him. Only get at the truthI do
not fear the truth.
The old continental forthwith summoned his man
of ebony, yelept Mingo, and ordered him to prepare
his trusty charger, old Ti, and his fellow-laborer, Black
Pepper, for a journey on the morrow. Moreover, he
directed him to draw his regimentals forth from their
dread abode, beat them soundly with a stick or switch,
and hang them out bright and early in the morning
for an airing. Finally, he commanded Ebony, who
had been his squire during the old French war, to dust
his ancient livery that he might not disgrace his
commander
.
This resolution of the father brought balm
to the bosom of the daughter, where lurked, beyond
the reach of reason or probability, a latent conviction,
founded on an intimate communion of years, that the
youth of her pride and affections was still worthy the
place he had so long occupied. That night brought
with it visions of happier times, and she rose in the
morning with the sun, and almost as bright as he.
The breakfast was more cheerful than for a long
while past, but they were disturbed in the midst of it,
by the abrupt entrance of Mingo, who, in great
consternation
,
announced that the colonel's regimentals
were so completely riddled by moth as to be totally
unfitted for service.
Dem look jis like a sive, colonel. You see
daylight
trough em like nottin.
Thunder and Mars! Jane, it's all your fault.
You've not aired them ever since you began a
flirtation
16
with that puppy, John. I've a great mind not to
stir a foot.
Jane made the best excuses she could, and threw
out something like an insinuation that it was Mingo's
business to attend to the regimentals; whereupon the
old continental ran a tilt against his squire, accusing
him of being a lazy old caterpillar.
Thunder and Mars! sir! you should have
sprinkled
them with snuff, or covered them with tobacco.
Have not I bought ever so many pounds of both, and
given them to you for that very purpose? But I
suppose
you have snuffed and smoked it all yourself, you
old snow-ball.
Jane, now seeing the storm directed against Mingo,
assumed the entire responsibility of the business,
though she refrained from giving the true reason of
her neglect. The colonel's uniform was that of the
old provincial troops, as they were called, which was a
blue coat, and scarlet waistcoat and breeches, trimmed
with silver lace. Now the truth is, Jane was such a
sturdy little rebel, she could not bear to see him even
partially dressed in a colour she now held in
abomination
,
and for this reason she had wilfully delivered the
colonel's regimentals to the custody of the moth.
She also abstained from reminding him that he might
possibly be mistaken for a British officer, lest he should
abandon the expedition in disgust. On examination,
however, it was discovered that the case was not so
desperate as Mingo had reported, and in good time,
the old continental and his faithful squire were
equipped
for the journey. Old Ti and Black Pepper were
then brought forth, caparisoned in their best, and all
things being in readiness, the knight and his attendant
sallied forth in gallant array, followed by the good
wishes and prayers of the grateful daughter, now left
in solitary loneliness to the indulgence of her fears
and her anticipations.
CHAPTER XI.
THE COLONEL'S ORDER OF MARCHMUTINOUS CONDUCT OF OLD
MINGOTHE COLONEL INFLICTS MARTIAL LAW ON HIM
CONSTERNATION OF THE WOMEN AND CHILDREN, DUCKS, PIGS,
AND CHICKENSUNHEARD OF EXPLOIT AT PINE'S BRIDGE
HONOURS PAID THE COLONELSUCCESSFUL ISSUE OF HIS
MISSION, AND HAPPY RETURN.
The
distance between the residence of Colonel
Hammond
and the Highlands, was not more than some
five-and-twenty miles, and might easily have been
compassed in a summers' day by ordinary equestrians.
But neither the colonel or his squire were in the
heyday
of youth, and their steeds would never have won
a heat at the Union course. They were a pair of
sleepy animals, somewhat better fed than taught; for,
being great pets of Mingo, they had been pampered,
stuffed, and curry-combed, till they grew as fat as an
alderman, and as sleek as moles. The colonel was a
short, square-built man, so that when mounted on his
broad-backed charger, his legs were utterly incapable
of spanning the wide circumference, but, on the
contrary
,
projected somewhat horizontally from the seat
of gravity. Mingo was a little, squat, native African,
black and shining as anthracite coal, and at the same
time deeply pitted with the smallpox. But he had the
advantage of the colonel in one particular, his legs,
being of the extreme order of bandy, so that when he
sat his horse, they fitted the animal's sides just as well
as his own ribs, and clung as close as a circingle.
Add to this, that the day, particularly the mid-day,
was somewhat sultry, and it will readily be imagined
that the progress of our adventurers was somewhat
slow and easy.
The journey was rendered more tedious by the
absence
of all conversation, the military etiquette of the
colonel not permitting Mingo to approach within a
certain distance in the rear, which the latter, from
time immemorial, had been accustomed to ascertain,
by counting the lengths, as they are called, of the rail
fences by the roadside. Mingo, by this means,
managed
to preserve his distance until they came to a long
stone wall, where he was observed to waver very
materially
,
and severely reprimanded accordingly. It is
well known to be the instinct of all gentlemen of
colour
to fall asleep when they have nothing else to do,
and Mingo, after a ride of some ten or a dozen miles,
paid a visit to the land of Nod, according to the
custom of his ancestors. Thereupon, his steed,
having
been used to amble side by side with his old
comrade in harness, incontinently gathered himself
together, and fidgeted up close beside the colonel,
greeting his old messmate with a significant chuckle
of welcome.
Thunder and Mars! you old sinner, what business
have you here? exclaimed the indignant continental.
Mingo replied not, except by a snort; other answer
made he none, for he continued to sleep like a top.
16*
The indignation of the colonel kindled into a flame.
He invoked all his energies, and would have raised
himself in his stirrups, had not the oblique direction of
his legs forbid, in like manner with the furious knight
of La Mancha, when preparing to annihilate the
valiant Biscayner. He grasped his cane, which he
always rode with, and permitting the squire to
precede
him a single step, planted a blow with such
judicious
precision on his broad shoulders, that a cloud
of dust ascended therefrom, and he awoke, as if by
miracle, rubbing his eyes and twisting his body in a
very significant manner, exclaiming at the same
time
Hey! what de debbil dat?
I'll tell you what de debbil dat, you sleepy old
varmint
.
What business have you to come alongside of
me in this way, as if you were my equal, hey?
Why, massa, we all fightin for libbety and
quality
,
ant we? But howsomever, you let me talk, I no
sleep. Nigger mus do sumtin keep hisself awake.
You old rascal, didn't I order you to keep the
length of six rails in the rear?
Ees, massa, but dis dam stone fencehe bodder
me. I gwine to count stones, and den, ecod, massa,
nigger go fast 'sleepdat's all. I no do so 'gin, caze
why, my back put me in mind, I reckon.
Very wellfall back in the rear, and march on,
you mutinous old rascal. If you come alongside again,
Thunder and Mars! I'll pay you over that stupid
woolly head, instead of your shoulders.
Mingo gave his shoulders a sympathetic shake, fell
in the rear, and they again proceeded forward. It
was fortunate for the colonel that the country through
which they passed, was, in a great measure, destitute
of male inhabitants, or his colonial uniform might
have cost him a shot from behind a tree or a stone
wall. Occasionally they passed a house occupied by
women and children, the father and grown up sons
having gone to the wars; and whenever this happened,
there was an alarm that the red coats were coming,
for they were ever accustomed to associate the colour
of the colonel's waistcoat and breeches with the
presence
of an enemy, and the leisurely pace of the old
continental induced a belief that he was at the head
of a party in the rear. Accordingly, the whole line
along the road was in a state of alarm; mothers
sought refuge in their accustomed hiding-places;
children
vanished like shadows; while the ducks, pigs,
and chickens decamped from pure instinct. Such was
the feeling of the women of this region, in these
lawless
times, when the sight of man, instead of inspiring
confidence, was too often the prelude to insult,
violence
,
and plunder.
Our travellers, betimes, approached the pass of
Pine's bridge, where was stationed a guard of
republican
soldiers. The colonel stiffened himself, assumed
the perpendicular, and giving old Ti a thwack across
the ears with his cane, which caused him to shake his
head in disgust, trotted gallantly forward towards the
bridge. His appearance at a distance had puzzled
the officer of the guard, who mistook his scarlet
waistcoat
and breeches for a full British uniform, and
expected
every moment to see a party of the enemy
following
.
He accordingly ordered his men to be called
together by beat of drum, while the old continental,
turning to Mingo, exclaimed
Now, Mingo, you shall see. They are preparing
to receive me with military honours.
As he planted his first hoof on the bridge, the officer
called out in a loud voice
Hollo, my friend, where are you bound? at the
same time, his men pointed their guns in a significant
manner.
Sing out, massa, or, ecod, dey shoot you, said
Mingo.
To head-quarters, answered the colonel.
Do you come with a flag?
No.
Have you a pass?
Thunder and Mars! don't you know my
uniform
?
Not I, faith. What corps do you belong to?
To the New York regiment of continentals, that
served in the old French war. My name is
Hammond
Colonel
Hammond.
I don't know any such regiment, nor any such
uniform
.
Thunder and Mars! did you never hear of old
Ti?
Old Ti? Not I.
Why, where in the name of old Harry were you
born, and where have you lived?
No matter. What is your business at
head-quarters
?
None of your business, sir!
That won't do, old gentleman. You are without
a pass. Your uniform is half British, half American,
and you refuse to give any account of yourself. You
are my prisoner, sir, and I shall send you under a
guard to head-quarters. You may be a spy, for aught
I know.
A spy! Thunder and Mars!a spy! I'll teach
you to insult as good a whig as the mother that bore
you, or any of your generation. Mingo, follow me!
The old continental thereupon drew forth his trusty
and rusty sword, and pricking forward old Ti, while
he flourished his weapon, gallantly passed the officer,
who, seeing what an original he had to deal with,
suffered
him to take his way while he stood shaking with
laughter. The guard, in like manner, at a signal from
the officer, respectfully opened for the colonel to pass,
so that, as he long afterwards was accustomed to
boast, he fairly carried the bridge sword in hand.
The officer, who had followed close in the rear, now
courteously addressed him, stating that his rank and
achievements forbade that he should be permitted to
travel with a single attendant through a district where
he was exposed to such unpleasant interruptions. He
therefore respectfully proffered the attendance of three
of his men, as a guard of honour, to head-quarters.
This he conceived to be the most peaceable mode of
disposing of one, whose appearance, conduct, and
discourse
,
buffled all his sagacity. Whether a humourist,
a madman, or a consummate deceiver, he could not
decide, and therefore adopted that mode of disposing
of his conqueror.
Thus honoured, the old continental pursued his
journey
without further adventures, entertaining his
escort
with his exploits at old Ti, occasionally
regretting
that, like most of his compeers in arms, he was
now past serving his country, and lamenting, with
perfect simplicity, how unfortunate it was there were
so few good officers in the present continental army.
In the midst of these sage discourses, they arrived at
Peekskill, in the dusk of the evening, where the
colonel
requested they might halt for the night, as he felt
somewhat fatigued with his exploit at the bridge, and
his pursy steeds could now scarcely put one foot
before
the other. His wish was complied with, and, as
a special mark of honour, a sentinel kept guard all
night at the door of his chamber.
You see, you old snow-ball, said the colonel,
proudly, you see I am somebody among soldiers,
though nobody at home. Thunder and Mars! a
prophet
has no honour in his own country.
Mingo grinned enormously at this sally, having
sufficient
shrewdness to see through the whole affair;
but he held his tongue for fear of another application
to his shoulders. Early in the morning, they entered
the pass of the Highlands, and the colonel was
conducted
by his guard of honour to the quarters of the
commander-in-chief.
Far be from us the presumption of attempting to
portray or caricature the face, person, and
deportment
of the illustrious man, to whose presence the
colonel was now, at his earnest request, conducted.
The severe simplicity of his characterthe natural,
unaffected dignity of his deportmentthe beautiful
symmetry which blended all his great qualities and
virtues in one harmonious wholewhile it constitutes
the perfection of our nature, will forever defy the
presumption
of those who attempt to portray either his
person or his character. Washington was no hero of
romance, and his name associates but illy with fiction.
It is too sacred for such profanation; and he, of all the
great characters on record, least requires the aid of
the imagination to do justice to his fame. There is
scarcely a house in the land, where his picture is not
hung up to the contemplation of our children; there
is not a heart in the land that does not throb with
gratitude at the recollection of his name; and there
is not a page in the history of independent America,
written, or to be written, that will not in some way
or other, bear testimony to the benefits derived from
his services and his example. Let not the mists of
fiction gather around him, and change a consummate
man into a misshapen monster. Let him be enshrined
in the pure white mantle of truth, for truth alone can
do him justice.
Suffice it to say, the mission of the colonel ended
perfectly to his satisfaction. Under a pledge of
profound
secrecy, the reason for which our readers will
readily comprehend, the object of our hero's disguise,
and the cause of his disappearance, were fully
explained
.
The colonel further learned that John was
now a prisoner, but where, and under what
circumstances
,
remained unknown, as since his capture, and
that of the person who met him at Spuyten Duyvel,
the difficulty of obtaining information from New York
had greatly increased. The general did full justice
to his ardour, intelligence, courage, and patriotism;
and the old continental, after dining at head-quarters,
and talking about Braddock's war, was dismissed
under
a firm conviction that the goddess Rumour was no
better than an almanac.
He returned home without the necessity of again
carrying Pine's bridge sword in hand; astounded Jane
with the relation of that famous exploit, which he
insisted
on before he would say a word of John; and
finally, gladdened her inmost soul by detailing the
testimony
of the general. She acquiesced with lowly
humility in his imprisonment, for that might have an
end; but the brand of a traitor could never be effaced,
and though he might die under its stigma, he could
never live for her. For a time, her smiles and
cheerfulness
returned; and when, on the return of spring,
the birds sung, the flowers bloomed, and the zephyrs
whispered among the green leaves, she could
sympathise
in the joyousness of nature.
END OF VOLUME I.